,title,company,salary,location,job_desc
0,Digital & Customer Data Optimisation Analyst,TabCorp Holdings,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Job no: 503703
Work type: Permanent Full-Time
Location: Sydney - George Street, Ann Street
One day you’re helping us boldly innovate, another you’re leading an initiative, or pitching in where needed. At Tabcorp, each day brings a different challenge and another opportunity – and this is what we live for.
As part of the team, you’ll bring your skilled, organised, problem-solving self to positively impact your career, your team, our customers and community. We move at pace, and we’re looking for people who want to learn and grow with us. Together, we say yes to possibilities. We create amazing experiences. And, so can you.
What you’ll do
As the Digital & Customer Data Optimisation Analyst, you will deliver analysis, requirements gathering, and process mapping to support the management of digital optimisation & data/audience building projects and initiatives through Adobe Experience Platform and into Adobe Target and/or the CMS, digital advertising and CRM channels.
You will design processes, measurement standards and key metrics to prioritise and drive decision making for digital campaigns through AEP. These will include cross-channel customer targeting initiatives and experience optimisation strategies.
What you’ll bring
Demonstrated experience in digital marking analytics, platforms such as Adobe Analytics, Google Analytics
Experience in A/B Testing tools such as Adobe Target
Sound understanding of modern digital marketing technology & trends.
Business and/or System Analysis skills and experience such as requirements definition/ user story creation, information gathering, discovery and/or specification development
Experience in process mapping, business case development, benefits capture/realisation, and presentations
Solid experience with both Agile and Waterfall methodology (Agile preferred)
Experience with Confluence and JIRA
About Tabcorp
We’re Australia’s largest gambling entertainment company. Together, we build on our 100+ year heritage by delivering Excitement with Integrity, every day. Each one of us is here to put our customers at the heart of everything we do by creating moments that engage, surprise and thrill.
Our 4,500+ strong team is as diverse as Australia itself. Our people drive homegrown world-class brands; Tatts, TAB, NSW Lotteries, Golden Casket, SA Lotteries, Keno, Sky Racing, Sky Sports Radio and MAX. As an ASX listed company we’re proud to shape our industry for the better. Because together, anything’s possible.
Tabcorp is committed to creating an inclusive workplace where all our people feel valued for their unique qualities and have a sense of belonging. If you need assistance or adjustments to fully participate in the application process, please contact tabcorprecruitment@tabcorp.com.au
#LIPOST
Advertised: 10 Feb 2021 12:00 PM AUS Eastern Daylight Time
Applications close: 19 Feb 2021 5:00 PM AUS Eastern Daylight Time
19 days ago
Report job"
1,Data Analyst/Data Engineer,Carecone,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Job Description
Responsibilities:
Address and solve complex business issues using large amounts of data.
Optimise data flows by building robust, fault-tolerant data pipeline that cleans, transforms, and aggregates unorganized and messy data into databases or data sources.
Design data structures for data ingestion, integration and analytics layers on a variety of technologies.
Help guide and support other data workers within the tribe and across the wider enterprise.
Skills Necessary for the Role
Strong core Java 8
Multi-threaded programming and OO design.
Experience in building mock-ups and prototypes to showcase a feature before properly implementing it.
Experience in common Big Data toolkits such as:
Apache Spark / Storm
Apache Parquet
Apache Hive
Highly regarded Skills-
Experience in data visualisation suite like Tableau and Qlik.
Job Type: Full-time
12 days ago
Report job"
2,NCS SG - Data Analytics Project Managers,TechSkills Accelerator,Not shown,Australia,"We have a great opportunity for a talented and self-motivated Assistant Project Manager to join our Communications Engineering Team at NCS. At NCS, we seek to nurture talents in creating and developing innovative solutions. If you are passionate about new technologies and new ideas, NCS could be a place for you!
Responsibilities
Coordinate internal resources and third parties/vendors for the flawless execution of projects
Ensure that all projects are delivered on-time, within scope and within budget
Assist in the definition of project scope and objectives, involving all relevant stakeholders and ensuring technical feasibility
Ensure resource availability and allocation
Develop a detailed project plan to monitor and track progress
Manage changes to the project scope, project schedule and project costs using appropriate verification techniques
Measure project performance using appropriate tools and techniques
Report and escalate to management as needed
Manage the relationship with the client and all stakeholders
Perform risk management to minimize project risks
Establish and maintain relationships with third parties/vendors
Create and maintain comprehensive project documentation
Meet with clients to take detailed ordering briefs and clarify specific requirements of each project
Delegate project tasks based on junior staff members' individual strengths, skill sets and experience levels
Track project performance, specifically to analyze the successful completion of short and long-term goals
Meet budgetary objectives and make adjustments to project constraints based on financial analysis
Develop comprehensive project plans to be shared with clients as well as other staff members
Use and continually develop leadership skills
Perform other related duties as assigned- Develop spreadsheets, diagrams and process maps to document needs
The ideal candidate shall possess the following
Diploma / Degree in Electronic & Electrical Engineering, Computer Science or IT is required.
At least 3+ years of professional IT experience, including responsibility for identifying technical problems and coordinating their resolution / mitigation, change management, incident management.
Project Management Professional (PMP) certification preferred
Must possess excellent written and oral communication skills and excellent, proven analytical skills
Effective and positive role model, mentor and leader
Proven working experience in project management
Excellent client-facing and internal communication skills
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
30+ days ago
Report job"
3,APS 6 Data Analyst,Australian Taxation Office,"$84,556 - $97,085 a year",Canberra ACT,"ATO Finance, Financial Statements and Policy Services
Canberra
Ongoing/non-ongoing, full-time/part-time, $84,556 - $97,085 + 15.4% super
We are seeking a highly motivated and innovative Data Analyst to join our Financial Statements and Policy Services branch.

As a Data Analyst, in our ATO Finance business area, you’ll use your expertise in data analysis, modelling techniques and business knowledge to address business problems and support data-driven decision making.

You will work with large volumes of financial data to support reporting, analysis, streamlining and automating processes. You’ll work across the branch to build and test reports based on documented business requirements. You’ll also be responsible for the ongoing maintenance and execution of SQL that supports the data needs of the branch.

Our ideal candidate
has strong data analysis, data verification and problem-solving capabilities
demonstrates a higher complexity understanding of programming and using analytical and reporting tools
is experienced sourcing, analysing and manipulating large volumes of complex financial data
has technical and system expertise in the modification and development of financial processes with highly developed SQL
understands client expectations and confidently communicates complex technical information in ‘Plain English’
models continuous professional development and is resilient when faced with constant change
effectively manages competing work priorities and strategies to ensure business outcomes are delivered.
This role may be offered on an ongoing or non-ongoing basis in Canberra.
Candidate information kit Opens in new window
Just posted
Report job"
4,Technical Business Analyst - Data Delivery,Hays,Not shown,Sydney Central Business District NSW,"Permanent opportunity for a Technical BA to work in a Big 4 Bank!

Your new company
One of the largest financial services providers in Sydney, which offers multiple products across the domestic market, is looking to recruit a Technical Business Analyst to be part of their Group-wide Technology and Data team. Its purpose is to provide Data Delivery to multiple simultaneous projects in different areas and businesses of the bank.


Your new role
You will work closely with the data delivery team to deploy data management enablement tools and provide support to the different portfolios, while acting as a bridge between the technical teams and the business to facilitate accurate and appropriate decisions being made. You will be working together with stakeholders to understand their needs and concerns and document the current and proposed state in order to identify improvements and develop requirements.


What you'll need to succeed
Strong data analysis experience
Strong SQL skills
Financial Services background
Experience with Big data platforms
Experience engaging with the business side and working with different stakeholders
Previous experience working in data migration or separation projects will be highly regarded
Swift system knowledge will be highly regarded



What you'll get in return
You will receive a competitive salary and work as a permanent employee for a leading Financial Services organization. You'll be offered flexible working arrangements and exciting career progression opportunities, while working in an ideal Sydney CBD location!


What you need to do now
If you're interested in this role, click 'apply now' to forward an up-to-date copy of your CV, or send it to lucia.turner@hays.com.au.
If this job isn't quite right for you but you are looking for a new position, please contact us for a confidential discussion on your career.

SA Licence number : LHS 297508
18 days ago
Report job"
5,Customer Insights Analyst,Vodafone,"$90,000 a year",North Sydney NSW,"Present insights in a clear & concise manner
Solid programming skills
Strong communication skills

At Vodafone, we put our customers at the heart of everything we do to give Australians more choice and freedom to connect the way they want.
As a Customer Insights Analyst, your role will cover customer base insights, profiling, forecasting and optimisation. You will be part of a highly motivated team of analysts working on interesting and difficult problems, to build solutions and customer engagement.
While reporting, tracking performance KPIs and dashboards creation may be in scope for this role, more important is the ability to structure and complete new, custom pieces of research independently. In doing so, you would need to adapt and adjust on the go and investigate alternative approaches, guided by your good understanding of the business objectives and your commercial acumen.
Key Task and Responsibilities:
Analysing large, complex datasets to reveal underlying patterns, correlations and trends
Examine customer behaviour using internal & external datasets to design and develop analytical models and their optimisation
Drive analytics and business cases to come up with new ideas for promotions and campaigns to change the current behaviour by ensuring usage uplift and upgrading packages
Use historic data to drive development of predictive & Propensity models for optimal activity
Investigating performance of current products and translate insights into specific improvement suggestions & new feature proposals
Develop and maintain a dashboard linking customer lifecycle stage, related campaigns performance to overall revenues and subscribers
Contribute to monthly reporting process and output for senior and executive management
Track Customer Value Management team activities performance on daily basis against roadmap
Work closely with the BI and IT team to develop effective reporting capabilities and processes
Driving development of learning techniques to model customer behaviour and preferences
Leveraging quantitative techniques to answer ad-hoc business problems
Drive and support financial/commercial modelling to inform business decisions
Skills and Experience:
What you work on, will have a direct impact on shaping the future of Vodafone customers, and will help shape key business decisions and activities. You will have a strong quantitative or technical background with experience working with large datasets and solving tough problems via SQL database interrogation. You will be a highly intelligent self-starter, with a bias towards action and attention to detail, able to turn information into actionable insights.
You will have a good understanding of both the commercial and the tech side, with strong stakeholder management skills, which will enable you to proactively identify business use-cases, and to understand and work around tech constraints. Your experience working with large datasets and distributed computing (Hadoop, Spark, Mahout, NoSQL, Hive etc.) and data visualizations tools like Qlik, Tableau, D3.js & ggplot would be a plus.
The base salary on offer for this role is $90,000 p.a
With Vodafone, we are committed to attracting, developing and retaining the best people by offering a flexible, diverse and inclusive workplace where hard work is truly rewarded. You will have access to fantastic benefits as part of a global company, including generous leave policies, leadership development programs and opportunities to grow your career. You’ll be faced with loads of variety where no two days are ever the same in a collaborative work space that helps drive innovation.
Ready?
When you sign up and create a LiveHire profile, your personal information will be collected in accordance with Vodafone's Privacy Collection Statement and LiveHire's Personal Information Collection Statement.

Video
13 days ago
Report job"
6,Data Analyst w igaming experience,JobMatchingPartner,Not shown,Tasmania,"A casino and sportsbook operator is looking for a bright Data Analyst with igaming experience to join their Data Analytics team.
The individual will work closely with internal stakeholders to perform complex data analysis and create dashboards and reports. This person needs to like to tell engaging and meaningful data-driven stories, so that stakeholders make the right decisions based on timely and actionable insight.
Key Responsibilities
Design, develop, and deploy cutting-edge data products.
Create compelling dashboards and reports.
Perform complex data analysis - proactively provide actionable insights and recommendations.
Work with the data warehouse team to build data solutions and continuously improve the company’s data processes.
Constantly keep updated on the latest techniques and practices.
Requirements
At least 3 years’ experience in a similar role
iGaming experience is essential
Highly analytical and strong critical-thinking skills - knows how to approach and solve business questions
Fluent in SQL and building data model
Solid experience creating dashboards using Tableau and / or Power BI
Knows how to present data in a meaningful way
Excellent team player
Solution-finder!
Experienced with databases, data warehouses, ETL, and data processing tools
Experience in advanced analytical techniques (forecasting, recommendations, machine learning) using R or Python is an advantage
Proactive with a positive mindset and a can-do attitude
Fluent in English (level C1 min)

The company offers
Competitive salary;
Private health insurance;
Training and development programs (upon individual request or on behalf of the company);
Internal promotion opportunities;
Positive and supportive work environment;
Office parties
Due to current travel restrictions and changes to work permit regulations, applications from candidates already residing in Malta will be preferred.
30+ days ago
Report job"
7,Market & Commercial Analyst,Kimberly-Clark,Not shown,Milsons Point NSW,"Job Description
About the Company:
At Kimberly-Clark Professional we create exceptional workplaces across the globe. We strive to ensure the work environment is healthier, safer and more productive. From paper products to wipers, our B2B brands: Kleenex®, Scott®, and WYPALL® play a critical role in creating exceptional workplaces that enhance the employee experience.
We believe in recruiting the best people and putting them in the right jobs so they can do their best work. Our Values – being innovative, accountable, authentic and caring – drive our culture. And our behaviours enable every employee to live and bring those values to life.
Our people bring their diverse backgrounds and unique perspectives to build a respectful, inclusive and flexible workplace. One where we’re driven by our values, and supported to share ideas, initiatives, and energy.
If original thinking and a passion to win inspire you, come Unleash Your Power at Kimberly-Clark.
About the Opportunity:
The Market & Commercial Analyst will provide market-based intelligence insights, through identifying industry, company, and growth opportunities that can support Kimberly-Clark Professional’s (KCP) planning and decision making. The role works closely with key external influencers to respond to tenders and RFP’s, to positively impact the operating profit for the ANZ business which will assist us to achieve financial and business objectives.
This role can either be based in Sydney or Melbourne.
If you love analysing external market data that drives impactful commercial decision making, apply now!
Priorities & responsibilities include:
This role provides market-based intelligence insights through identifying industry and company opportunities to support KCP’s planning and decision making. You will maintain pricing integrity via running the ANZ pricing deal desk, and will support sales teams to execute business plans to drive top line growth with new and existing customers.
You will lead profitable tender submissions and maintain pricing structures for existing and/or new business opportunities. The role provides compelling data-based insights that drive KCP’s business activities to make quicker and more compelling decisions, providing the entire organisation with a better understanding and insight into the total market available to KCP.
About You:
Ideally holding Degree qualifications or similar, you posess a minimum of 3+ years’ experience in a B2B environment undertaking research and analysing data using multiple sources to draw meaningful insights that support planning and decision making. You will need to have previous experience in managing large tendered and contractual B2B contracts. We are seeking Business Planning and Tactical Execution experience that includes profitability scenario analysis, setting sales strategy and driving initiatives.
With well-developed collaboration and communication skills, you have experience leading and training large groups of people, and have proven negotiation and conflict resolution skills with both internal and external stakeholders. You are highly proficient in using CRM software and tools such as Power Point, MS Word, Outlook and MS Excel, and have experience using LinkedIn for prospecting. The successful candidate will have an innate ability to identify problems and trends, drawing connections between data, and moving to action to drive results.
If you are interested in joining KCP we would love to see your application & if innovative thinking and a passion to win inspire you, come Unleash Your Power at Kimberly-Clark.
What’s on offer:
Our Kimberly-Clark employees receive a competitive salary and incentives as well as access to a fantastic range of benefits including superannuation, career development opportunities, free health & wellbeing activities, volunteering leave and much more.
#
Global VISA and Relocation Specifications:
K-C will not provide support for relocation of the chosen candidate for this role, if necessary, relocation will be at the candidate’s own expense.

However, K-C will provide assistance and financial support to obtain immigration visas and work authorization for the chosen candidate, if needed.
Primary Location
North Sydney Office
Additional Locations
Australia - Victoria - Melbourne
Worker Type
Employee
Worker Sub-Type
Regular
Time Type
Full time
Today
Report job"
8,"Data Scientist, Advanced Analytics",Westpac Group,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"How will I help?
As the Data Scientist, Advanced Analytics in Group Strategy, your role is to support the team to make informed decisions through the application of data mining, predictive analytics and machine learning techniques. You will work closely with business partners to understand the business objectives and challenges to design analytical solutions to meet business goals.
What's in it for you?
You will build your profile internally with senior stakeholders and be part of the future of a business that has been around for 200 years. You'll be working for an organisation that supports development, internal career moves and flexible working (open to candidates-based interstate). Along with competitive salary, you'll receive Westpac’s generous benefits and a whole array of customer discounts.
What do I need?
We'd expect you to have a minimum of 3 years' experience in statistical modelling in a big data environment (Hadoop/Spark/R/Python) in Financial Services/Banking or similar industry and excellent proficiency in translating and analysing data. You will also be experienced with selecting features, building, and optimising classifiers using machine learning techniques and have worked with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes. Additionally you will need to have knowledge of a variety of statistical and data mining techniques (regression, statistical tests and proper usage, random forest, clustering, decision tree learning, deep learning text mining etc.) Tertiary education in the Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics disciplines will be highly regarded.
What is it like to work there?
We aim to provide one big, supportive team to help us reach our vision to become one of the world's great service companies. As an equal opportunity employer, we're proud to have created a culture and work environment that values diversity and flexibility – and champions inclusion.
The health and wellbeing of our employees is our priority and we will ensure that physical distancing requirements are met in all our workplaces as long as required.

Brand : Westpac Group
Job : Branch Sales and Service
Primary Location : AU-NSW-Sydney CBD
Employee Status : Permanent
Schedule : Full-time
Recruiter : Crystal Chan
Posting Date : 08/02/2021, 4:26:45 PM
Closing Date : 23/02/2021, 6:59:00 AM
7 days ago
Report job"
9,"Data Analyst Team Leaders (APS6), 2021 Census of Population and Housing",Australian Bureau of Statistics,"$82,820 - $93,530 a year",Belconnen ACT,"APS Level 6
Temporary, full-time position
$82,820 – $93,530 per annum (plus 15.4% superannuation and allowances)


The Australian Bureau of Statistics (ABS) 2021 Census of Population and Housing is currently seeking Data Analyst Team Leaders at an APS6 classification to join our 2021 Census Data Coding section.

These are full-time, temporary positions, located in Belconnen, Canberra.

About the 2021 Census of Population and Housing:

The Census of Population and Housing (Census) is run every five years and is one of the largest and important collections to count the number of people and houses in Australia. The Census collects information about where we live, age, our culture, religion, income, education, living and housing arrangements. The information is used to make important decisions, such as government funding, input into policy-making and electoral boundaries.

About the roles:

The 2021 Census Data Coding section is responsible for transforming information provided by respondents on the Census form into statistical data. This includes the classification of responses to topics such as occupation, language and religion.

We are looking to fill multiple Census Data Analyst APS6 roles and staff will be expected to become data specialists in their topic. Responsibilities include:
Leading a team to ensure specific data coding outputs are achieved on time and to a sufficient quality.
Contributing to the strategic development and planning of data operations.
The use of various data interrogation tools to monitor accuracy of coding operations and output.
Development and production of management information reports on progress and quality.
Training and workload management of temporary coding staff.
Management of indexes and classifications relating to various Census topics.
Building and maintaining productive working relationships within Census Data Coding and with quality assurance areas.

Your qualities, experiences and skills:

To be suitable you should have most of or all the following skills, qualities and experience:


Ability to lead a team to achieve high quality outputs with a focus on accuracy and strict deadlines.
Strong people management skills including the ability to build a high performing diverse team with a culture where people feel valued, supported and satisfied in their role.
Ability to work in a high-pressure environment, maintaining day to day operations and delivering on identified business outcomes.
Good communication skills and ability to work collaboratively with others to prioritise and progress project priorities, monitoring and adjusting as required.
Ability to identify and resolve issues, making decisions based on sound and professional judgement.
Established skills in objective, systematic analysis and data interrogation, and ability to draw accurate conclusions based on evidence.
Experience in data analysis tools such as Excel, SAS, SQL and PowerBI is desirable, but not essential.

If found suitable but not offered a role you will be placed in the merit pool. If you agree in your application you may be offered a similar role in the ABS or another APS agency.
2 days ago
Report job"
10,Tech Business Analyst,Macquarie Group Limited,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Join our Technology team as a talented Senior System Analyst where you will get to integrate applications and build automated solutions using cloud-based technologies.
You will be working with a group of multi-talented and diverse teams in a fast-paced, challenging environment. To succeed in this role, you need to be a self-motivated team player and excellent communication skills to engage with all levels of stakeholders.
We anticipate to excel in this role you will ideally have:
8-10 years of experience in data analysis on multi system data convergence documenting data requirements, transformation rules, complex data maps and establish interface contract.
experience in producing high quality artefacts capturing data flows, processes, functional specifications, entity relationship diagrams, system and user support documentation.
to effectively work with a cross-functional delivery team of product owners, business analysts, software & automation engineers
experience in large transformation program (Waterfall, Agile, Hybrid delivery) and the ability to work to tight deadlines and competing priorities.
experience in data preparation and/or reporting tools like Alteryx, PowerBI, Tableau
able to generate queries on Oracle, PostgreSQL, MS SQL, Impala and Hive
exposure to software testing and quality assurance activities.
It is a bonus if you bring:
expertise in using of JIRA and Confluence
familiar with public cloud infrastructure (e.g. AWS).
You will bring a resilient character, a learning mindset, and relish opportunities to stretch yourself. If this role sounds like the right opportunity to further your career, please apply via the link.
The Corporate Operations Group brings together specialist support services in Digital Transformation & Data, Technology, Market Operations, Human Resources, Business Services, Business Improvement & Strategy, and the Macquarie Group Foundation. The Corporate Operations Group’s purpose is to power the entrepreneurial enterprise.

Macquarie understands the importance of diversity and inclusion - our long history of success has come from being different. At Macquarie we value the innovation and creativity that diversity of thought brings. The one thing we all have in common is our focus on high performance. If you are capable, motivated and can deliver, we want you on our team.
We facilitate a range of flexible working arrangements within our teams. Talk to us about what flexibility may be available.

About Macquarie
A career at Macquarie means you’ll have the opportunity to develop and utilise new skills, explore interesting fields and do challenging work that will impact the lives of people around the world—whether it’s accelerating the green energy transition, helping sustain global food supplies, financing social housing projects or investing in essential infrastructure. At Macquarie, we’re empowering people to innovate and invest for a better future.
Our size and international presence means your work can take you anywhere—across business groups, disciplines, sectors and borders. With 16,300+ employees and offices in 31 markets around the world, we’re a truly global organisation.
You’ll be supported by a diverse team where the unique perspectives, ideas and experiences that all of our people bring are valued. You’ll be empowered to address unmet needs in our communities whilst advising and investing alongside our clients and partners. Working with us, you’ll have the opportunity to make a difference.
Macquarie is a global financial group providing clients with asset management, retail and business banking, wealth management, leasing and asset financing, market access, commodity trading, renewables development, investment banking and principal investment.

Job no: COG-956256
Work type: Full time
Location: Sydney
Category: Mid-level, Technology
Group: Corporate Operations Group
Division: Technology
Recruiter: Chirag Bhojani
Opening Date: 15/2/2021
Today
Report job"
11,Commercial Analyst,Seven West Media,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"The Seven Network is part of Seven West Media, one of Australia’s most prominent media companies, with a market leading presence in content across broadcast television, online and in print. Comprising some of Australia’s most renowned media brands, SWM includes not just Seven Network and its affiliate channels 7two, 7mate, 7flix and BVOD offering 7plus, but also 7NEWS.com.au, The West Australian, The Sunday Times and more.
‘At Seven we are here to bring all Australians closer to the moments that move us - we’re first on the scene, with our finger on the pulse, on demand, in the moment. Together, we’re responsible for creating and sustaining authentic Australian engagement.’
A new and exciting opportunity has opened for a Commercial Analyst to join Seven’s Finance Team. As a Commercial Analyst, you will be responsible for business partnering, budgeting and forecasting, general ledger management, reconciliations and reporting for Seven’s Broadcast Operations group.
Based in Eveleigh and reporting to the Head of Finance - Digital & Broadcast Operations, you will:
Work with your business unit and management to provide insights and advice, training in finance systems and support with general enquiries
Preparation of month end journals, monthly financial reports, and variance analysis
Perform Balance Sheet account reconciliations, account analysis, accrual calculations, and other related accounting documents/schedules.
Planning and preparation of annual budgets and quarterly forecasts
Headcount reporting and reconciliation
Preparation of data for the capitalisation of fixed assets
Make recommendations for continuous improvements and efficient use of resources
Participate in Group Finance projects, and perform project tasks, as required
Ensure activities comply with legal, professional and ethical standards.
We are looking for someone who has:
Advanced data analysis and excel modelling skills
The ability to engage with key stakeholders to provide strategic guidance and support
Exceptional attention to detail
Knowledge of finance systems (preferably Technology One)
Able to work effectively within a team
Relevant tertiary qualifications.
CA/CPA qualified
Your success is our success: we will provide you with opportunities to keep learning and growing, enabling you to challenge and develop yourself. In return, we offer a benefits program that has something in it for everyone.
The Seven Network is an equal opportunity employer and we are committed to creating a diverse and inclusive workplace.
Recruitment Agencies: The Seven Network does not accept any unsolicited agency resumes and will not be responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.
Advertised: 10 Feb 2021 12:00 AM AUS Eastern Daylight Time
Applications close: 09 Mar 2021 11:55 PM AUS Eastern Daylight Time


Back to search results
6 days ago
Report job"
12,Data and Insights Analyst,Deakin University,"$81,274 a year",Melbourne VIC,"Job no: 506491
Work type: Full-time
Location: Melbourne - Burwood
Categories: Information Technology
A great opportunity to work in the Division of Student Administration (DSA) team and deliver expert technical analysis of data to inform key strategic and operational decisions.
Melbourne Burwood Campus
Full-time and continuing
HEW 6 $81,274 + 17% Superannuation
Student success is everyone’s business and all staff at Deakin can be a part of providing a successful student experience.
In the role of Data and Insights Analyst you will be providing quantitative reporting and analysis of Divisional data. You will be supporting the leadership team of the Division of Student Administration and Student Service Network, in shaping strategic frameworks that monitor Divisional services and performance, including student recruitment activities, customer service and other support services.
By leveraging your skills in data analysis and visualisation you will be responsible for designing and developing high impact reports and dashboards, to help form strategic decision. You will be able to influence stakeholders with the decision-making process by communicating key findings effectively through data visualisations and presentations. the language of data visualisations.
We are looking for a Data and Insights Analyst who loves data and the power of data to tell stories, to:
Contribute to the design, creation and maintenance of dashboards and regular reporting across multiple teams and systems
Combine, analyse and interpret data from multiple sources to reveal trends, patterns and insights
Communicate insights and findings in engaging and simple ways through presentations and visualisations
Work collaboratively to identify opportunities to influence change and contribute to the student experience at Deakin
To be successful, you will have:
Relevant degree, preferably in a quantitative or analytical discipline with subsequent relevant experience; or an equivalent combination of relevant experience and/or education/training.
A proven track record (minimum 3 years working experience) as a Data Analytics professional
Experience with large, complex datasets and great storytelling skills to communicate concepts and insights
Good relationship skills and the ability to work within a team as well as autonomously
Demonstrate a willingness to learn, share knowledge with team members and work in a collaborative environment

Applications for this position close on 21st February 2021.
Please submit your updated resume and a cover letter. In the cover letter (maximum two pages), please explain your interest in and suitability for the role, including examples demonstrating capability, your skills and your aspirations for the position.
For a confidential discussion regarding this position, please contact Carmen van den Bogaard, Manager, Performance Reporting and Analytics, on 9244 5449 or carmen.vandenbogaard@deakin.edu.au
This role requires the incumbent to apply for and maintain a Working With Children Check (refer to Deakin’s Recruitment Procedure for further details).
Are You Ready?
Deakin is a Victorian university with a global impact. We are an agile, dynamic and innovative university committed to making a positive impact through our excellence in education, research and innovation and the contributions we make to the wider community.
We understand that our reputation has been built on the dedication and expertise of our staff and we offer a dynamic and diverse working environment with opportunities to grow and develop careers. We believe that a progressive, thriving culture will ensure that people choose to come, and stay at Deakin and contribute to our ongoing success.
We value diversity and aim to build an inclusive environment that champions, embraces and respects differences. We support and encourage applications from Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander people, and people of all cultures, sexual orientation, and genders.

Advertised: 08 Feb 2021 AUS Eastern Daylight Time
8 days ago
Report job"
13,Insight Analyst,Retail Insight,Not shown,Chatswood NSW,"Do you want to be part of a growing global business? Would you like to solve real problems for some of the world's leading retail brands and be part of a supportive team of like-minded people? We're on a huge journey and we want you on onboard.
At Retail Insight our mission is to reinvent retail operations through advanced analytics, growing sales and profitability across the globe. To continue to do this and be the best we need more talented individuals to join our team.
A bit about the role:
The Insight Analyst at RI is responsible for developing a deep understanding of retail and the specific challenges we are addressing for our customers, from their data, through solution options to alignment to business processes and colleague execution. Your knowledge, fundamental understanding and application of our solution set, will enable you to support delivery, derive systemic insight and improve products, to ensure customer value is delivered and successful renewals achieved.
The Insight Analyst will join our existing Analysis team and will work closely with operational counterparts in Customer Relationship Management, Engineering and DevOps.
With an initial focus on our availability system, you'll be helping our customers identify salesability issues in their store, but also helping them identify ways to change the way they operate their business through data.
Here are some examples of what you might be doing:
Support the Customer, Customer Relationship Manager and Insight Manager to delight our client.
Become the expert on our customers data and value application of our solution output of our products
Work closely with the Engineering teams to problem solve, test system changes and hand over any system defects that need further investigation.
Leverage new and acquired knowledge of store operations through necessary in-store visits.
Ensure we proactively engage with our clients and continuously demonstrate the value of our products now and through recommendations for future improvements.
Develop your knowledge of the RI product set so you can be involved in the deployment of new and existing products to new markets and/or clients, including POC work, product demonstrations etc.
About you:
You love to collaborate and exchange ideas. You are a strong verbal and written communicator with the ability to collaborate with all departments. You have the ability to take, sometimes unfamiliar and complex datasets and tell a meaningful story of value creation through actionable insights. You thrive in working with cross functional teams and collaborating with others when needed.
You are able to proactively identify issues and opportunities and tackle them without being told to do so.
About your previous experience:
Experience in an analytical or data-orientated role and be able to demonstrate the value and commercial impact of your work.
Strong working knowledge and experience in SQL & Excel to an advanced level
Experience with data-centric scripting/programming languages (e.g. R & Python), and knowledge of BI and/or Data Visualisation software (e.g. Power BI) are both desirable, though not essential. However, a desire to learn new skills and techniques is an important part of this role.
Benefits and Perks:
RI is a fun and collaborative place to be, to support you at work and play we offer a number of things: flexible working options, an extra day of paid leave on your birthday, fortnightly team lunches, cinema clubs, an audible subscription, options to support your development and growth.
More about RI:
At Retail Insight, we have built a suite of innovative retail execution analytics products trusted by some of the world's leading retail and consumer goods companies including Walmart, Woolworths, Diageo and Danone.
We provide head office, stores and suppliers with data-driven insights that direct action and capture value. We specialise in-store and are at the cutting edge of retail analytics technology, helping identify drivers, and alerting to close, lost sales and lost profits from out-of-stocks, poor in-store execution, waste, markdown, and total loss.
If this sounds like you, we'd love to hear from you.
30+ days ago
Report job"
14,Reporting Analyst,Westpac Group,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"How will I help?
Westpac has commenced an enterprise-wide transformation to become one of the world’s great service companies, operating as a 21st Century Bank, with our customer capabilities digitised by a modernised technology architecture. The transformation aims to implement a ‘One Bank’ operating model. The Customer Service Hub (CSH) initiative is a key enabler of the transformation. The initial phases of CSH will provide enterprise wide platform capabilities for customer profiling and mastering, customer relationship management and end to end originations / servicing processing.
As the Reporting Analyst for CSH, you will be responsible for completing regular business operational and management reports and supporting program roll out and implementation. In addition, you will work closely with BAU reporting teams to support in reporting requirements until automated reporting is delivered. You will also conduct analysis of data to support business case measure and provide low level investigation where required to support trouble spots against CSH business case.
What’s in it for you?
You will build your profile internally with senior stakeholders and be part of the future of a business that has been around for 200 years. You'll be working for an organisation that supports development, internal career moves and flexible working (open to candidates-based interstate). Along with competitive salary, you’ll receive Westpac’s generous benefits and a whole array of customer discounts.
What do I need?
You will need to have experience in financial analysis, modelling and/or reporting and measurement and experience in development of reports from conception to delivery. You will be proficient in Excel and translating and analysing data and have strong presentation skills to high quality and speed. Prior experience as an analyst in in banking or home loan related focus desirable. Building strong relationships comes second nature to you; your excellent communication skills mean you thrive working in parallel with cross-functional teams.
What is it like to work there?
We aim to provide one big, supportive team to help us reach our vision to become one of the world’s great service companies. As an equal opportunity employer, we’re proud to have created a culture and work environment that values diversity and flexibility – and champions inclusion.
The health and wellbeing of our employees is our priority and we will ensure that physical distancing requirements are met in all our workplaces as long as required.

Brand : Westpac Group
Job : Finance and Accounting
Primary Location : AU-NSW-Sydney CBD
Employee Status : Permanent
Schedule : Full-time
Recruiter : Crystal Chan
Posting Date : 07/02/2021, 5:41:20 PM
Closing Date : 22/02/2021, 6:59:00 AM
8 days ago
Report job"
15,Reporting Analyst,Westpac Group,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"How will I help?
Westpac has commenced an enterprise-wide transformation to become one of the world’s great service companies, operating as a 21st Century Bank, with our customer capabilities digitised by a modernised technology architecture. The transformation aims to implement a ‘One Bank’ operating model. The Customer Service Hub (CSH) initiative is a key enabler of the transformation. The initial phases of CSH will provide enterprise wide platform capabilities for customer profiling and mastering, customer relationship management and end to end originations / servicing processing.
As the Reporting Analyst for CSH, you will be responsible for completing regular business operational and management reports and supporting program roll out and implementation. In addition, you will work closely with BAU reporting teams to support in reporting requirements until automated reporting is delivered. You will also conduct analysis of data to support business case measure and provide low level investigation where required to support trouble spots against CSH business case.
What’s in it for you?
You will build your profile internally with senior stakeholders and be part of the future of a business that has been around for 200 years. You'll be working for an organisation that supports development, internal career moves and flexible working (open to candidates-based interstate). Along with competitive salary, you’ll receive Westpac’s generous benefits and a whole array of customer discounts.
What do I need?
You will need to have experience in financial analysis, modelling and/or reporting and measurement and experience in development of reports from conception to delivery. You will be proficient in Excel and translating and analysing data and have strong presentation skills to high quality and speed. Prior experience as an analyst in in banking or home loan related focus desirable. Building strong relationships comes second nature to you; your excellent communication skills mean you thrive working in parallel with cross-functional teams.
What is it like to work there?
We aim to provide one big, supportive team to help us reach our vision to become one of the world’s great service companies. As an equal opportunity employer, we’re proud to have created a culture and work environment that values diversity and flexibility – and champions inclusion.
The health and wellbeing of our employees is our priority and we will ensure that physical distancing requirements are met in all our workplaces as long as required.

Brand : Westpac Group
Job : Finance and Accounting
Primary Location : AU-NSW-Sydney CBD
Employee Status : Permanent
Schedule : Full-time
Recruiter : Crystal Chan
Posting Date : 07/02/2021, 5:41:20 PM
Closing Date : 22/02/2021, 6:59:00 AM
8 days ago
Report job"
16,Junior Business Analyst - Salary up to $106k inc super,Capgemini Australia,"$106,000 a year",Sydney NSW,"The speed of change is throwing traditional business methods into question and disrupting the relevance of entire industries. Capgemini, a global leader in consulting, digital transformation, technology and engineering services, is at the forefront of innovation and well placed to address opportunities for our clients in the evolving world of cloud, digital and platforms. Building on its strong 50-year heritage and deep industry-specific expertise, Capgemini enables organisations to realise their business ambitions through an array of services from strategy to operations. Capgemini is driven by the conviction that the business value of technology comes from and through people. Today, it is a multicultural company with over 270,000 team members in almost 50 countries. With Altran, the Group reported 2019 combined revenues of EUR 17 billion. Learn more about us at www.capgemini.com.

Let's talk about the team:
We are expecting significant growth this year in all Service Lines and invite expressions of interest for the role of Junior Business Analyst

Let's talk about the role and responsibilities:
Conducting a detailed business analysis, outlining problems, opportunities and solutions for a business.
Understanding the life cycle of various processes within business and support teams and performing an impact analysis on various systems, data and processes involved.
Modelling business processes and identifying opportunities for process improvements.
Creating process documents for newly implemented process and conducting a training session for operational users.
Maintaining reporting dashboards for various business processes, presenting the dashboards to key stakeholders.
Support business team's data requirements in their business initiatives.
Understanding end-to-end processes, while performing specific support tasks.
Let's talk about your qualifications and experience:
5 years experience working as a Business Analyst
Experience across enterprise delivery, release process, risk engagement, change management etc
Experience with the Atlassian suite (Jira + Confluence)
Business process and work instructions documentation experience
Effective Stakeholder Management, Critical Thinking, Problem Solving, Decision Making, Documentation & Writing Skills, Confident Presenter
Experience writing user stories, defining acceptance criteria and working closely with engineers and testers to ensure a quality outcome
Let's talk about what's in it for you!
Passionate people are Capgemini's Ace of Spades - join us to discover a career that will challenge, support and inspire you. Working at Capgemini you'll find the rewards are more than just financial. You will work alongside some very smart and inspiring people on exciting projects and you will also enjoy incredible benefits. We offer flexible work practices and 40 hours of self-development every year with a huge selection of learning opportunities to choose from.
As ""Architects of Positive Futures"", Capgemini actively supports the community in 3 ways:
Diversity and Inclusion - we believe diversity of thought fuels excellence and innovation, which is why we positively encourage applications from suitably qualified candidates regardless of their gender identity, ethnicity, sexual orientation, religion, ability, intersex status or age. To support our commitment to diversity and inclusion, we celebrate special events and days of significance that are important to our employees such as Diwali, Bastille Day, Pride, IDAHOBIT, IWD and International day of people with Disabilities. Our Employee Resource Groups Women@Capgemini and OutFront support the grassroots passion of employees to drive our diversity agenda and effect change.
Digital inclusion - at Capgemini we are using our skills to drive social impact initiatives focusing on helping society address the impact of the digital and automation revolution. We also provide employees with opportunities to give back to the community through charity projects and volunteer days.
Environmental Sustainability - Capgemini joined the CDP's (Carbon Disclosure Project) prestigious ""A list"" for its commitment to the Net-Zero economy. We are focusing on helping our clients transform towards more sustainable business models and committing to reduce our own carbon emissions (GHG) by 20% per employee by 2020.
Recognised by Ethisphere as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies for the last 8 years in a row, ethics and values are at the heart of Capgemini's corporate culture and business. Embedded in our DNA, our seven values - Honesty, Boldness, Trust, Team Spirit, Freedom, Fun and Modesty - have remained the same since company inception in 1967. To see how we bring these values to life, click here to listen to some of our employee's stories.
Come join us, bring your whole self to work, create new possibilities for you, your customers and your community and help us to be Architects of Positive Futures.

Please note unsolicited resumes from employment agencies or other third parties will not be considered.

#LI-DL1
5 days ago
Report job"
17,Senior ETL Data Analyst,Cognizant,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Position Summary:
ETL Data Analyst proficient in analyzing, interrogating and modelling complex data at an enterprise scale.
As an ETL Analyst, the candidate should have a good understanding of Data warehousing and have hands-on on Oracle, Teradata and Mainframe expertise.
Hands-on SQL knowledge and should be able to write complex queries.
Experience in working with Bigdata platforms and with various utilities like Hive, spark, pig, scala, impala, kafka
Demonstrated experience in gathering and documenting data requirements, data migration business rules and development of complex data maps.
Mandatory Skills:
The candidate should have expertise in various ETL tools and experience in data analysis of critical business data coming from different source systems.
He/She should also be able to remediate any data related issues in large and complex datawarehouse applications and provide necessary insight for key business decisions.
Candidate should have expertise on SQL server and Oracle databases and Power BI based applications
Knowledge of source control such as Git, Bitbucket
Knowledge of Unix system and IBM QuerySurge testing tool.
Strong understanding of various custom and industry standard data warehouse applications used large enterprise environments.
Ability to effectively communicate and present to all stakeholders (translate technical requirements into non-technical and vice versa).
Duties and Responsibilities:
The candidate should have experience in release management and deployment activities, incident management, capacity management for datawarehouse applications.
The requirement is for a client facing position that requires the candidate to be able to work independently at client site and work within stringent timelines ensuring organizational standard of efficiency and quality.
Candidate will have strong documentation skills and translate technical documentation.
An understanding and working experience in reporting & data visualization techniques and tools such as Business Objects, PowerBI.
He/She should have Excellent analytical skills - the ability to identify trends, patterns and insights from data.
He/she should have Presentation skills – ability to write and easily communicate complex ideas in a way that is easy to understand.
Perform statistical and forensic analysis.
Should be both an individual contributor and a team player.
He has experience in working on Agile and Waterfall project models
Salary Range: AUD >80,000

#LI-CTSAPAC
Employee Status : Full Time Employee
Shift : Day Job
Travel : No
Job Posting : Feb 16 2021
About Cognizant
Cognizant (Nasdaq-100: CTSH) is one of the world's leading professional services companies, transforming clients' business, operating and technology models for the digital era. Our unique industry-based, consultative approach helps clients envision, build and run more innovative and efficient businesses. Headquartered in the U.S., Cognizant is ranked 194 on the Fortune 500 and is consistently listed among the most admired companies in the world.
Today
Report job"
18,"Investment Bank - Fixed Income & Currencies: Sales, Trading and Structuring Graduate - Analyst",Deutsche Bank,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Details of the Division and Team:
Deutsche Bank is the leading German bank with strong European roots and a global network. We’re driving growth through our strong client franchise. Against a backdrop of increasing globalization in the world economy, Deutsche Bank is very well-positioned, with significant regional diversification and substantial revenue streams from all the major regions of the world. We serve our clients’ real economic needs in commercial banking, investment banking, private banking and asset management. We are investing heavily in digital technologies, prioritizing long term success over short-term gains, and serving society with ambition and integrity. All this means a career packed with opportunities to grow and the chance to shape the future of our clients.
The Deutsche Bank Graduate Programme:
From the day you join Deutsche Bank, you’ll be working as part of a global team that is transforming the world of banking. Our development programme offers extensive training, exposure to stimulating projects, and the opportunity to gain the knowledge and skills you need to provide innovative products and services to our clients. You’ll work alongside some of the industry’s top minds and build a valuable network that will support you as you progress in your career. You’ll be given various opportunities to not only have your opinions heard, but also get to make an impact at our company and for our clients. If you have the drive to succeed in the fast-paced financial services industry, Deutsche Bank is an exciting, supportive place for you to begin your career.
About the business division:
Fixed Income & Currencies (FIC) brings together a top-ranked institutional sales force, world-class research and trading expertise across Foreign Exchange, Rates, Credit and Emerging Markets. The Fixed Income & Currencies business enables Deutsche Bank to respond to increasing automation, regulatory expectations and client demand for standardization and transparency in execution across fixed income, currency and emerging markets.
Foreign Exchange
Deutsche Bank is an industry recognised leader in the foreign exchange business. Our client centric approach helps us to serve the needs of our customers across the full product spectrum from basic liquidity provision in the spot market to innovative derivative solutions for both asset and liability managers.
Rates
Deutsche Bank’s Rates business provides a comprehensive range of fixed income securities and OTC derivatives. We give clients access to the Bank’s liquidity and product expertise through our global sales and trading teams, as well as our electronic trading channels and clearing offering. Our product range includes Government, Agency and Mortgage-Backed Securities (MBS) as well as a suite of interest rate and inflation derivative products.
Credit
Deutsche Bank’s global Credit trading business enables clients to meet their investment objectives and manage credit risk. With industry-leading expertise in market-making and credit valuation, we offer clients a wide range of products across Flow Credit, Distressed Products and Structured Finance Trading. Products traded include bonds, loans and claims, ranging from the strongest investment grade issuers through high yield to distressed assets. Our Structured Finance experts provide structured risk and non-flow financing solutions for clients across multiple industries and asset classes.
What we will offer you:
A healthy, engaged and well-supported workforce are better equipped to do their best work and, more importantly, enjoy their lives inside and outside the workplace. That’s why we are committed to providing an environment with your development and well-being at its center.
You can expect:
Competitive Salary and non-contributory pension
Competitive salary as well as pension, insurance contributions and salary packaging
4 weeks annual leave, plus additional and wellbeing leave
Parental leave benefits including Childcare Assistance Payment
A range of flexible benefits including the Online discount program, employee referral program,
Your key responsibilities:
Upon joining the Bank you will begin your learning journey with our global orientation, followed by professional skills training and technical financial training.
During your first year with us you will benefit from a graduate learning journey, comprising both technical and professional skills training, further enhancing your learning experience.
Your day-to-day tasks will vary depending on your role and the desk you’re working on. In FIC you might be pricing products for traders, preparing financial data analysis, examining market trends or assisting in the origination, structuring and execution of transactions.
You will learn from the best, evolve professionally as well as personally, and build a firm foundation upon which to specialize later.
Whichever path you take, by the end of your programme you’ll have the skills and experience to launch a long-term career with us as a salesperson, trader or structurer.
Your skills and experience:
We recruit highly intelligent graduates who are ambitious and adaptable. They have degrees in many different disciplines. Even though good levels of numeracy are important for some roles, you won’t necessarily need a formal mathematical or financial background. We have very comprehensive training programmes that will give you all the technical knowledge you’ll need to build a career with us. Above all, we’re looking for entrepreneurial people who thrive best in a diverse culture where innovation and agile thinking abound.You should not only be passionate about the world of finance, but also show a keen interest in your chosen field. You already have a record of outstanding academic achievement and you’re eager to go on learning at the same intensive rate. So you’ll thrive on working in a highly collaborative environment with some of the best minds in banking.
How we’ll support you:
Flexible working to assist you balance your personal priorities
Coaching and support from experts in your team
A culture of continuous learning to aid progression
A range of flexible benefits that you can tailor to suit your needs
Training and development to help you excel in your career
About us and our teams:
Deutsche Bank is the leading German bank with strong European roots and a global network. Click here to see what we do.
Deutsche Bank & Diversity
Our values define the working environment we strive to create – diverse, supportive and welcoming of different views. We embrace a culture reflecting a variety of perspectives, insights and backgrounds to drive innovation. We build talented and diverse teams to drive business results and encourage our people to develop to their full potential. Talk to us about flexible work arrangements and other initiatives we offer.
We promote good working relationships and encourage high standards of conduct and work performance. We welcome applications from talented people from all cultures, countries, races, genders, sexual orientations, disabilities, beliefs and generations and are committed to providing a working environment free from harassment, discrimination and retaliation.
20 days ago
Report job"
19,Technical Business Analyst - Data Delivery,Hays,Not shown,Sydney Central Business District NSW,"Permanent opportunity for a Technical BA to work in a Big 4 Bank!

Your new company
One of the largest financial services providers in Sydney, which offers multiple products across the domestic market, is looking to recruit a Technical Business Analyst to be part of their Group-wide Technology and Data team. Its purpose is to provide Data Delivery to multiple simultaneous projects in different areas and businesses of the bank.


Your new role
You will work closely with the data delivery team to deploy data management enablement tools and provide support to the different portfolios, while acting as a bridge between the technical teams and the business to facilitate accurate and appropriate decisions being made. You will be working together with stakeholders to understand their needs and concerns and document the current and proposed state in order to identify improvements and develop requirements.


What you'll need to succeed
Strong data analysis experience
Strong SQL skills
Financial Services background
Experience with Big data platforms
Experience engaging with the business side and working with different stakeholders
Previous experience working in data migration or separation projects will be highly regarded
Swift system knowledge will be highly regarded



What you'll get in return
You will receive a competitive salary and work as a permanent employee for a leading Financial Services organization. You'll be offered flexible working arrangements and exciting career progression opportunities, while working in an ideal Sydney CBD location!


What you need to do now
If you're interested in this role, click 'apply now' to forward an up-to-date copy of your CV, or send it to lucia.turner@hays.com.au.
If this job isn't quite right for you but you are looking for a new position, please contact us for a confidential discussion on your career.

SA Licence number : LHS 297508
18 days ago
Report job"
20,Master Data Analyst,Danone,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Danone is looking for a Master Data Analyst to ensure data quality, compliance and operating procedures with previous experience working with SAP.

At Danone, we believe that data driven decisions are the foundation of sustainable business growth. We have an exciting opportunity for a Master Data Analyst to join our SUPPLY CHAIN TEAM. You will thrive working independently in an entrepreneurial environment, enjoy translating actionable data insights to drive profitable growth.
Your responsibilities will include (but are not limited to):
Execute changes to SAP master data (e.g. Customer, Vendor, Materials, Pricing etc.) as approved by the business as well as master data set up, validations and periodic maintenance.
Perform regular business-related activities such as price and contracts updates, approval schemes and mass updates as well as troubleshooting to resolve any master data issues.
Participate in projects, new product developments and initiatives across multiple functional areas and regions.
Ensure data quality, compliance and consistency of master data across business systems.
Assist business process experts in defining standard operating procedures, process flows and related documentation
Perform monthly reporting for Quality checks and Audit purposes.
ABOUT YOU:
Working closely with Finance & Supply Chain team, you will ensure data quality, compliance and operating procedures. You will have demonstrable experience managing a SAP system and feel confident interpreting data to provide valuable insights to the business.
Ideally you will have:
Preferable previous background working in FMCG industry or Pharmaceutical industry
Mandatory Previous knowledge of SAP at User/Master Data Management level
Strong MS Excel skills
Process driven and accountable with the ability to work in an agile way to meet deadlines and manage project pieces of work
Set up processes

ABOUT US
Danone’s mission is Bringing health through food to as many people as possible and we want to invite people to join the movement for a healthier world. We recognize the power people have to impact the world through their daily choices. Each time we eat and drink, we vote for the world we want to live in. We believe a healthy body needs healthy food. And healthy food needs a healthy planet and this is what our new signature One Planet One Health embodies. (LINK TO YOUTUBE VIDEO: https://youtu.be/0wBhigOz_ic)
WE OFFER
If you would love to join a global company with a strong health mission who is committed to world class customer service, then we can offer you:
A great working environment
A strong competitive remuneration
Opportunity to grow and learn new skills
We believe everyone has talent, something which comes natural to you. Your uniqueness is something which brings both excellence as well as energises you.
HOW TO APPLY
If this sounds like the perfect opportunity for you to really make this role your own, please hit the APPLY button.
**Due to high volume of applicants, only selected candidates will be contacted following the closing date.
**You must hold valid working rights to be considered for this role.
13 days ago
Report job"
21,Analyst,IQVIA,Not shown,St Leonards NSW,"We currently have an exciting opportunity available for an Analyst to be part of IQVIA’s ChannelDynamics team to cover a maternity leave contract until the end of 2021.
ChannelDynamics is a syndicated solution that tracks the marketing and sales force activity of pharmaceutical products to healthcare professionals. It provides the industry with competitive benchmarking and global market insights from 36 countries including Australia and New Zealand. We work closely with multiple clients across marketing, brand and sales teams and help inform their commercial strategy pre, during and post product launch.
This role will suit someone seeking rapid development curve and plenty of client interactions – keenness to learn, strong analytical as well communication skills and a genuine interest in data analytics are required. As an Analyst within IQVIA’s ChannelDynamics Team, you will be responsible for:
Leveraging the ChannelDynamics syndicated data set to help address key client issues
Analysing and translating data into meaningful insights
Taking responsibility for running monthly market trend reports e.g. share of voice and liaising with clients about any questions or updates with these reports
Assisting in the development of pitch presentations and client workshops, under supervision
Presenting to client audiences via teleconference or in face-to-face meetings
Working closely with the Commercial Lead and contributing to internal brainstorming sessions to identify further market opportunities
Acquiring deep knowledge of the healthcare industry, ChannelDynamics and other IQVIA data assets to work effectively with clients
About you:
As an Analyst interested in joining IQVIA, you will have proven analytical, interpretative and problem-solving skills. Other required skills will include:
Ideally between 2-3 years professional experience with a bachelor’s degree in a relevant field (Life Sciences, Data Science, Mathematics/Statistics etc.)
Foundational technical skills are essential; proficient in using Microsoft software tools (Excel, PowerPoint); experience with statistical tools e.g. SPSS, Q, Tableau would be advantageous
Well-developed written and verbal communication skills
Knowledge of / an avid interest to know more about key issues and current developments in the healthcare industry and pharmaceutical promotion
Strong capability in juggling priorities to meet deadlines while retaining consistently high quality outcomes
Adaptability and an ability to learn quickly and apply new knowledge and thinking
Must enjoy analysing and visualising data
At IQVIA, we believe in pushing the boundaries of human science and data science to make the biggest impact possible – to help our customers create a healthier world. The advanced analytics, technology solutions and contract research services we provide to the life sciences industry are made possible by our 67,000+ employees around the world who apply their insight, curiosity and intellectual courage every step of the way. Learn more at jobs.iqvia.com.
1 day ago
Report job"
22,Data Analyst - Remediation,T+O+M Executive,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"In this particular role you will be working in a project where a changing regulatory environment has driven the need for a more robust management of client data, which will in turn drive the commercial success of the business.
You will be working in a dedicated Analytics team developing new data sets through the complex extraction and manipulation (SQL) of the relevant data from the group systems (Teradata) and it's analysis using SAS.
You will work directly with the business and product teams to define the client base with the customers experience and satisfaction being at the centre of all decision making.
To be considered for this role you will need:
Advanced knowledge of SAS and SQL (data extraction and manipulation)
Experience with relational database such as Teradata and SQL Server
A critical thinker with an eye for detail
Ability to work to tight deadlines and short turnaround times
Experience within banking products highly desirable
Ability to elicit requirements from a various stakeholders and to distinguish between requests and underlying needs
Ability to work with large and complex data from a variety of sources across numerous database platforms.
If you're interested in being considered for this newly establish and growing team, please send your resume to nicolina.bosnic@tomexecutive.com for consideration.

PLEASE NOTE ONLY SUCCESSFUL CANDIDATES WILL BE CONTACTED.
1 day ago
Report job"
23,Data and Business Analyst,SoftLabs Pty Ltd,$800 - $900 a day,Canberra ACT,"Data and Business Analyst
12 month contract with possible extension
Canberra based
Australian Citizen or Ability to obtain baseline security clearance required
About SoftLabs
SoftLabs is an Australian based Digital Technology Company specialised in Technology consulting, project management, software development, testing, training and support services. We offer a wide range of ICT Services, quality of resources and wider delivery capabilities.
About the Role
As an experienced Data and Business Analyst, you will help deliver strategic business transformation. You will bring demonstrated experience and understanding of service delivery functions and processes and be able to apply industry standard business analysis processes, tools and methodologies. You will adapt quickly and add value by engaging with business users and colleagues and delivering a range of high quality work artefacts.
Experience and Skills:
Demonstrated ability to analyse business requirements and existing business outputs to inform and develop information architectures, data schemas and data dictionaries to achieve business outcomes
Proven experience in developing information architectures and incorporating information capture into business processes to answer complex business and policy questions
Undertake Interpretation and translation of business requirements into viable business solutions; and
Lead workshops and engagements with business stakeholders to elicit, capture and document business processes, requirements, rules and acceptance criteria
Desirable Skills:
Experience leading business analysis using Agile Scrum and Kanban methodology.
Excellent documentation and estimation skills.
Proven ability to create productive working relationships.
Strong team collaboration and working relationship skills.
If you are interested in this position, please click Apply and your details will be sent through to us for review. If you wish to have a confidential discussion call us on 02 9158 1270 or call Nikki 0482 693 975 for more information.
Application Deadline: 03/02/2021
Expected Start Date: 18/02/2021
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Salary: $800.00 – $900.00 per day
Work Eligibility:
Permitted to work permanently with no restriction on hours (e.g. citizen, permanent resident) (Required)
18 days ago
Report job"
24,Business Analyst Facilities,Corporate Services,"$103,965 - $116,441 a year",Sydney NSW,"About us?
?
Over the next 40 years, Sydney’s population is projected to swell to over 12 million residents and regional NSW will accommodate an extra 700,000 people.?Transport for NSW is delivering an unprecedented $72.2b investment?into a truly game changing Future Transport strategy which will bring together several?modes and?cutting edge?technologies?to?deliver satisfaction and safety for our customers while supporting a rapidly growing economy.???
?

The Division

Corporate Services provides sustainable strategies, solutions and services to enable our clients to deliver with confidence Transport's vision. Providing a robust to commercial management, ensuring financial sustainability across the cluster and driving strategic projects, procurement and transformation through the provision of corporate services to internal clients.
?

The opportunity
?
We are currently recruiting for a Business Analyst - Facilities to join the Asset and Workplace Services team within Corporate Services.

You will be responsible for providing data, analysis, and reporting, as well as preparation of business cases and presentation packs that are useful in developing initiatives for service improvement, tracking key metrics and informing decision making across the branch.

Establish systems and processes to provide the branch dashboard reporting to ensure performance indicators and targets can be accurately measured and monitored.
Probe information systems to establish information sources and provide nonstandard data extraction, modelling, and the development of high-quality custom reports.
Identify gaps in the availability of information across a variety of internal and third-party systems and participate in the development of strategies to solve the problem.
Assist with the development of business cases and improvement initiatives by providing and analysing data and preparing high-quality presentation packs.
?

About You:

We are looking for someone who has a the ability to create innovative and practical ways to analyse available information. You will have experience using tableau, excel, work processing and other data visualisation applications to present data in a clear and impactful way.

You will have demonstrated knowledge and experience working with a variety of systems and deliver quality data manipulation, analytics and modelling with a broad understanding of Facilities Management Services.

This role will require a security clearance and criminal clearance prior to appointment.

How to apply

To apply for this position, please submit your resume and respond to the questions that are asked as part of the online application process.

This position will be recruited through a gated process, whilst we welcome all applications, they will be assessed based on priority.

TfNSW permanent employees in the Asset and Workplace Services and notified TSS effected staff.
All other TfNSW permanent employees and external applicants.

Salary and Benefits

The salary for this position is Grade 7 ($103,965 - $116,441) per annum plus superannuation and leave loading.

Our Commitment to Diversity

Great people come from all walks of life. At Transport for NSW, we are committed to creating a diverse, inclusive and flexible workforce which reflects the community and the customers we serve.
We welcome and encourage applications from all people regardless of age, gender, ethnicity, cultural background, or sexual orientation.

For any enquiries, please email Cassandra Grosso on Cassandra.grosso@transport.nsw.gov.au

Applications close: Sunday the 28th of February 2021 at 11:59pm
NSW Public Service Commission
1 day ago
Report job"
25,Data Analyst,TP human capital,Not shown,Townsville QLD,"TP Human Capital is currently recruiting for Data Analyst to work with our large, locally based Townsville client in a temporary opportunity.
The Role:
Experience in data analysis, modelling and visualisation using a variety of systems and software
Ability to interpret, apply and communicate, both written and verbal, scientific information to a wide audience
Experience working with contemporary statistical computing and graphics programming systems e.g. R (including CRAN and RMark)
Experience with statistical analyses including non-parametric regression modelling, Bayesian modelling, capture-mark-recapture analysis, Kernel estimation of home ranges, and estimating population density and trajectories in data sparse environments
Experience working on industry relational databases (e.g. PostgreSQL, Microsoft SQL & Oracle)
Experience with contemporary data analytics platforms (e.g. PowerBI, Crystal Reports, Business Objects, Cognos or Tableau)
Be able to travel from time to time for multiple nights, including flying in small aircraft
The Person:
Qualifications in relevant field
Demonstrated experience working with contemporary GIS platforms (e.g. ArcGIS, Google Earth)
Understanding of web development environments such as html5, java, json, .NET
Applications: To apply for this position please click “Apply Now” below.
5 days ago
Report job"
26,"2021 Census Data Analysts (APS5), 2021 Census of Population and Housing",Australian Bureau of Statistics,"$73,725 - $82,812 a year",Belconnen ACT,"Classification: APS5
Temporary, full-time position
$73,725 – $82,812 per annum (plus 15.4% superannuation and allowances)


The Australian Bureau of Statistics (ABS) 2021 Census of Population and Housing is currently seeking Data Analyst at an APS5 classification to join our 2021 Census Data Coding section.

These are full-time, temporary positions, located in Belconnen, Canberra.

About the 2021 Census of Population and Housing:

The Census of Population and Housing (Census) is run every five years and is one of the largest and important collections to count the number of people and houses in Australia. The Census collects information about where we live, age, our culture, religion, income, education, living and housing arrangements. The information is used to make important decisions, such as government funding, input into policy-making and electoral boundaries.

About the roles:

The 2021 Census Data Coding section is responsible for transforming information provided by respondents on the Census form into statistical data. This includes the classification of responses to topics such as occupation, language and religion.

We are looking to fill multiple Census Data Analyst APS5 roles and staff will be expected to become data specialists in their topic. Responsibilities include:
The use of various data interrogation tools to monitor accuracy of coding operations.
Training and workload management of temporary coding staff.
Management of indexes and classifications relating to various Census topics.
Maintaining productive working relationships within Census Data Coding and with quality assurance areas.

Note: ABS employees who have access to market sensitive information are restricted in market trading activities. You may not be allowed to trade in financial products while employed.

Your qualities, experiences and skills

To be suitable you should have most of or all the following skills, qualities and experience:


Ability to build and sustain positive relationships with team members, stakeholders and clients
Work under pressure and meet strict deadlines
Enthusiasm and ability to work collaboratively in a fast-paced environment, responding positively to change and uncertainty
Identify and resolve potentially sensitive issues and make decisions based on sound subject matter and professional judgement.
Well developed communication, interpersonal and negotiation skills.
Established skills in objective, systematic analysis and data interrogation, and ability to draw accurate conclusions based on evidence.
Experience in data analysis tools such as Excel, SAS, SQL and PowerBI is desirable, but not essential.

If found suitable but not offered a role you will be placed in the merit pool. If you agree in your application this means you may be offered a similar role in the ABS or another APS agency.
2 days ago
Report job"
27,Senior Analyst - Business Data Reporting,Australian Prudential Regulation Authority (APRA),Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Be part of an organisation that protects the financial wellbeing of the Australian community
Contribute to enhancing transparency in the financial industry
Enjoy varied, challenging work and expand your knowledge into new areas, as you join a team with unique insight into the industry
Opportunity for flexible working arrangements in a workplace that values diversity, inclusion and work/life balance
APRA has an opportunity for a Senior Analyst to join our Business Data Reporting (BDR) team within the Data Analytics & Insights business unit. In this role you will contribute to the redesign of APRA's internal reporting suite as APRA delivers a multi-year project to transform our data-enabled decision making.
The BDR team is responsible for the dissemination of data within APRA via interactive visualisations and dashboards, supporting our people in making decisions underpinned by easily accessible data.
The role will touch on multiple aspects of the internal report generation cycle. You will:
Gather complex reporting requirements and deliver targeted, clear and impactful data visualisations to facilitate data-enabled decision making
Create and build reports using Power BI, including creating calculations using DAX, transforming and modelling data from SSAS cubes and the data warehouse, designing visualisations that best support a smooth workflow and gathering of insights
Work with IT developers to provide requirements for how the data is structured in SSAS cubes and the data warehouse to best support its use in reports
Work with IT testers to determine test scope, approach and test cases when testing reports and calculations
Support users in the use of Power BI to consume and build reports, including providing training
Provide guidance on best practice in terms of report design and building in Power BI
Provide input on data collection and taxonomy design to facilitate report building and data querying
Demonstrated experience in in building flexible but targeted data and reporting solutions, along with producing and reviewing conceptual and logical Power BI / SSAS data models is essential for this role. The successful candidate will have the ability to manage the needs and expectations of a variety of stakeholders. You will have highly developed written and verbal communication skills, along with excellent attention to detail.
Australian Prudential Regulation Authority (APRA)
Today
Report job"
28,"Reporting Analyst, RPO",KORNFERRY,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Req Number:
KFINT16750

Location:
SYDNEY, New South Wales

Posted:
1/25/2021

Category:
SOLUTIONS

Job Type:
Permanent
About us
At Korn Ferry we are passionate about what we do, the value we bring to our clients and the careers we provide our people. We pride ourselves on high quality execution, encourage a culture of ongoing career development and recognise performance and commitment.
As the global industry leader in high-impact recruitment solutions, we offer fully customised, flexible services to help our clients meet their talent and recruitment needs. Our focus on unlocking IP, relationships within the broader Korn Ferry group, the calibre of people and delivering excellence, helps to provide a compelling and competitive proposition.
Korn Ferry provides its employees with a truly global opportunity to work with the best clients, as well as the best tools, technologies and expertise in the industry.
What's on offer
We have an exciting opportunity for a Reporting Analyst to join Korn Ferry RPO team. This role will allow you to showcase your analytics and reporting skills, as you take responsibility for a portfolio of key clients. You be responsible for building and supporting reporting development, producing scheduled and ad hoc reports and performance dashboards.
You will work with our onsite RPO teams and stakeholders, to support client reporting and data requirements, workforce planning and account management.
This is an excellent opportunity for someone with a demonstrated experience and a passion for gathering information from various sources and tools, transforming the information and effectively presenting to key stakeholders. The role offers the opportunity to expand your knowledge, as well as diversity and agility as you work across various accounts and industries.
Experience
To be successful in this role, you will enjoy collaborating with teams across the business to seek information. You will enjoy working within a busy, fast-paced environment and will be action-oriented with have high levels of motivation and attention to detail.
If you’re an expert at multitasking, working to tight timeframes and enjoy taking accountability for your work, then you will thrive in this role. Equally, you will be someone who deals well with ambiguity, isn’t afraid to try new things and has a solution focus to problem solving.
In addition, you will have:
demonstratable experience working in a hands-on data or reporting role
excellent data visualization capability and ability to translate business requirements into dashboards that are easy to read and interpret preferably with PowerBI
extensive Excel skills including building macros, VBA, pivot tables
Experience presenting reports and data to key stakeholders would be highly advantageous, as would previous experience in a reporting analyst role within recruitment and HR.
The role can be based in Sydney or Melbourne.
Next steps
If you would like to play a role in shaping our clients vision, whilst building a career with Korn Ferry, get in touch today!
If you currently work for Korn Ferry or one of our affiliates, you must be eligible to apply for a different position within Korn Ferry to use the Careers Site. If you accept such a position, your benefits programs and Human Resources policies may change. Please consult with your HR contact for the new position concerning application eligibility, benefit programs, and HR policies applicable to that position.
22 days ago
Report job"
29,New graduate job: Spatial Data Analyst,Ever Better Recruitment (EBR),Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Summary
As a Spatial Data Analyst, you will be undertaking the acquisition, analysis, interpretation, manipulation, and dissemination of vehicle, driver shift, spatial and other bus service data to support network systems and public transport customer information products.
This role needs you to
Use planning, scheduling and statistical softwares to report on service performance, customer feedback and demographic trends
Ensure quality and integrity of customer data
Ensure accurate transport data from data suppliers to support customer in a required time frame
Be responsible for service planning, timetable specification, and demand analysis
Respond to operator proposals in a timely manner
Utilise analytical tools to capture, manipulate, format and report exports to improve bus operational systems
Establish and manage strong working relationships with transport operators, data suppliers and key internal business areas to ensure the timely capture and update of accurate information

This is a unique position within the GIS industry with exciting opportunities! Apply NOW!

Our agency guarantees that all applications made to our advertised positions are 100% confidential. Applicant resumes will not be passed onto a 3rd party without your prior consent.

jobref: MSPD1907-002NGJSDA
30+ days ago
Report job"
0,Senior ETL Data Analyst,Cognizant,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Position Summary:
ETL Data Analyst proficient in analyzing, interrogating and modelling complex data at an enterprise scale.
As an ETL Analyst, the candidate should have a good understanding of Data warehousing and have hands-on on Oracle, Teradata and Mainframe expertise.
Hands-on SQL knowledge and should be able to write complex queries.
Experience in working with Bigdata platforms and with various utilities like Hive, spark, pig, scala, impala, kafka
Demonstrated experience in gathering and documenting data requirements, data migration business rules and development of complex data maps.
Mandatory Skills:
The candidate should have expertise in various ETL tools and experience in data analysis of critical business data coming from different source systems.
He/She should also be able to remediate any data related issues in large and complex datawarehouse applications and provide necessary insight for key business decisions.
Candidate should have expertise on SQL server and Oracle databases and Power BI based applications
Knowledge of source control such as Git, Bitbucket
Knowledge of Unix system and IBM QuerySurge testing tool.
Strong understanding of various custom and industry standard data warehouse applications used large enterprise environments.
Ability to effectively communicate and present to all stakeholders (translate technical requirements into non-technical and vice versa).
Duties and Responsibilities:
The candidate should have experience in release management and deployment activities, incident management, capacity management for datawarehouse applications.
The requirement is for a client facing position that requires the candidate to be able to work independently at client site and work within stringent timelines ensuring organizational standard of efficiency and quality.
Candidate will have strong documentation skills and translate technical documentation.
An understanding and working experience in reporting & data visualization techniques and tools such as Business Objects, PowerBI.
He/She should have Excellent analytical skills - the ability to identify trends, patterns and insights from data.
He/she should have Presentation skills – ability to write and easily communicate complex ideas in a way that is easy to understand.
Perform statistical and forensic analysis.
Should be both an individual contributor and a team player.
He has experience in working on Agile and Waterfall project models
Salary Range: AUD >80,000

#LI-CTSAPAC
Employee Status : Full Time Employee
Shift : Day Job
Travel : No
Job Posting : Feb 16 2021
About Cognizant
Cognizant (Nasdaq-100: CTSH) is one of the world's leading professional services companies, transforming clients' business, operating and technology models for the digital era. Our unique industry-based, consultative approach helps clients envision, build and run more innovative and efficient businesses. Headquartered in the U.S., Cognizant is ranked 194 on the Fortune 500 and is consistently listed among the most admired companies in the world.
Today
Report job"
1,"Investment Bank - Fixed Income & Currencies: Sales, Trading and Structuring Graduate - Analyst",Deutsche Bank,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Details of the Division and Team:
Deutsche Bank is the leading German bank with strong European roots and a global network. We’re driving growth through our strong client franchise. Against a backdrop of increasing globalization in the world economy, Deutsche Bank is very well-positioned, with significant regional diversification and substantial revenue streams from all the major regions of the world. We serve our clients’ real economic needs in commercial banking, investment banking, private banking and asset management. We are investing heavily in digital technologies, prioritizing long term success over short-term gains, and serving society with ambition and integrity. All this means a career packed with opportunities to grow and the chance to shape the future of our clients.
The Deutsche Bank Graduate Programme:
From the day you join Deutsche Bank, you’ll be working as part of a global team that is transforming the world of banking. Our development programme offers extensive training, exposure to stimulating projects, and the opportunity to gain the knowledge and skills you need to provide innovative products and services to our clients. You’ll work alongside some of the industry’s top minds and build a valuable network that will support you as you progress in your career. You’ll be given various opportunities to not only have your opinions heard, but also get to make an impact at our company and for our clients. If you have the drive to succeed in the fast-paced financial services industry, Deutsche Bank is an exciting, supportive place for you to begin your career.
About the business division:
Fixed Income & Currencies (FIC) brings together a top-ranked institutional sales force, world-class research and trading expertise across Foreign Exchange, Rates, Credit and Emerging Markets. The Fixed Income & Currencies business enables Deutsche Bank to respond to increasing automation, regulatory expectations and client demand for standardization and transparency in execution across fixed income, currency and emerging markets.
Foreign Exchange
Deutsche Bank is an industry recognised leader in the foreign exchange business. Our client centric approach helps us to serve the needs of our customers across the full product spectrum from basic liquidity provision in the spot market to innovative derivative solutions for both asset and liability managers.
Rates
Deutsche Bank’s Rates business provides a comprehensive range of fixed income securities and OTC derivatives. We give clients access to the Bank’s liquidity and product expertise through our global sales and trading teams, as well as our electronic trading channels and clearing offering. Our product range includes Government, Agency and Mortgage-Backed Securities (MBS) as well as a suite of interest rate and inflation derivative products.
Credit
Deutsche Bank’s global Credit trading business enables clients to meet their investment objectives and manage credit risk. With industry-leading expertise in market-making and credit valuation, we offer clients a wide range of products across Flow Credit, Distressed Products and Structured Finance Trading. Products traded include bonds, loans and claims, ranging from the strongest investment grade issuers through high yield to distressed assets. Our Structured Finance experts provide structured risk and non-flow financing solutions for clients across multiple industries and asset classes.
What we will offer you:
A healthy, engaged and well-supported workforce are better equipped to do their best work and, more importantly, enjoy their lives inside and outside the workplace. That’s why we are committed to providing an environment with your development and well-being at its center.
You can expect:
Competitive Salary and non-contributory pension
Competitive salary as well as pension, insurance contributions and salary packaging
4 weeks annual leave, plus additional and wellbeing leave
Parental leave benefits including Childcare Assistance Payment
A range of flexible benefits including the Online discount program, employee referral program,
Your key responsibilities:
Upon joining the Bank you will begin your learning journey with our global orientation, followed by professional skills training and technical financial training.
During your first year with us you will benefit from a graduate learning journey, comprising both technical and professional skills training, further enhancing your learning experience.
Your day-to-day tasks will vary depending on your role and the desk you’re working on. In FIC you might be pricing products for traders, preparing financial data analysis, examining market trends or assisting in the origination, structuring and execution of transactions.
You will learn from the best, evolve professionally as well as personally, and build a firm foundation upon which to specialize later.
Whichever path you take, by the end of your programme you’ll have the skills and experience to launch a long-term career with us as a salesperson, trader or structurer.
Your skills and experience:
We recruit highly intelligent graduates who are ambitious and adaptable. They have degrees in many different disciplines. Even though good levels of numeracy are important for some roles, you won’t necessarily need a formal mathematical or financial background. We have very comprehensive training programmes that will give you all the technical knowledge you’ll need to build a career with us. Above all, we’re looking for entrepreneurial people who thrive best in a diverse culture where innovation and agile thinking abound.You should not only be passionate about the world of finance, but also show a keen interest in your chosen field. You already have a record of outstanding academic achievement and you’re eager to go on learning at the same intensive rate. So you’ll thrive on working in a highly collaborative environment with some of the best minds in banking.
How we’ll support you:
Flexible working to assist you balance your personal priorities
Coaching and support from experts in your team
A culture of continuous learning to aid progression
A range of flexible benefits that you can tailor to suit your needs
Training and development to help you excel in your career
About us and our teams:
Deutsche Bank is the leading German bank with strong European roots and a global network. Click here to see what we do.
Deutsche Bank & Diversity
Our values define the working environment we strive to create – diverse, supportive and welcoming of different views. We embrace a culture reflecting a variety of perspectives, insights and backgrounds to drive innovation. We build talented and diverse teams to drive business results and encourage our people to develop to their full potential. Talk to us about flexible work arrangements and other initiatives we offer.
We promote good working relationships and encourage high standards of conduct and work performance. We welcome applications from talented people from all cultures, countries, races, genders, sexual orientations, disabilities, beliefs and generations and are committed to providing a working environment free from harassment, discrimination and retaliation.
20 days ago
Report job"
2,Master Data Analyst,Danone,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Danone is looking for a Master Data Analyst to ensure data quality, compliance and operating procedures with previous experience working with SAP.

At Danone, we believe that data driven decisions are the foundation of sustainable business growth. We have an exciting opportunity for a Master Data Analyst to join our SUPPLY CHAIN TEAM. You will thrive working independently in an entrepreneurial environment, enjoy translating actionable data insights to drive profitable growth.
Your responsibilities will include (but are not limited to):
Execute changes to SAP master data (e.g. Customer, Vendor, Materials, Pricing etc.) as approved by the business as well as master data set up, validations and periodic maintenance.
Perform regular business-related activities such as price and contracts updates, approval schemes and mass updates as well as troubleshooting to resolve any master data issues.
Participate in projects, new product developments and initiatives across multiple functional areas and regions.
Ensure data quality, compliance and consistency of master data across business systems.
Assist business process experts in defining standard operating procedures, process flows and related documentation
Perform monthly reporting for Quality checks and Audit purposes.
ABOUT YOU:
Working closely with Finance & Supply Chain team, you will ensure data quality, compliance and operating procedures. You will have demonstrable experience managing a SAP system and feel confident interpreting data to provide valuable insights to the business.
Ideally you will have:
Preferable previous background working in FMCG industry or Pharmaceutical industry
Mandatory Previous knowledge of SAP at User/Master Data Management level
Strong MS Excel skills
Process driven and accountable with the ability to work in an agile way to meet deadlines and manage project pieces of work
Set up processes

ABOUT US
Danone’s mission is Bringing health through food to as many people as possible and we want to invite people to join the movement for a healthier world. We recognize the power people have to impact the world through their daily choices. Each time we eat and drink, we vote for the world we want to live in. We believe a healthy body needs healthy food. And healthy food needs a healthy planet and this is what our new signature One Planet One Health embodies. (LINK TO YOUTUBE VIDEO: https://youtu.be/0wBhigOz_ic)
WE OFFER
If you would love to join a global company with a strong health mission who is committed to world class customer service, then we can offer you:
A great working environment
A strong competitive remuneration
Opportunity to grow and learn new skills
We believe everyone has talent, something which comes natural to you. Your uniqueness is something which brings both excellence as well as energises you.
HOW TO APPLY
If this sounds like the perfect opportunity for you to really make this role your own, please hit the APPLY button.
**Due to high volume of applicants, only selected candidates will be contacted following the closing date.
**You must hold valid working rights to be considered for this role.
13 days ago
Report job"
3,Analyst,IQVIA,Not shown,St Leonards NSW,"We currently have an exciting opportunity available for an Analyst to be part of IQVIA’s ChannelDynamics team to cover a maternity leave contract until the end of 2021.
ChannelDynamics is a syndicated solution that tracks the marketing and sales force activity of pharmaceutical products to healthcare professionals. It provides the industry with competitive benchmarking and global market insights from 36 countries including Australia and New Zealand. We work closely with multiple clients across marketing, brand and sales teams and help inform their commercial strategy pre, during and post product launch.
This role will suit someone seeking rapid development curve and plenty of client interactions – keenness to learn, strong analytical as well communication skills and a genuine interest in data analytics are required. As an Analyst within IQVIA’s ChannelDynamics Team, you will be responsible for:
Leveraging the ChannelDynamics syndicated data set to help address key client issues
Analysing and translating data into meaningful insights
Taking responsibility for running monthly market trend reports e.g. share of voice and liaising with clients about any questions or updates with these reports
Assisting in the development of pitch presentations and client workshops, under supervision
Presenting to client audiences via teleconference or in face-to-face meetings
Working closely with the Commercial Lead and contributing to internal brainstorming sessions to identify further market opportunities
Acquiring deep knowledge of the healthcare industry, ChannelDynamics and other IQVIA data assets to work effectively with clients
About you:
As an Analyst interested in joining IQVIA, you will have proven analytical, interpretative and problem-solving skills. Other required skills will include:
Ideally between 2-3 years professional experience with a bachelor’s degree in a relevant field (Life Sciences, Data Science, Mathematics/Statistics etc.)
Foundational technical skills are essential; proficient in using Microsoft software tools (Excel, PowerPoint); experience with statistical tools e.g. SPSS, Q, Tableau would be advantageous
Well-developed written and verbal communication skills
Knowledge of / an avid interest to know more about key issues and current developments in the healthcare industry and pharmaceutical promotion
Strong capability in juggling priorities to meet deadlines while retaining consistently high quality outcomes
Adaptability and an ability to learn quickly and apply new knowledge and thinking
Must enjoy analysing and visualising data
At IQVIA, we believe in pushing the boundaries of human science and data science to make the biggest impact possible – to help our customers create a healthier world. The advanced analytics, technology solutions and contract research services we provide to the life sciences industry are made possible by our 67,000+ employees around the world who apply their insight, curiosity and intellectual courage every step of the way. Learn more at jobs.iqvia.com.
1 day ago
Report job"
4,Data and Business Analyst,SoftLabs Pty Ltd,$800 - $900 a day,Canberra ACT,"Data and Business Analyst
12 month contract with possible extension
Canberra based
Australian Citizen or Ability to obtain baseline security clearance required
About SoftLabs
SoftLabs is an Australian based Digital Technology Company specialised in Technology consulting, project management, software development, testing, training and support services. We offer a wide range of ICT Services, quality of resources and wider delivery capabilities.
About the Role
As an experienced Data and Business Analyst, you will help deliver strategic business transformation. You will bring demonstrated experience and understanding of service delivery functions and processes and be able to apply industry standard business analysis processes, tools and methodologies. You will adapt quickly and add value by engaging with business users and colleagues and delivering a range of high quality work artefacts.
Experience and Skills:
Demonstrated ability to analyse business requirements and existing business outputs to inform and develop information architectures, data schemas and data dictionaries to achieve business outcomes
Proven experience in developing information architectures and incorporating information capture into business processes to answer complex business and policy questions
Undertake Interpretation and translation of business requirements into viable business solutions; and
Lead workshops and engagements with business stakeholders to elicit, capture and document business processes, requirements, rules and acceptance criteria
Desirable Skills:
Experience leading business analysis using Agile Scrum and Kanban methodology.
Excellent documentation and estimation skills.
Proven ability to create productive working relationships.
Strong team collaboration and working relationship skills.
If you are interested in this position, please click Apply and your details will be sent through to us for review. If you wish to have a confidential discussion call us on 02 9158 1270 or call Nikki 0482 693 975 for more information.
Application Deadline: 03/02/2021
Expected Start Date: 18/02/2021
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Salary: $800.00 – $900.00 per day
Work Eligibility:
Permitted to work permanently with no restriction on hours (e.g. citizen, permanent resident) (Required)
18 days ago
Report job"
5,Technical Business Analyst - Data Delivery,Hays,Not shown,Sydney Central Business District NSW,"Permanent opportunity for a Technical BA to work in a Big 4 Bank!

Your new company
One of the largest financial services providers in Sydney, which offers multiple products across the domestic market, is looking to recruit a Technical Business Analyst to be part of their Group-wide Technology and Data team. Its purpose is to provide Data Delivery to multiple simultaneous projects in different areas and businesses of the bank.


Your new role
You will work closely with the data delivery team to deploy data management enablement tools and provide support to the different portfolios, while acting as a bridge between the technical teams and the business to facilitate accurate and appropriate decisions being made. You will be working together with stakeholders to understand their needs and concerns and document the current and proposed state in order to identify improvements and develop requirements.


What you'll need to succeed
Strong data analysis experience
Strong SQL skills
Financial Services background
Experience with Big data platforms
Experience engaging with the business side and working with different stakeholders
Previous experience working in data migration or separation projects will be highly regarded
Swift system knowledge will be highly regarded



What you'll get in return
You will receive a competitive salary and work as a permanent employee for a leading Financial Services organization. You'll be offered flexible working arrangements and exciting career progression opportunities, while working in an ideal Sydney CBD location!


What you need to do now
If you're interested in this role, click 'apply now' to forward an up-to-date copy of your CV, or send it to lucia.turner@hays.com.au.
If this job isn't quite right for you but you are looking for a new position, please contact us for a confidential discussion on your career.

SA Licence number : LHS 297508
18 days ago
Report job"
6,Business Analyst Facilities,Corporate Services,"$103,965 - $116,441 a year",Sydney NSW,"About us?
?
Over the next 40 years, Sydney’s population is projected to swell to over 12 million residents and regional NSW will accommodate an extra 700,000 people.?Transport for NSW is delivering an unprecedented $72.2b investment?into a truly game changing Future Transport strategy which will bring together several?modes and?cutting edge?technologies?to?deliver satisfaction and safety for our customers while supporting a rapidly growing economy.???
?

The Division

Corporate Services provides sustainable strategies, solutions and services to enable our clients to deliver with confidence Transport's vision. Providing a robust to commercial management, ensuring financial sustainability across the cluster and driving strategic projects, procurement and transformation through the provision of corporate services to internal clients.
?

The opportunity
?
We are currently recruiting for a Business Analyst - Facilities to join the Asset and Workplace Services team within Corporate Services.

You will be responsible for providing data, analysis, and reporting, as well as preparation of business cases and presentation packs that are useful in developing initiatives for service improvement, tracking key metrics and informing decision making across the branch.

Establish systems and processes to provide the branch dashboard reporting to ensure performance indicators and targets can be accurately measured and monitored.
Probe information systems to establish information sources and provide nonstandard data extraction, modelling, and the development of high-quality custom reports.
Identify gaps in the availability of information across a variety of internal and third-party systems and participate in the development of strategies to solve the problem.
Assist with the development of business cases and improvement initiatives by providing and analysing data and preparing high-quality presentation packs.
?

About You:

We are looking for someone who has a the ability to create innovative and practical ways to analyse available information. You will have experience using tableau, excel, work processing and other data visualisation applications to present data in a clear and impactful way.

You will have demonstrated knowledge and experience working with a variety of systems and deliver quality data manipulation, analytics and modelling with a broad understanding of Facilities Management Services.

This role will require a security clearance and criminal clearance prior to appointment.

How to apply

To apply for this position, please submit your resume and respond to the questions that are asked as part of the online application process.

This position will be recruited through a gated process, whilst we welcome all applications, they will be assessed based on priority.

TfNSW permanent employees in the Asset and Workplace Services and notified TSS effected staff.
All other TfNSW permanent employees and external applicants.

Salary and Benefits

The salary for this position is Grade 7 ($103,965 - $116,441) per annum plus superannuation and leave loading.

Our Commitment to Diversity

Great people come from all walks of life. At Transport for NSW, we are committed to creating a diverse, inclusive and flexible workforce which reflects the community and the customers we serve.
We welcome and encourage applications from all people regardless of age, gender, ethnicity, cultural background, or sexual orientation.

For any enquiries, please email Cassandra Grosso on Cassandra.grosso@transport.nsw.gov.au

Applications close: Sunday the 28th of February 2021 at 11:59pm
NSW Public Service Commission
1 day ago
Report job"
7,"2021 Census Data Analysts (APS5), 2021 Census of Population and Housing",Australian Bureau of Statistics,"$73,725 - $82,812 a year",Belconnen ACT,"Classification: APS5
Temporary, full-time position
$73,725 – $82,812 per annum (plus 15.4% superannuation and allowances)


The Australian Bureau of Statistics (ABS) 2021 Census of Population and Housing is currently seeking Data Analyst at an APS5 classification to join our 2021 Census Data Coding section.

These are full-time, temporary positions, located in Belconnen, Canberra.

About the 2021 Census of Population and Housing:

The Census of Population and Housing (Census) is run every five years and is one of the largest and important collections to count the number of people and houses in Australia. The Census collects information about where we live, age, our culture, religion, income, education, living and housing arrangements. The information is used to make important decisions, such as government funding, input into policy-making and electoral boundaries.

About the roles:

The 2021 Census Data Coding section is responsible for transforming information provided by respondents on the Census form into statistical data. This includes the classification of responses to topics such as occupation, language and religion.

We are looking to fill multiple Census Data Analyst APS5 roles and staff will be expected to become data specialists in their topic. Responsibilities include:
The use of various data interrogation tools to monitor accuracy of coding operations.
Training and workload management of temporary coding staff.
Management of indexes and classifications relating to various Census topics.
Maintaining productive working relationships within Census Data Coding and with quality assurance areas.

Note: ABS employees who have access to market sensitive information are restricted in market trading activities. You may not be allowed to trade in financial products while employed.

Your qualities, experiences and skills

To be suitable you should have most of or all the following skills, qualities and experience:


Ability to build and sustain positive relationships with team members, stakeholders and clients
Work under pressure and meet strict deadlines
Enthusiasm and ability to work collaboratively in a fast-paced environment, responding positively to change and uncertainty
Identify and resolve potentially sensitive issues and make decisions based on sound subject matter and professional judgement.
Well developed communication, interpersonal and negotiation skills.
Established skills in objective, systematic analysis and data interrogation, and ability to draw accurate conclusions based on evidence.
Experience in data analysis tools such as Excel, SAS, SQL and PowerBI is desirable, but not essential.

If found suitable but not offered a role you will be placed in the merit pool. If you agree in your application this means you may be offered a similar role in the ABS or another APS agency.
2 days ago
Report job"
8,Senior Analyst - Business Data Reporting,Australian Prudential Regulation Authority (APRA),Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Be part of an organisation that protects the financial wellbeing of the Australian community
Contribute to enhancing transparency in the financial industry
Enjoy varied, challenging work and expand your knowledge into new areas, as you join a team with unique insight into the industry
Opportunity for flexible working arrangements in a workplace that values diversity, inclusion and work/life balance
APRA has an opportunity for a Senior Analyst to join our Business Data Reporting (BDR) team within the Data Analytics & Insights business unit. In this role you will contribute to the redesign of APRA's internal reporting suite as APRA delivers a multi-year project to transform our data-enabled decision making.
The BDR team is responsible for the dissemination of data within APRA via interactive visualisations and dashboards, supporting our people in making decisions underpinned by easily accessible data.
The role will touch on multiple aspects of the internal report generation cycle. You will:
Gather complex reporting requirements and deliver targeted, clear and impactful data visualisations to facilitate data-enabled decision making
Create and build reports using Power BI, including creating calculations using DAX, transforming and modelling data from SSAS cubes and the data warehouse, designing visualisations that best support a smooth workflow and gathering of insights
Work with IT developers to provide requirements for how the data is structured in SSAS cubes and the data warehouse to best support its use in reports
Work with IT testers to determine test scope, approach and test cases when testing reports and calculations
Support users in the use of Power BI to consume and build reports, including providing training
Provide guidance on best practice in terms of report design and building in Power BI
Provide input on data collection and taxonomy design to facilitate report building and data querying
Demonstrated experience in in building flexible but targeted data and reporting solutions, along with producing and reviewing conceptual and logical Power BI / SSAS data models is essential for this role. The successful candidate will have the ability to manage the needs and expectations of a variety of stakeholders. You will have highly developed written and verbal communication skills, along with excellent attention to detail.
Australian Prudential Regulation Authority (APRA)
Today
Report job"
9,Data Analyst - Excel / SQL,Morgan McKinley,$450 - $600 a day,Sydney Central Business District NSW,"Apply now!
A leading financial services organisation is currently looking for a Data Analyst to join the customer contact team on an initial 6-month contract. Your role in the business will be to utilise tools such as Excel, SQL and VBA to deliver a range of ongoing business critical operational reports and insights, a real hands-on Data role with an opportunity to change the way the organisation interacts with its customers.
The business provides a high performing and dynamic environment alongside growing a great culture within the team.
THE IDEAL CANDIDATE:
Have strong skills with Excel, but can also create SQL queries, manipulate data
Must have a proven track record building presentations
Prior experience working with customer contact data
Experience creating engaging dashboards and data visualizations (Power BI)
The company is data driven and yet at the same time a fun environment with games and lots of social events. If this sounds like the right move for you apply now!
jpope@morganmckinley.com
Excel / Power BI / SQL / Business Intelligence / BI / Data Analyst / Customer Experience
Work with a market leader in the Financial Services sector, apply to find out more about this exclusive opportunity.
19 days ago
Report job"
10,"Reporting Analyst, RPO",KORNFERRY,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Req Number:
KFINT16750

Location:
SYDNEY, New South Wales

Posted:
1/25/2021

Category:
SOLUTIONS

Job Type:
Permanent
About us
At Korn Ferry we are passionate about what we do, the value we bring to our clients and the careers we provide our people. We pride ourselves on high quality execution, encourage a culture of ongoing career development and recognise performance and commitment.
As the global industry leader in high-impact recruitment solutions, we offer fully customised, flexible services to help our clients meet their talent and recruitment needs. Our focus on unlocking IP, relationships within the broader Korn Ferry group, the calibre of people and delivering excellence, helps to provide a compelling and competitive proposition.
Korn Ferry provides its employees with a truly global opportunity to work with the best clients, as well as the best tools, technologies and expertise in the industry.
What's on offer
We have an exciting opportunity for a Reporting Analyst to join Korn Ferry RPO team. This role will allow you to showcase your analytics and reporting skills, as you take responsibility for a portfolio of key clients. You be responsible for building and supporting reporting development, producing scheduled and ad hoc reports and performance dashboards.
You will work with our onsite RPO teams and stakeholders, to support client reporting and data requirements, workforce planning and account management.
This is an excellent opportunity for someone with a demonstrated experience and a passion for gathering information from various sources and tools, transforming the information and effectively presenting to key stakeholders. The role offers the opportunity to expand your knowledge, as well as diversity and agility as you work across various accounts and industries.
Experience
To be successful in this role, you will enjoy collaborating with teams across the business to seek information. You will enjoy working within a busy, fast-paced environment and will be action-oriented with have high levels of motivation and attention to detail.
If you’re an expert at multitasking, working to tight timeframes and enjoy taking accountability for your work, then you will thrive in this role. Equally, you will be someone who deals well with ambiguity, isn’t afraid to try new things and has a solution focus to problem solving.
In addition, you will have:
demonstratable experience working in a hands-on data or reporting role
excellent data visualization capability and ability to translate business requirements into dashboards that are easy to read and interpret preferably with PowerBI
extensive Excel skills including building macros, VBA, pivot tables
Experience presenting reports and data to key stakeholders would be highly advantageous, as would previous experience in a reporting analyst role within recruitment and HR.
The role can be based in Sydney or Melbourne.
Next steps
If you would like to play a role in shaping our clients vision, whilst building a career with Korn Ferry, get in touch today!
If you currently work for Korn Ferry or one of our affiliates, you must be eligible to apply for a different position within Korn Ferry to use the Careers Site. If you accept such a position, your benefits programs and Human Resources policies may change. Please consult with your HR contact for the new position concerning application eligibility, benefit programs, and HR policies applicable to that position.
22 days ago
Report job"
11,Associate Data Analyst,Environment Protection Authority,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"There has never been a more exciting time at EPA as we work to prevent the harmful effects of pollution and waste on Victoria's environment and people, with a focus on zero tolerance for waste crime and unsafe waste management.
We are seeking Associate Data Analyst's - Waste Crime Programs (VP3.2) to join the new Waste Crime Prevention Directorate to implement the Government's Recycling Victoria policy and plan, based with the EPA in Sunshine.

Your role:
Provide high quality and timely data analytic information to prevent, detect and disrupt waste crime
Monitor and evaluate all incoming information to identify trends and patterns leading to waste crime
Deliver fit for purpose data analysis outputs that provide strategic direction to the Directorate
Build capability along with Senior Data Analysts and develop key insights to lead and aid strategic decision making
Qualifications & Attributes

Please refer to the attached position description
What's in it for you?

Work alongside a team of highly committed specialists to deliver programs and services that prevent harm to the environment and human health
Contribute to the EPA becoming a national and international leader in detecting and disrupting waste crime
Opportunity to provide key value and input into program design, roll out, and implementation
Flexible work options, personal and professional development
How to Apply:
Read the attached position description and apply online via our EPA Career Services. Within your application, please submit the following:

A completed application form
A completed cover letter addressing your experience, motivation, and suitability for the role
Your resume including the contact details of two appropriate referees
Inquiries can be directed to David Lovell - Manager - Waste Crime Programs on David.lovell@epa.vic.gov.au or contact People and Culture Services at Recruitment@epa.vic.gov.au
All prospective employees are required to undergo a National Criminal Record Check before an employment offer being made. Individual responses to key selection criteria listed on the Position Description are not required. EPA Victoria is committed to supporting employees through flexible work arrangements and encouraging work/life balance.
We are dedicated to maintaining a safe and inclusive work environment where all employees are respected, valued, and supported. We proactively seek to employ a diverse workforce to leverage the varied ideas of all employees, that drive innovation and success in everything we do. Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander people are encouraged to apply. EPA Victoria welcomes applications from serving or past members of the Australian Defence Force. If you require advice and support with the application process, please contact the Recruitment team on 1 300 372 842.
EPA Victoria utilise an Order of Merit process whereby applicants deemed suitable may be retained on a Merit List, from which their application may be accessed for recruitment to this role within a 3-month period. Note: Applications received via e-mail will not be considered. For further information on Environment Protection Authority Victoria, please visit www.epa.vic.gov.au
6 days ago
Report job"
12,Data Analyst – Lean Data Analytics – Business Bank Remediation,Westpac Group,Not shown,Sydney Central Business District NSW,"Contribute to and drive the delivery of solutions that create both short-run and long-term benefits for customers and the business
Broad focus across Design, Insights, Capability, Delivery & Stakeholder Management
Permanent opportunity
How will I help?


As a Data Analyst in our Business Bank Remediation team, you will contribute to the development and deployment of significant improvements through the application of Analytics practices. This is achieved through structuring data to develop insights, enabling the business to resolve problems and drive strategic direction.

Other key day to day responsibilities will include:
Designing and articulating complex data visualisations intuitive graphics to a non-technical audience and forming/owning a backlog for building data capability to ensure it reflects the division’s strategic and financial goals
Delivering insights and capability through understanding what data is required to validate business problems, creating a collection plan and implementing it
Gathering data using various data mining tools and techniques followed by translating them into data that is structured, reusable and provides insight capability to the wider team and business
Building, owning and continuously improving data logic, structure and visualisations to drive the shaping and delivery of projects across multiple platforms
Sharing information and knowledge between internal and external networks and partnerships to boost performance and productivity.
What's in it for me?


You will build your profile internally with senior stakeholders and be part of the future of a business that has been around for 200 years and whose vision is becoming the world’s best service company.
You’ll be working for an organisation that supports development, internal career moves and flexible working. Along with competitive salary, you’ll receive Westpac's generous benefits and a whole array of customer discounts. Being an integral part of Business Bank Product, you will constantly be challenging the status quo and delivering high quality customer outcomes.

What do I need?


To be considered for this opportunity will need to demonstrate:
Tertiary or post graduate qualification in a mathematical/finance discipline
Proficient in using SQL & analytical toolkits (R or Python desirable) with demonstrated experience
Previous experience developing data solutions in either data warehouses or big data platforms (leveraging both quantitative and qualitative data)
Proficiency in translating and analysing large data sets
Lean Six Sigma awareness.
Highly proficient using MS suite.

What is it like to work there?


You’ll join one big, supportive team – but you’ll also be doing your bit to reach our vision to become of the world's greatest service companies. As an equal opportunity employer, we celebrate difference and love having a diverse and inclusive workplace. As part of our commitment to creating a flexible, diverse and inclusive workplace, this role is open to experienced candidates seeking workplace flexibility. We invite candidates of all ages, people with a disability and Indigenous Australians to apply.

How do I Apply?


Start here. Just click on the APPLY button.

Brand : Westpac Group
Job : Product
Primary Location : NSW-Sydney CBD
Employee Status : Permanent
Schedule : Full-time
Recruiter : David Lenny
Posting Date : 07/02/2021, 10:49:51 PM
Closing Date : 10/03/2021, 6:59:00 AM
8 days ago
Report job"
13,Data Analyst (Japanese Language requirement),Intercontinental Exchange,Not shown,Southbank VIC,"Intercontinental Exchange (NYSE ICE) is a Fortune 500 company that operates global markets and clearing houses, and delivers information and technology designed to help companies around the world manage risk, access information and raise capital. We serve customers in over 70 countries with a team of world-class employees. We recruit passionate, knowledgeable professionals and offer a collaborative, results-oriented environment where they help build innovative solutions to help our customers thrive in global markets.

At Intercontinental Exchange, our diverse team is working to create and improve technology that solves market structure challenges for market participants around the world. Whether it’s designing and managing the tech infrastructure for global trading and clearing or developing leading-edge market data solutions, our teams are a critical part of global markets.

As we continue to grow and expand, we’re looking for motivated, results-oriented professionals who share our entrepreneurial spirit and commitment to improving the global marketplace. We offer a comprehensive and competitive compensation and benefits package to ensure the health and financial security of our employees.
Our Melbourne office is primarily focused on data collection for Equities, Funds and Derivative Instruments.. This role is pivotal to the data collection process. The data we maintain enables us to provide a variety of market trusted products to our clients. All our Analysts are multilingual and are assigned to a geographical territory depending on their spoken languages.

Responsibilities
Researching, capturing and inputting market data in a timely and accurate manner for our covered markets
Identifying data quality issues, recommending procedural and technical changes to improve productivity and data quality for ICE Data Services
The Research Analyst will be expected to stay current in Industry initiatives and organizations that impact the data covered
Assist in ICE Data Services Data Quality Program
Address client inquiries on Asia Pacific Markets.
Confirm existing information and/or provide additional information when internal and external customers inquire about data discrepancies
Research information on initial sources and may have verbal discussions with underwriters, financial advisors, agencies, trustees, etc
Work with Data Collection and Product to achieve common goals of improving data quality, accuracy and timeliness
Communicate, verbal and written, with Customer Services and Evaluated Services
Maintain daily and monthly statistics and metrics of client inquiries
This is a research position and not a technical IT role.
Knowledge And Experience
Strong interpersonal, reading and written communication skills
Business level English (reading, writing and spoken) and also fluency in Japanese

Preferred
Experience in a similar field or has conducted research extensively as part of a degree or the working environment. Applicants without experience can apply as training will be provided
Good PC skill would be advantage
Multiple language skills will be a plus

We offer experience working in dynamic, professional, fast paced environment, friendly and multicultural colleagues.


We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of gender, civil status, family status, sexual orientation, religion, age, disability, race or membership of the travelling community.

Additional Information
Schedule Full-time
Shift flexibility - available to work flexibly on shifts from 09am to 11pm
30+ days ago
Report job"
14,Data Business Analyst - Enterprise Data Management,Macquarie Group Limited,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Utilise your experience in Enterprise Data Management in the Financial Services sector in this newly created role within Macquarie's Financial Management Group. In this key business focused role, you will be required to work with the business cross functionally to build strong relationships and influence your key stakeholders.
In this role you will work closely with senior members of Finance and the business teams to drive data provisioning & enhancing data quality in a high-profile, change-oriented team.
You will be a self-starter, curious and driven, with the ability to self-manage workload and deadlines whilst maintaining a degree of accuracy and quality.
Your strong analytical, problem solving skills, coupled with your experience within Finance and/or product knowledge of financial instruments, will ensure you are successful in this role.
An understanding of Enterprise Data Management and data quality concepts would be desirable for this role.
Detailed Role & Responsibilities:
As a Data business analyst in data governance team for various mandatory and regulatory projects your key focus would be:
Ensure data risks are managed by supporting the team to:
evaluate aggregate data risks within the Group.
ensuring controls are implemented and tested for effectiveness
support monitoring of controls effectiveness
maintain strong working relationships with the risk management teams (FORM, Assurance)
Ensure management understanding of data quality issues and impacts:
engage with the Operations & Data Quality team to confirm issue status
perform thematic analysis of data incidents and issues
engage with stakeholders (Data Owners) to validate observations and agree call outs
ensure material issues are escalated / have visibility to data governance forums
Ensure risk / control gaps and or data quality issues are addressed by supporting the team to:
establish remediation plans for gaps and thematic/material data issues
ensure solutions are aligned to data frameworks and strategies
monitor actions to ensure delivery within agreed timelines
deliver status updates to the Data management team and Stakeholders (Data Owners)
You will bring to this role:
To be successful in this role, you will have 3-4 years of relevant experience in Data and Information Management roles as Data Business Analyst in the Financial Services industry. Regulatory projects experience within the financial services industry is preferred.
Working at the interface of business and technology teams, you will also possess:
an understanding of Enterprise Data Management and data quality concepts would be desirable
business Intelligence tool experience an advantage, for example Informatica, Alteryx and PowerBI
be analytical and have demonstrated experience in effective problem solving
experience working in a team-oriented, collaborative environment
finance and/or product knowledge of financial instruments is preferred
About the Financial Management Group
The Financial Management Group provides financial, tax and treasury services to all areas of Macquarie. The group is focused on providing strategic analysis and advice to Macquarie's businesses and senior management, managing Macquarie's funding, liquidity and capital position, ensuring Macquarie continues to meet regulatory and compliance obligations and managing Macquarie's corporate affairs.
Our commitment to Diversity and Inclusion
The diversity of our people is one of our greatest strengths, and in combination with our inclusive environment, it enables us to deliver innovative and sustainable outcomes for our people, clients, shareholders and communities. From day one, you'll be encouraged to be yourself and supported to perform at your best. If our purpose of ‘empowering people to innovate and invest for a better future’ is as inspiring to you as it is to us, please apply. With the right technology, support and resources, our people can work in a range of flexible ways.
We are committed to providing a working environment that embraces and values diversity and inclusion. We encourage candidates to speak with a member of our recruitment team if you require adjustments to our recruitment process to support you, and the type of working arrangements that would help you thrive.

About Macquarie
A career at Macquarie means you’ll have the opportunity to develop and utilise new skills, explore interesting fields and do challenging work that will impact the lives of people around the world—whether it’s accelerating the green energy transition, helping sustain global food supplies, financing social housing projects or investing in essential infrastructure. At Macquarie, we’re empowering people to innovate and invest for a better future.
Our size and international presence means your work can take you anywhere—across business groups, disciplines, sectors and borders. With 16,300+ employees and offices in 31 markets around the world, we’re a truly global organisation.
You’ll be supported by a diverse team where the unique perspectives, ideas and experiences that all of our people bring are valued. You’ll be empowered to address unmet needs in our communities whilst advising and investing alongside our clients and partners. Working with us, you’ll have the opportunity to make a difference.
Macquarie is a global financial group providing clients with asset management, retail and business banking, wealth management, leasing and asset financing, market access, commodity trading, renewables development, investment banking and principal investment.

Job no: FMG-956103
Work type: Full time
Location: Sydney
Category: Mid-level, Accounting & Finance, Data & Analytics, Projects, Improvements & Change
Group: Financial Management Group
Division: FMG Central
Recruiter: Maddy Wilson
Opening Date: 14/2/2021
1 day ago
Report job"
15,Course Development Analyst,Deakin University,"$89,427 - $98,468 a year",Australia,"Job no: 506998
Work type: Full-time
Location: Flexible
Categories: Administration
Based at our Melbourne Burwood, Geelong Waterfront or Warrnambool campus
Full-time, continuing position
HEW 7 $89,427-$98,468 p.a + 17% super
Deakin is Australia’s sixth largest university and ranks first in Victoria for both student satisfaction and graduate employment.
The Market Insights Unit is one of the high-performing units of the University’s Marketing Division and is responsible for gathering and sharing insights, information and advice in relation to the customer, course development and review, competitor behaviours, brand and campaigns and the broader market environment in order to inform and influence University business and marketing strategy.
An opportunity now exists to join the Unit as Course Development Analyst where your primary role will be to collaborate with Faculty and other agencies within the University to research, analyse and provide marketing advice and support on the development of new courses and the revision of existing courses.
Your key responsibilities will include:
Design and execute qualitative and quantitative research projects when required to provide robust testing of new/existing course developments.
Undertake proactive data mining, research to identify course development opportunities (domestic and international) and develop and present analysis and reporting to support further consideration of these opportunities.
Work with Faculties to identify course development priorities and undertake the collection and analysis of insights to support these priorities.
Ensure the implementation of all University policies that relate to the areas for which the position is responsible, in particular, those relating to the conduct of surveys, information privacy, information and records managements and trade promotion lotteries.
To be successful, you’ll have:
A tertiary degree in marketing, business analytics or other disciplines providing for the development of strong analytical skills; and formal training or qualifications in strategic analysis
Demonstrated extensive experience in transforming and interpreting market data into well-articulated actionable insights on product, market and customer trends.
A strong understanding of traditional and contemporary market research methodologies, both qualitative and quantitative, including strong data extraction, analysis and numerical skills and attention to detail in regard to statistical reports.
Use of Microsoft Office, in particular advanced use of MS Excel in data analysis and visualisation and Tableau along with a knowledge/experience of open source, and online information repositories, surveys, and analysis.
Proven capability to work positively and effectively as part of a collaborative work team
Demonstrated ability to organise and plan, and to meet rigid and conflicting demands and deadlines, along with the ability to adapt to changed priorities.

Applications for this position close on February 21st 2021.
Please submit your updated resume and a short cover letter outlining your skills and experience for this role.
Are You Ready?
Deakin is one of the new breeds of global universities – agile, dynamic and innovative. We are committed to making a genuine difference in people’s lives through excellence in education and research. As a Victorian university with a global impact, join us and let’s see what we can achieve together.
Our people are important to us, and we understand the significance of providing them with a dynamic and diverse working environment, with opportunities to grow and develop their careers.
At Deakin, we offer a variety of benefits including a flexible and sustainable working environment, lifestyle benefits and various discounts with our third-party suppliers.
We value diversity and aim to build an inclusive environment that champions, embraces and respects differences. We support and encourage applications from Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander people, and people of all abilities, cultures, sexual orientation, and genders.
Advertised: 09 Feb 2021 AUS Eastern Daylight Time
7 days ago
Report job"
16,Business Analyst,Realtekh Australia,"$89,944 - $109,938 a year",Sydney NSW,"Role: Business Analyst/Data Analyst
Location: Sydney
Mode: Permanent
Key Accountabilities
× Investigate and analyse business problems and opportunities and design future data management requirements, processes and capabilities
× Define and document requirements for changes to business data processes, policies and systems to achieve business outcomes
× Participation in internal process improvement projects and initiatives
× Perform data quality monitoring activities for the customer domain
× Utilise a variety of data sources and associated tools and technical skills, e.g. Teradata, Informatica etc.
× Consult with operations, projects and other stakeholders on current known customer data issues that could impact project delivery.
× Ensure project implementations go-live without impact to customer data.
Skills
× Strong business analysis and data skills
× Proven ability to interact effectively with senior internal and external stakeholders
× Advanced skills in Teradata SQL, Microsoft applications (like -Excel)
× Intermediate to advanced skills in process and control documentation, including flowcharting
× Experience in continuous improvement activities and implementation of related projects
× Know How of Tableau or PowerBI or SAS will be advantageous
Job Types: Full-time, Permanent
Salary: $89,944.00 – $109,938.00 per year
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Today
Report job"
17,Master Data and Pricing Analyst - North Ryde,CSR Group,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Master Data and Pricing Analyst - North Ryde

Job no:
Work type: Specific Term
Location: Sydney
Categories: Administration/Support, Corporate/Other
Master Data & Pricing Analyst (Maternity Leave Contract) - North Ryde
CSR is the name behind many powerful brands, providing innovative and sustainable building solutions across the residential, commercial, and industrial segments.
Part of the CSR family, our Masonry & Insulation Business Unit comprises of Bradford Insulation, Monier Roofing and PGH Bricks & Pavers. We manufacture and market a full range of products for residential and commercial applications including a large range of products and systems that cover insulation, ventilation, solar, bricks and roof tiles.
The Opportunity
We are looking for an experienced and self-motivated professional to join our team as our new Master Data & Pricing Analyst on a maternity leave contract. Reporting to the General Manager Customer Operations, your primary purpose will be to ensure compliance to master data standards in accordance with policy and procedure. You will be responsible for managing master data improvement projects and actively participate in projects requiring master data maintenance.
This role will be based at Head Office in North Ryde, close to trains and buses.
Key responsibilities include;
Ensure supply and install customer pricing and vendor pricing is processed in SAP in a timely and accurate manner;
Create and maintain service materials, customer material info. records, truck and suburb master data in SAP;
Ensure compliance to all master data conventions and defined standards from business master data personnel;
Identify areas for improvement in master data process and maintenance;
Assist the National Pricing Analyst in their responsibilities including:
Customer price changes
Implementation of Bradford price rises
National Customer price files
Customer Trading arrangement forms
Educate internal customers on process for material and pricing maintenance in SAP;
Carry out testing on new SAP functionality relating to master data.
To secure this role you will ideally need to demonstrate;
Previous experience in a similar role;
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills combined with a collaborative working style;
The ability to interact with people at all levels across the business;
Strong SAP ECC6 knowledge: SD, MM, PP and MS Excel skills;
Ability to handle pressure, prioritise and manage multiple tasks;
Strong attention to detail.
How to apply
If this is the type of role you would love to be involved in and you are passionate about developing your skills, apply online today with a resume and cover letter.
To learn more about us visit www.csr.com.au
Advertised: 04 Feb 2021 AUS Eastern Daylight Time
Applications close: 05 Mar 2021 AUS Eastern Daylight Time
12 days ago
Report job"
18,Business Analyst,MPG BUSINESS INFORMATION SYSTEMS PRIVATE LIMITED,"$70,000 - $80,000 a year",Parramatta NSW,"Working with End users of clients to Identify, inspect, and analyse business processes, procedures, and work practices to propose right solution.
Development of Proof of Concept and Technical Solutioning for client demonstration to showcase how suggested solution can add value to their business operations.
Using project management procedures, standards, and methods to develop detailed Technical scope of work, project plan and cost estimation for client consideration.
Assisting client to understand the Solution benefits, Technical Scope and associated cost estimations for smooth solution decision making process.
Working along with Consulting team and End users of client for detailed analysis study for business operations, preparation and Finalization of Business requirement and solution blueprints documents.
Performing proper GAP Fit analysis along with Technical team using data and process modelling techniques to create clear system specifications and fulfilling gap in proposed solution.
Regular review of project developments/Customizations and ensure quality development with Technical Team
Helping project team in creating project documentation and take timely approval from end users of client.
Working along with delivery and client user team for deployment of functional solutions and ensuring quality and reliability of the proposed solution & system.
Ensuring quality delivery of project through regular reviews with project delivery team and ensuring projects are delivered on Time, with zero cost overrun and zero bug.
Job Types: Full-time, Permanent
Salary: $70,000.00 – $80,000.00 per year
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
ICT Business analyst: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor Degree (Required)
Work Eligibility:
Permitted to work permanently with no restriction on hours (e.g. citizen, permanent resident) (Required)
Work Remotely:
No
14 days ago
Report job"
19,eCommerce Analyst,Dyson,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"About us
Dyson is a global technology enterprise. We solve the problems others choose to ignore, with surprising new inventions that defy convention and simply work better. We’re growing fast and our ambition is huge – more categories, more locations and more people.
About the role
Reporting to the Head of Direct (TBC) you will manage all digital performance reporting across both ANZ .com platforms. Working with the team you will use your analytical expertise to provide actionable recommendations on how to improve all aspects of the eCommerce funnel.
Using Analytical tools to review performance and provide recommendations on where opportunity exists to grow Dyson Direct business, specifically our .com platforms.
Work with internal and external eCommerce teams and own the eCommerce performance lifecycle from traffic/conversion forecasting to reporting/analysis to optimisations and AB testing to post campaign review
Review and find ways to optimise the .com digital ecosystem including Dyson owned channels and paid/earned channels (SEM, SEO, social, etc).
Manage performance across various types of work (trading, campaign, NPDs, project, etc) • Embed and lead regular performance updates, learnings and recommendations.
Responsible for daily/weekly/monthly performance KPI reports on traffic and conversion to wider team
Optimise and improve conversion throughout both .com platforms
Communicate insights and optimisations effectively to a wide audience Insight
Develop, monitor and provide frequent digital performance updates to the Direct team
Develop consistent and regular reports to help wider team understand trajectory and past performance
Build visualisations piecing together multiple data sources in order to tell the story in a compelling way
Work with Direct and Digital team members to optimise future promotions and executions using previous analysis and learnings
Drive Digital Analytics understanding throughout the business
Stay informed of new industry technology and techniques to drive innovation and efficiency in role and team Optimisation
Drive the conversion rate of all marketplace stores using analysis and recommendations
Embed A/B testing and continuous learning and use these insights to drive growth in conversion
Develop relationships with Global teams to understand other markets learnings and processes eCommerce Forecast
Understand and measure performance vs forecast using Financial and eCommerce metrics • Manage regular traffic and conversion forecasting to feed into the Direct planning cycle
Identify gaps to target and find opportunities ahead of time Behaviours
Achieve a standard of excellence in our work processes and outcomes, ensuring adherence to Dyson policies and all relevant regulatory and legal requirements.
Promote and demonstrate Dyson behaviours.
Promote, implement and comply with health and safety procedures.
About you
Degree level (or equivalent) ideally in Marketing, Business, Statistics or web related subject
2 years+ experience in an analytical role with a focus on digital including ecommerce and online marketing
Digital analytics/visualisation tools (e.g. Google Analytics, Search ads 360, Google Data Studio) – Highly desirable • Marketplace analytic tools (e.g. eBay)
Desirable
Optimisation/journey tools (e.g. Adobe Target, Decibel Insight) – Desirable
Strong data analysis skills using Excel, Google Sheets and SQL (Excel required, SQL a plus)
Passionate about online, data and analytics • Able to work with complex data to deliver meaningful, relevant, actionable insights
An excellent communicator and storyteller
High attention to detail
Ability to manage multiple stakeholders & secure buy-in
Continuous improvement mind-set
Ability to adapt to change and successfully work with ambiguity
Ability to multi-task and manage multiple projects on an ongoing basis
Ambition to grow Dyson business
Benefits
At Dyson, our people are at the heart of everything we do. We value you bringing yourself to work and we want to deliver an employee experience that matches the quality we give to our customers. Outside of a competitive salary and sales bonus, our team members receive generous product discounts, additional paid annual leave, paid parental leave and ongoing learning and development opportunities. Innovation is in our DNA and we are excited to adopt new ways of doing things differently, and better.
Interview guidance
We are following the government guidelines regarding COVID19. At this time all interviews will be conducted via video or telephone. We’re taking these precautionary measures to protect both our employee and candidate wellbeing. Our Talent Acquisition team will work with you and provide further information as appropriate.
15 days ago
Report job"
20,Technical Business Analyst - Data Delivery,Hays,Not shown,Sydney Central Business District NSW,"Permanent opportunity for a Technical BA to work in a Big 4 Bank!

Your new company
One of the largest financial services providers in Sydney, which offers multiple products across the domestic market, is looking to recruit a Technical Business Analyst to be part of their Group-wide Technology and Data team. Its purpose is to provide Data Delivery to multiple simultaneous projects in different areas and businesses of the bank.


Your new role
You will work closely with the data delivery team to deploy data management enablement tools and provide support to the different portfolios, while acting as a bridge between the technical teams and the business to facilitate accurate and appropriate decisions being made. You will be working together with stakeholders to understand their needs and concerns and document the current and proposed state in order to identify improvements and develop requirements.


What you'll need to succeed
Strong data analysis experience
Strong SQL skills
Financial Services background
Experience with Big data platforms
Experience engaging with the business side and working with different stakeholders
Previous experience working in data migration or separation projects will be highly regarded
Swift system knowledge will be highly regarded



What you'll get in return
You will receive a competitive salary and work as a permanent employee for a leading Financial Services organization. You'll be offered flexible working arrangements and exciting career progression opportunities, while working in an ideal Sydney CBD location!


What you need to do now
If you're interested in this role, click 'apply now' to forward an up-to-date copy of your CV, or send it to lucia.turner@hays.com.au.
If this job isn't quite right for you but you are looking for a new position, please contact us for a confidential discussion on your career.

SA Licence number : LHS 297508
18 days ago
Report job"
21,Campaign Data Analyst,ANZ Banking Group,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Requisition Title -
Campaign Data Analyst
Job Number: - AUS125562
Description

Data Analyst (Campaign)- Deposits Tribe
Location: Melbourne or Sydney
At ANZ, everything we do boils down to ‘why’ – our purpose – to shape a world where people and communities thrive. We're just as focused on seeing our people thrive as well as our customers. We'll give you every opportunity to develop your career. We are responding faster to changing customer requirements, focusing on the things that matter the most, energising our people, eliminating waste and reducing bureaucracy.
ANZ has moved to a new way of working, leveraging agile practices. To understand more about this new way of working and if this role is right for you, we strongly encourage you to take a look at The ANZ Way vimeo channel where you’ll find ‘The ANZ Way’ animation and the ‘New Ways of Working’ animation.
We’ve also got some great information about what it’s like to work in ‘Data@ANZ’ on our new LinkedIn Life page.
The Role
Data Analysts deeply understand the power of data to generate quality customer insight, manage information, identify trends and make decisions. Campaign Developers take that knowledge and use it to drive customer contact and business outcomes.
This Data Analyst (Campaign Development) role sits within the Deposits Tribe. This is an opportunity for a campaign developer to build expertise in our remediation and compliance customer engagement, participate in projects that will seek to solve customer issues and communicate the outcomes to our customers.
This is a role for someone who wants to deliver tangible business and customer outcomes in one of the strategic focuses for the bank and use data and insights to drive changes and embed processes.
What will be in your toolkit?
Hands-on knowledge and experience with tools and techniques for analysis, data manipulation and presentation (e.g. SAS, SQL, Tableau)
Analytical and inquisitive mind-set to continuously improve the level of insight surfaced
Strong ability to translate data insights into practical business recommendations
Strong data visualisation skills
Ability to effectively communicate to all stakeholders (technical and non-technical) is absolutely essential
Broad capability and a proven ability to innovate and adapt to the latest developments
Minimum 1 years’ experience with a marketing automation tool
Minimum 3 years’ experience with SQL and relational databases
Strong interpersonal skills, including the ability to inspire, mentor, coach and develop others
Ability to quickly grasp new content and pick up new skills and technologies
Ability to ask for and give feedback
High attention to detail
Experience with Unica Campaign is highly desirable.
Experience with other Campaign management systems highly regarded especially experience with Adobe Campaign
Strong ability to operate without day-to-day direction. You will be self-driven, and able to navigate your way around new tools and teams to gain the knowledge required in order to perform your role end-to-end.
Able to understand data and process flows and map them through investigation and reverse-engineering
Privacy and risk savvy when it comes to data and marketing
What might a day in the life look like?
Analysing customer journeys across web and non-web channels
Mapping out the path of acquisition and conversion for web visitors from awareness to evaluation to conversion, understanding the journey of a prospect and their conversion into a customer
Designing journeys for prospect engagement and conversion across multiple channels
Using marketing and advertising platforms to implement marketing campaigns and journeys, including: Adobe Suite (campaign, analytics, audience manager, target), Google Suite (double-click, AdWords), Social (Facebook, LinkedIn), Unica Suite (Campaign, Optimise, UMO)
Working with Legacy, Modern and Emerging data platforms (GIW, ECDM, Teradata/CAA, GCP (CDE), EBD and others.
Authoring copy, building email templates, and other creative/content elements
Development of new reports or customisation of existing reports to provide the required measurements
Engaging with peers, vendors and agency partners to establish new capabilities and data feeds in order to achieve stated business objectives
Continuous generation, monitoring, presenting and conducting of 'fact-based' analysis of relevant customer and product insights to use at any time for the development and improvement of the business lending portfolio and its metrics
Continuous measurement and analysis of various customer journeys
Generate, monitor, present and analyse relevant customer insights, costs, benefits, and risks for customers, clients and cohort products; this could include business casing, what if scenarios and opportunity sizing & assessments as well as portfolio optimisation opportunities
Develop tools and methods to fully profile products, product categories, customers and customer segments to identify opportunities and areas of relative underperformance
Source data from a variety of sources to combine, synthesise and analyse to generate insights
Support key data platform and/or data scheduling jobs to support insights delivery to key audiences (e.g. frontline, other tribes)
Lead, Optimise, Design and execute business interventions (customers and operational) to uplift customer engagement and business performance
Share knowledge and align development across your chapter members
Things that I am (or strive to be!)
A team player
The customer’s biggest fan
A collaboration champion
Comfortable being uncomfortable
Continuous improvement junkie
Committed to my own and other’s growth
A problem solver
Commercially and Tech curious
Risk savvy
Pro-active
#GD4.4
5 days ago
Report job"
22,Data Quality Analyst,Macquarie Group Limited,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Our Financial Management Group has a unique opportunity for a Data Quality Analyst to help Macquarie make better data-driven decisions and deliver a more informed and agile Finance function. Sitting within the Data Operations and Data Quality team, you will be responsible for the proactive identification, assessment and resolution of data quality issues.
Working as a key member of the Data Quality team, you will lead efforts to continually improve the quality of data across finance platforms. Key duties and responsibilities will include:
Reconcile data across systems to resolve discrepancies
Contribute to data governance by escalating data quality issues and inconsistencies for assessment and remediation
Support governance of the internal control framework
Develop an intimate understanding of the flow of data through the organisation
Contribute to the design of the Macquarie data model and framework, having regard for business and regulatory drivers
Produce detailed documentation outlining data flows and processes
Work with IT to on board and embed tools that enable an analytical approach to data
Interrogate and investigate the Data Warehouse to deliver an improved reporting & analysis toolkit, supporting strategic decision- making across the broader organisation
Participate in process improvement reviews by making suggestions and contributing ideas
To be successful in this Data Quality Analyst role, you will need 1-3 years’ of relevant work experience, a passion for data quality and a high level of attention to detail. Other skills and requirements include:
A degree in statistics, maths, data analytics, or similar
Strong technical skills including familiarity with databases, data modelling, SQL, and analytics. Advanced Excel skills. Exposure to Alteryx is a bonus
The ability to concisely share your data insights in both the spoken and written form
Proven ability to work across all levels of stakeholders and build relationships quickly
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Previous experience within Finance and/or product knowledge of financial instruments would be highly regarded
Some understanding of Enterprise Data Management and data quality concepts would be desirable
This is a great opportunity for a Data Quality Analyst to join the team to deliver on a significant book of work that is crucial to the Group. In addition, the role will reward someone who can use their initiative to help drive maturity into the reporting functionality and deliver improvements within that space.
The Financial Management Group provides financial, tax and treasury services to all areas of Macquarie. The group is focused on providing strategic analysis and advice to Macquarie's businesses and senior management, managing Macquarie's funding, liquidity and capital position, ensuring Macquarie continues to meet regulatory and compliance obligations and managing Macquarie's corporate communications and investor relations.

Macquarie understands the importance of diversity and inclusion - our long history of success has come from being different. At Macquarie we value the innovation and creativity that diversity of thought brings. The one thing we all have in common is our focus on high performance. If you're capable, motivated and can deliver, we want you on our team.
We facilitate a range of flexible working arrangements within our teams. Talk to us about what flexibility may be available.

If you have any questions on this position, please feel free to reach out to me at maddy.wilson@macquarie.com

About Macquarie
A career at Macquarie means you’ll have the opportunity to develop and utilise new skills, explore interesting fields and do challenging work that will impact the lives of people around the world—whether it’s accelerating the green energy transition, helping sustain global food supplies, financing social housing projects or investing in essential infrastructure. At Macquarie, we’re empowering people to innovate and invest for a better future.
Our size and international presence means your work can take you anywhere—across business groups, disciplines, sectors and borders. With 16,300+ employees and offices in 31 markets around the world, we’re a truly global organisation.
You’ll be supported by a diverse team where the unique perspectives, ideas and experiences that all of our people bring are valued. You’ll be empowered to address unmet needs in our communities whilst advising and investing alongside our clients and partners. Working with us, you’ll have the opportunity to make a difference.
Macquarie is a global financial group providing clients with asset management, retail and business banking, wealth management, leasing and asset financing, market access, commodity trading, renewables development, investment banking and principal investment.

Job no: FMG-955450
Work type: Maximum term
Location: Sydney
Category: Junior, Accounting & Finance, Data & Analytics
Group: Financial Management Group
Division: FMG Central
Recruiter: Maddy Wilson
Opening Date: 02/12/2020
30+ days ago
Report job"
23,PRODUCT LIFECYCLE DATA ANALYST,McCormick,Not shown,Palmwoods QLD,"PALMWOODS, QLD, AU, 4555
Product Lifecycle Data Analyst, McCormick Australia
Opportunity to work from Moorabbin, VIC or Palmwoods, QLD sites
Work with well known brands in one of Australia's best FMCG businesses
Make your mark whilst contributing to the McCormick long term plan
It's an exciting time to be in APZ - McCormicks growth region. Our business here is transforming in remarkable ways. From the rice and spice fields of India and South East Asia to Australia's herb farms, our mosaic of rich distinct cultures inspires the boldest of flavours. Our headquarters and TIC in Singapore, along with our new and transformed facilities in Thailand, India and Australia are powering our regional growth ambitions. Here you'll find a culture that celebrates the best of both; the energy of and pulse of a startup and the solid legacy of our McCormick brand. We're a region on the rise - bold, committed and hungry - so only changemakers need apply!
Reporting to the Commercialisation Manager within the Marketing department, this role is responsible for the build of product master data utilizing SAP & QAD to support all business functions; and to review, improve and develop product lifecycle processes to assist the business to better utilize SAP and QAD. Liaising with many departments and key subject matter experts, this role will be responsible for the deletion and change of all materials/products both current and new. Initially you would be capturing all available data within internal systems for future interfacing and E-commerce.
Our Company
What if there was a company who puts people first - people who take what they do seriously, but not themselves? People who strive for excellence, have a great attitude, care for the safety of each other and our consumers, people who are innovative and lead by example - because these are the values necessary for a successful career with McCormick Australia.
McCormick’s Passion for Flavour is brought to life through our consumer brands Gourmet Garden, Keen’s, Aeroplane, French’s and Frank’s. But more than this, we are passionate about our people and our supportive, high performance culture - that’s what it takes to build Australia’s Leading Flavour Company!
Ongoing training will lead into being a SAP super user, and key subject matter expert for E-commerce functions within the business. Working with all relevant departments, sites, and divisions within the business to capture data to support E-commerce. Challenge and question data with subject matter experts as required.
The ideal candidate will have a solid understanding of end to end business processes and how master data impacts and affects these processes, as well as general knowledge of retail industry useful for understanding and evaluating data.
Role Responsibilities
Delete and change all SAP and QAD master data items, for the complete lifecycle of the product
Participate in new product development processes to ensure all data is captured by subject matter experts to support B2B and B2C processes
Ensure integrity of data for EDI, B2B and B2C information interfaces, including regular audit reports
Support with GSX for new customers progressing on the EDI platform
Communicate to other departments as data is required or requires changing and action such as deletions, exposure and financial impact
Technical Skills & Experience Required
High attention to detail
Intermediate to advanced excel
Exceptional cross functional communication skills
Ability to adapt to the agile needs of the business
Ability to understand change management (for when the position progresses to SAP global integration)
Ability to make/grow internal relationships and influencing skills to meet timelines
This role requires a sophisticated level of problem-solving capability and the ability to think a problem through from end to end. With the B2B environment still evolving, the ability to research and propose solutions that may not currently be in use is critical, whether this is through utilizing the existing data better or developing new processes.
We are seeking someone who has a methodical and considered approach.
Our ambitions are bold. If you are a change-maker with a passion for flavour and an appetite for a good challenge, come have a seat at our table. Your application will be treated in strict confidence.
McCormick is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. If you are a qualified applicant, you will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, colour, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.
4 days ago
Report job"
24,"Business Analyst, Data Governance and Management",Cancer Institute (NSW),"$114,076 - $130,047 a year",Sydney NSW,"Employment Type: Permanent Full Time
Position Classification: Health Manager Level 3
Remuneration: $114,076 - $130,046 per annum, excluding superannuation
Hours Per Week: 38
Requisition ID: REQ214249
Be part of an organisation that makes a difference in cancer control in NSW
Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander peoples are encouraged to apply
Exciting opportunity for an experienced Business Analyst to join a team specialising in data management

Where you’ll be working
The Cancer Institute NSW is the NSW Government’s cancer control agency, established to lessen the impact of cancer across the state.
Working at the Cancer Institute NSW means joining a team of committed and dedicated staff who are proud to be a part of the Institute’s purpose of overseeing and accelerating the effectiveness of cancer control in NSW.

The Cancer Institute is a collaborative working environment that encourages diversity and inclusion in how we work and the way we work together. Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander peoples are strongly encouraged to apply. Greater consideration will be given to suitable applicants, in order to improve access to employment and career opportunities (GSE Rule 26)

What you will be doing
You will have demonstrated experience in eliciting business and technical requirements and maintaining documentation received from internal and external stakeholders. You will drive the integration of datasets into the Institute-wide data warehouse using a consistent corporate approach.

This is a multifaceted role providing business and technical knowledge, expertise and advice to inform management decision making. The role includes being the lead in integrating user feedback, policy changes, evolving business needs, system upgrades and schema/ETL changes into the Screening and Prevention data architecture.
For your application to be considered
To submit your application, please provide:
Your resume (maximum five pages)
A covering letter addressing the Essential Requirements, as outlined below
A response to the Pre-screening Questions, as outlined below.
Essential requirements
Tertiary qualifications in health information management, business, computer science, information technology or related discipline or demonstrated equivalent professional experience and training
Demonstrated experience in working with large scale datasets, preferably in a complex health environment
Demonstrated experience with SQL Server and data warehousing
Demonstrated experience in stakeholder management including negotiating and influencing to achieve positive outcomes
Understanding of the NSW Health Records and Information Privacy Act and other relevant legislation.

Pre-screening question
Please outline your experience and what your role was in any data remediation/management project or activity?
Please explain where you have lead integration of user feedback, policy changes, evolving business needs, system upgrades or schema/ETL changes into any form of data architecture.

Interested?
Need more information?


2) Find out more about applying for this position


For more information about the Cancer Institute NSW please visit www.cancer.nsw.gov.au. For role related queries or questions contact Victor Kapruziak on Victor.Kapruziak@health.nsw.gov.au

Applications Close: Sunday, 28 February 2021 at 11.30 pm.

All Cancer Institute roles are based at St Leonards.
The CORE+4 Values define what is important to the Cancer Institute NSW and our employees.
Our values are: Collaboration, Openness, Respect, Empowerment, Strategic, Supportive, Innovative and Flexible.

The Cancer Institute NSW is unable to offer salary packaging. Salaries will be negotiated commensurate to experience and qualifications of the role.

The Cancer Institute NSW welcomes applications from Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander people, people from diverse cultural backgrounds and people with disabilities. Stepping Up aims to assist Aboriginal job applicants by providing information about applying for roles in NSW Health. For more information please visit www.steppingup.health.nsw.gov.au.

Please indicate if you have any accessibility requirements in your application or speak with the contact person should you be called for an interview. We provide reasonable adjustment for people with a disability during the recruitment process and during their employment.

To be eligible for permanent appointment to a position in NSW Health, you must have Australian citizenship or permanent Australian residency.
NSW Public Service Commission
1 day ago
Report job"
25,Business Intelligence Analyst,HelloFresh,Not shown,Chippendale NSW,"About HelloFresh
Here at HelloFresh, we're passionate about bringing dinner inspiration to everyday Australians. With 8 years of service under our belt, we are the market leader in the growing world of meal kit delivery services, operating in 14 different countries.
As we continue to deliver fresh, seasonal ingredients and delicious, wholesome recipes to our customers, we see our inspired community of empowered home-cooks continue to grow, and you could be a part of it!
Are you energetic and motivated with a team focus? Do you thrive in a dynamic, high-growth environment? If you're looking for a role that lets you make an impact every single day, we'd love to hear from you.
Job description
We are looking for a Junior Business Intelligence Analyst to be part of our Analytics team, whose objective is to help continue the ongoing HelloFresh growth!
Reporting through to the Head of Analytics:
You will...
Provide analytics on a variety of growth and marketing topics, including customer acquisition, marketing mix, retention and monetisation.
Improve our analytics capability: identify inefficiencies and gaps within our analytics process and work to streamline and improve the way the team operates.
Exemplify best practice: develop processes, analysis methodologies and dashboards to increase efficiency and consistency within the wider growth functions.
Enable data-driveness for better decisions making: create innovative solutions that enable colleagues to easily track, report and identify trends and opportunities.
Identify growth opportunities: analyse business performance to identify opportunities to invest marketing budget more efficiently.
You have/ are...
Excellent analytical skills, including working with large data sets
Excellent knowledge of Google Sheets/Excel, SQL (Tableau is a plus)
Working knowledge of Python (or R) and a willingness to become an expert
Strong organisational skills with a proven ability to manage multiple projects and deadlines
An aspiration to drive optimal decision making and maximum productivity
A logical way of working and high attention to detail
The ability to document findings in a clear and concise way, and present them to key stakeholders
An analytical degree; experience in analytics, data science or marketing is a plus
Passion for HelloFresh and the desire to be part of an extremely fast-paced business
What You'll Get In Return...
Heavily discounted HelloFresh boxes
High level of responsibility from day one
A position designed with room for evolution
Working with a fun, energetic and supportive team
Start date: Immediately - Can wait notice period
Duration: Full time role. You must have the right to work full-time in Australia.
Location: Chippendale Head Office - currently partly working from home
We are committed to building and nurturing an inclusive community for our employees. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender identity, sexual orientation, disability, age or other legally protected status.
To put it simply, everyone is welcome at our table.
30+ days ago
Report job"
26,Senior Data Analyst,Department of Education,"$122,038 a year",Sydney NSW,"Senior Data Analyst
Duration: Temporary full-time appointment for a period up 27 January 2022 with the possibility of extension.
Dynamic, energetic and flexible work environment

Clerk level grade 9/10, plus employer’s contribution to superannuation and annual leave loading.

An exciting opportunity exists for a Senior Data Analyst to use your analytical expertise and excellent communication skills. We're looking for a person with resilience, flexibility and initiative, in particular the ability to interact well with all stakeholders. The successful applicant will undertake a wide range of research and analysis functions including communicating analysis and advice, as part of the Teaching Quality and Impact team.
About the Department of Education
We ensure young children get the best start in life by supporting and regulating the early childhood
education and care sector. are the largest provider of public education in Australia with responsibility for
delivering high-quality public education to two-thirds of the NSW student population.
For more information please visit NSW Department of Education.

About the Learning Improvement Group
Learning Improvement Group commissions, develops and delivers programs that improve educational standards, the quality of teaching and learning in NSW schools, and provides support for children and students.
We are responsible for:
Maximising access, inclusion and wellbeing of students in education P-12, through oversight of relevant school policies and by commissioning programs or strategic partnerships with other agencies and service providers.
Developing and monitoring policies and advice that require teachers to use evidence-based practice and achieve high professional standards in the delivery of curriculum, assessment and reporting.
Developing evidence-based programs, professional learning and instructional resources to build the capability of teachers and school leaders and delivering improvement at scale through local support to groups of teachers or tailored to schools and principal networks.
Monitoring, supporting and regulating early childhood education services in NSW, working to ensure the delivery of quality early education for children from birth up to and including school age.
About the role
This role identifies major reports, evaluations and initiatives where extensive data analysis is required to inform the development of directions of the Quality Teaching and Impact unit.
The role is also accountable for managing and analysing data using the Salesforce platform and database systems to contribute to key projects. Support the delivery of sound and evidence-based recommendations through the application of advanced analytical and quantitative problem-solving skills.
Manage the operation of the CSAW Salesforce platform including the resolution of issues to ensure the reliable operation by the more than 700 users
Conduct valid and reliable analysis and resource of data to support the delivery of sound and evidence-based recommendations through the application of advanced analytical and quantitative problem-solving skills
Prepare reports and documentation based on information synthesised from complex data sources using advanced data analysis and reporting techniques
Build effective working relationships and work collaboratively with stakeholders, internal and external clients and other business partners to access data, products and advice and improve the quality control of data collection
Undertake and manage data requests as required and directed for the Strategic Delivery and Delivery Support services
Ensure data integrity and quality control are embedded within service delivery teams using the platform
Coordinate data management activities, data collection, processing, high quality control and documentation are delivered on time and to the required standard
Support the evaluation of key project initiatives through data analysis to identify accomplishments and areas of continuous improvement
Managing the Salesforce relationship and changes to the platform for the effective operation of Strategic Services Tailored Support.

How to apply
The NSW Department of Education is committed to a diverse and inclusive workforce as an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) employer. We encourage diverse applicants from a range of backgrounds to apply for roles in the department.

To be considered for this role, you must include:
a one page cover letter
a resume (no longer than 5 pages)

For enquiries about this role, contact Jordi Austin, Director, School Performance North, Department of Education, at 0436 807 005 or by email to jordi.austin@det.nsw.edu.au.

If you are progressed to interview you will need to provide the following documents and your employment may be subject to the Department’s Nationally Coordinated Criminal History Check to determine your suitability for employment.

Please note: If you are progressed to interview, you will be required to provide your proof of identity information and complete an INFORMED CONSENT declaration.

Note: A recruitment pool may be created through this recruitment process. A recruitment pool is a group of applicants who have been assessed and identified as suitable for this role or similar roles, and who may be considered for a range of similar roles, including temporary, term or ongoing roles, over the next 12 months.
ESSENTIAL REQUIREMENTS
Knowledge of and commitment to the Department's Aboriginal education policies (Please find Aboriginal Education Review – Information)
Working with children check for paid employment


Pre-Screening Questions
Tell me about a time when you were required to implement an IT solution to a variety of stakeholders with different technical abilities. How did you go about planning the implementation? What was the outcome? (Max 400 words)
How have you helped your manager to promote a positive attitude in the team? Give an example. (Max 400 words)
NSW Public Service Commission
13 days ago
Report job"
27,Risk Analyst,Prospa,"$90,000 - $96,000 a year",Darlinghurst NSW,"Prospa has established itself as a clear #1 online lender to small businesses in Australia and current growth trajectories see the business continuing to invest in its rapidly growing team, currently over 200 strong. This represents a unique opportunity to join us, one of Australia's most exciting and fastest-growing Fintech businesses with an awesome culture.
We are driven by our people. Their diversity, skills and passion are the foundation of what we deliver to our customers – where employees are dedicated to achieving stellar results and exceeding customer expectations. Our values: obsess about customers; deliver value fast; day 1; simplicity; be bold, open and real; and one team, inform how we think and act every day. We are also recognised as an AON Hewitt Best Employer in 2017 and 2018 FINNIES Best Fintech Place to Work and a Great Place to Work in 2019!
The role
Prospa is a growing business looking for someone with a strong econometric background who can apply their knowledge in a small business lending context. As a Risk Analyst, you will be asked to build and maintain models and risk settings within the risk analytics scope. These will include, but not limited to, behavioural models & forecast models. You will be given the responsibility to take a business problem, research the best solution using your economic knowledge, ensure the model is fit for purpose and then present solution back to a variety of stakeholders. In addition, the role requires inclusive collaboration inclusively across the business.
What you will be doing
Use your econometric knowledge to explore models that perform well across industry, risk profile & socioeconomic groups and continue to adapt to changing economic environment and portfolio strategy
Modeling within the team’s scope:
Behavioural models: using relationships to economic variables & customer’s payment behaviour to predict their payment behaviour
Budget models: using forecasted macroeconomic variables and anticipated portfolio strategy for Prospa’s annual budget
Identify latest economic policy changes and understand how these impact the small business sector and consequently Prospa’s portfolio/models
Recommend strategies for deployment into the Prospa Credit Decision Engine and portfolio management
Present analysis and findings to a variety of stakeholders
Collaborate across the broader business to communicate how risk impacts their activities.
What you'll need to succeed
3 + years of experience in a econometric modelling
Passionate about unsecured SME / personal lending
Strong knowledge of at least one of the following;
Forecast modelling for economic scenario testing & budgeting
Behavioural modelling
Able to analyse economic trends in order to generate insights for portfolio management
Ability to work independently, generate ideas, and challenge the status quo
Ability to communicate findings to a variety of stakeholders
An understanding of the consumer or small business lending process
Ability to apply your quantitative background in the “real world” economic environment (e.g. unemployment, interest rates etc)
Databricks / R / Python / SAS / MATLAB programming or similar experience with a keen interest in learning new technologies
What's nice to have
An undergraduate econometric, postgraduate study
Come and Join Our Team
If you can see yourself at Prospa and feel you can contribute to the ongoing success of our company, please hit ‘apply’.
We embrace diversity in our people and our thinking and provide a collaborative, inclusive, innovative and respectful environment. We celebrate who you are, recognise & reward great achievements, and actively provide our people the same great experience we provide our customers.
We are committed to being an equal opportunities employer and we never discriminate on the basis of race, religion, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, age, marital or disability status.
Salary on offer is between $90,000 to $96,000 plus super based on experience.
With the greatest respect CVs will not be accepted from recruitment agencies at this time.
11 days ago
Report job"
28,Technical Analyst - Data,Macquarie Group Limited,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Join a high performing Data Team and collaborate on a portfolio of Capital related projects within Macquarie’s Financial Management Group.
A great opportunity for you to bring your experience as a Technical Analyst to work on a significant Macquarie program. Using your strong background in translation of business requirements into technical requirements you will be key to driving this project to completion.
Working as part of a team you will complete detailed technical documentation for all data requirements delivered from the Business Analyst and in conjunction with the Data Subject Matter Experts. In doing this, you will work collaboratively with relevant groups to deliver the project, developing and implementing appropriate solutions. In addition, you will input into the development and delivery of a test strategy requiring the alignment of numerous systems and data feeds.
You will have extensive technical analysis experience in complex projects coupled with the ability to coordinate multiple assignments and work independently. You will have the ability and poise to maintain stakeholder satisfaction when faced with competing priorities, as well as the ability to motivate and influence project stakeholders.
If you are motivated by the opportunity to work in a high performing team in a fast-paced environment, we would like to hear from you.
You will bring the following experience:
three or more years of experience in technical business analyst roles
excellent knowledge of SQL, data warehousing principles and methods
exposure to analytics, visualisation and big data platforms such as Alteryx and Power BI and Cloudera / Hadoop
domain knowledge in treasury or regulatory reporting is ideal, although candidates with other relevant experience are encouraged to apply
excellent academic results and relevant professional qualifications.
About the Financial Management Group
The Financial Management Group provides financial, tax and treasury services to all areas of Macquarie. The group is focused on providing strategic analysis and advice to Macquarie's businesses and senior management, managing Macquarie's funding, liquidity and capital position, ensuring Macquarie continues to meet regulatory and compliance obligations and managing Macquarie's corporate affairs.
Our commitment to Diversity and Inclusion
The diversity of our people is one of our greatest strengths, and in combination with our inclusive environment, it enables us to deliver innovative and sustainable outcomes for our people, clients, shareholders and communities. From day one, you'll be encouraged to be yourself and supported to perform at your best. If our purpose of ‘empowering people to innovate and invest for a better future’ is as inspiring to you as it is to us, please apply. With the right technology, support and resources, our people can work in a range of flexible ways.
We are committed to providing a working environment that embraces and values diversity and inclusion. We encourage candidates to speak with a member of our recruitment team if you require adjustments to our recruitment process to support you, and the type of working arrangements that would help you thrive.

About Macquarie
A career at Macquarie means you’ll have the opportunity to develop and utilise new skills, explore interesting fields and do challenging work that will impact the lives of people around the world—whether it’s accelerating the green energy transition, helping sustain global food supplies, financing social housing projects or investing in essential infrastructure. At Macquarie, we’re empowering people to innovate and invest for a better future.
Our size and international presence means your work can take you anywhere—across business groups, disciplines, sectors and borders. With 16,300+ employees and offices in 31 markets around the world, we’re a truly global organisation.
You’ll be supported by a diverse team where the unique perspectives, ideas and experiences that all of our people bring are valued. You’ll be empowered to address unmet needs in our communities whilst advising and investing alongside our clients and partners. Working with us, you’ll have the opportunity to make a difference.
Macquarie is a global financial group providing clients with asset management, retail and business banking, wealth management, leasing and asset financing, market access, commodity trading, renewables development, investment banking and principal investment.

Job no: FMG-956051
Work type: Full time
Location: Sydney
Category: Mid-level, Data & Analytics
Group: Financial Management Group
Division: FMG Central
Recruiter: Chloe Lee
Opening Date: 01/2/2021
14 days ago
Report job"
29,BUSINESS INTELLIGENCE DATA MODELER,University of Melbourne,"$105,684 - $114,389 a year",Parkville VIC,"Job no: 0051888
Work type: Continuing
Location: Parkville
Division/Faculty: Chief Operating Officer Portfolio
Department/School: Operational Performance Group
Salary: $105,684 - $114,389 (UOM 8)
Role & Superannuation rate: Professional - Full time - 17% super
In 2021 The University of Melbourne has embarked on the Professional Services Redesign (PSR) to enable services improvement and more effective ways of working. This opportunity has been newly created as part of the PSR.
About Operational Performance Group
The Operational Performance Group delivers functions that facilitate the design, evaluation, and improvement of services across the University, and business partnering services to Chancellery.
About the role
As the Business Intelligence (BI) Data Modeler, you will undertake the following activities to create and maintain a data blueprint for the University’s Data Assets (Data Warehouse, Enterprise Reporting System and Data Lake):
Providing project teams and developers detailed data models to guide their development activities.
Ensuring consistency across all data domains and data models.
Developing and maintaining coding and naming standards.
Working with IT application and project teams to ensure their reporting requirements meet agreed architectural principles and patterns.
Assisting with technical designs and development as required.
Resolution of data issues.
Assisting in root cause analysis of any data issues.
About you
You are a proactive individual who works well within a team environment, while also seeking tasks and working independently where required. You are a strong communicator, both written and verbal, with excellent attention to detail.
You will further have:
A bachelor’s degree in Information Technology, Business or an equivalent combination of relevant experience and education/training.
In-depth experience working as a BI data modeler within a large and complex data warehouse environment and in creating strategic and operational data designs.
Experience working with diverse teams of technology professionals.
Experience working with Oracle based technology.
Benefits
Maximise your benefits through our Salary Packaging scheme
Flexible family friendly policies, providing generous leave and working conditions
The opportunity to work in a culturally rich environment
A substantial discount to eligible staff and their immediate families in undertaking further studies at the University of Melbourne
To find out more, go to http://about.unimelb.edu.au/careers/staff-benefits
Culture
The University is a vibrant campus. We have well-established clubs and networks giving the opportunity to engage and collaborate with other staff around the University. We strive to create an environment where staff and students promote culturally inclusive behaviour and activities, ensure cultural differences are heard and explored, and actively seek to learn from other cultures.
How to apply
Your application submitted should include a cover letter (one page) outlining your motivation to apply for this role and describing what skills and experience you will bring to it. Please further attach a current version of your CV.
Please note that you are not expected to provide detailed responses against the selection criteria in the .
Staff in the redeployment pool will be considered for this role in the first instance where appropriate.

Advertised: 17 Feb 2021 12:05 AM AUS Eastern Daylight Time
Applications close: 03 Mar 2021 11:55 PM AUS Eastern Daylight Time
Today
Report job"
30,Junior Business Analyst,The Project Lab,"$57,000 - $62,000 a year",Hobart TAS,"The Project Lab is a consulting and advisory firm that bases its services on management consulting principles. We help our clients build and grow; understand; and change their organisations to ensure they are high performing and remain sustainable, compliant and relevant. Our core focus is on the outcome regardless of what service we are providing, or how it is being provided e.g., solving complex problems, identifying opportunities for growth, ensuring compliance, or guiding through change.
For further information about The Project Lab visit www.theprojectlab.com.
About You
As a Junior Consultant (Business Analysis) you must have a desire to extend your work experience and academic learnings into business value. As someone building on their career, your passion and drive to succeed will be noticeable and your inquisitive mind will generate an endless supply of meaningful questions and offer up fresh ideas. You understand and practise active listening to absorb the wisdom of those more experienced than you. You will have a Masters degree in Business/IT or a related field and a minimum of 2 years' experience in business analysis or a related field.
You will be able to demonstrate your skills and experience in;
· working with not-for-profit organisations
· workshop facilitation, stakeholder engagement, and process mapping
· understanding customer experience specifically customer and user journey mapping
· using project management methodologies, principles and techniques
· using data and process modelling techniques
· influencing stakeholders and working closely with them to determine acceptable solutions
You will also have exceptional analytical and conceptual thinking skills, accuracy and multitasking skills.
About the Role
Based in Hobart, you will participate in many and varied areas of the business to undertake hands on consultancy company work. Product development, sales, and service delivery are areas you are likely to be supporting with your enthusiasm, writing skills, team-work and can-do attitude. You will attend meetings with clients to formulate and document business requirements, identify, investigate and analysis business procedures and work practices.
How to apply
Please email your CV and cover letter detailing why you are the perfect fit for us to by 15 March 2021.
Application Deadline: 15/03/2021
Expected Start Date: 01/04/2021
Job Types: Full-time, Permanent
Salary: $57,000.00 – $62,000.00 per year
Benefits:
Work from home
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
business analyst: 2 years (Preferred)
Education:
Masters Degree (Required)
Location:
Hobart TAS (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
No
COVID-19 Precaution(s):
Remote interview process
Social distancing guidelines in place
Virtual meetings
Sanitising, disinfecting or cleaning procedures in place
1 day ago
Report job"
31,Senior Data Analyst,Health System Support Group,"$113,735 - $129,658 a year",Sydney NSW,"COVID Public Health Response - Expression of Interest
Thank you for your interest in assisting the NSW Health with the COVID-19 response.
We have opportunities to assist the Epidemiology and Surveillance Team within the COVID Public Health Response based at St Leonards.
Who is eligible to express their interest?
To be eligible for employment in these roles you must be one of the following. You can only be offered employment in this role for the duration that your current visa allows you to work in Australia, and you can only be offered ongoing employment if you have a permanent visa that allows you to work in Australia:
an Australian Citizen, or
a permanent resident of Australia, or
a New Zealand citizen with a current New Zealand Passport, or
a citizen of another country with an appropriate visa that allows you to work in Australia
What will a COVID-19 Senior Data Analyst be doing?
The Data Analysis Team is responsible for a wide range of data management, data cleaning and preparation and reporting activities to support NSW’s public health response to the COVID-19 pandemic.
The COVID-19 Senior Data Analyst is located within the COVID Public Health Response responding to the COVID-19 Pandemic. The Senior Data Analyst will support the Team Leader in managing the Data Analysis Team, including providing mentorship for junior team members. The Senior Data Analyst will make a significant contribution to provision of high quality, reliable data for NSW Health and intergovernmental agencies through: managing the acquisition of COVID related data from a range of sources; guiding analysis and enhancement of data to provide reports and data visualisations; and considering strategic challenges in data acquisition and reporting in a high scrutiny environment.
Working time
The Response team is scheduled across 7 days a week over two shifts (8.30 am - 4 pm and 2.30 - 10 pm).
Remuneration
Classification: Health Manager Level 3
Salary range: $113,735.00 - $129,658.00
Hourly rate: $57.36 - $65.39

Key skills required
1. Post-graduate qualifications in epidemiology or biostatistics or equivalent in public health or related discipline and relevant experience.
2. Substantial experience in data management, analysis and reporting of health data.
3. Substantial experience with statistical packages such as SAS, Python or R.
4. Demonstrated experience in managing a team with ability to delegate effectively to achieve positive outcomes; demonstrated leadership skills with experience in developing the capability of a team, establishing, monitoring and ensuring achievement of clear performance objectives; coaching and advising staff, and fostering a collegial, professional work environment.
5. Highly developed communication, negotiation and interpersonal skills.
6. High level oral and written communication skills with demonstrated ability to prepare, review and edit correspondence, briefings, reports, research papers and project proposals, and able to interact effectively with staff, management and external stakeholders
Key accountabilities of the role
Manage the acquisition of COVID related data including preparation of data extracts.
Liaison with data providers, data users, subject matter experts and other stakeholders to ensure optimal use and translation of data.
Undertake and guide analysis and enhancement of data.
Prepare high quality data visualisations and other data products when requested.
Provide timely advice and response to data-related enquires from the COVID Public Health Response teams.
Consider and develop a response to strategic challenges in data acquisition and reporting in a high scrutiny environment.
Assist the Team Leaders with team leadership and management responsibilities.
Key challenges
Work under time pressure to tight deadlines
High attention to detail required
Evening and weekend work required
Apply appropriate analyses to complex data
Work across sometimes conflicting and/or contrasting requirements from different stakeholder groups
Match technical feasibility of data analyses with operational requirements
Things to consider when expressing interest:
Your availability will need to be across 7 days per week, for 5 shifts (morning and afternoon)
Weekend and/or evening work will be required
What do I need to provide?
Attach your current resume / curriculum vitae (CV) (maximum 5 pages) ONLY to the application
Complete the pre-screening questions on the application form.
Provide your availability including time frame/duration you are available.
2 x referees will need to be supplied prior to an offer being made.
Are you currently a NSW Government employee?
Current NSW Health, NSW Ministry of Health and NSW Government staff, must have their manager’s approval prior to expressing interest.
This will be an off-payroll arrangement for current Public Sector Staff, your agency can invoice NSW Health for salary expenses.
The team works on a shift work arrangement, you will be required to amend your working conditions to accommodate shift working.
Who will view my EOI?
Manager and Team leaders of COVID Publich Health Response teams may review your expression of interest.

Our Commitment to Diversity
NSW Health values diversity and is committed to building an inclusive workplace culture that reflects the community we serve. We encourage applications from diverse community groups including Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander people, LGBTIQ+, those with special needs and people from culturally and linguistically diverse backgrounds.

For any technical issues, contact Recruitment at HSSG-Recruitment@health.nsw.gov.au.

Please note that not everyone who expresses their interest will be called to work in the centres.
NSW Public Service Commission
30+ days ago
Report job"
32,Intelligence Analyst - High Risk Industries Operation,Department of Justice and Community Safety,"$87,640 - $99,438 a year",Melbourne City Centre VIC,"Utilise your experience delivering strategic or tactical intelligence to help drive the Victorian response to COVID-19
Fixed-term opportunity in the Victorian Public Service
VPS Grade 4: $87,640 - $99,438 per year, plus superannuation
What will the Intelligence Analyst do?
As the Intelligence Analyst, you will have the primary responsibility for undertaking the collection, recording, analysis and dissemination of information, with a specific focus on High Risk Industry Engagement and Enforcement to identify potential businesses and industries creating risks or threats, and prevent outbreaks. You will also provide intelligence which supports the Operation to engage with and support industry in its efforts to improve Covid-safety.
Within this role, you will be a member of a small team of Intelligence specialists who ensures the High Risk Industry Engagement and Enforcement team and its stakeholders are supported with the appropriate intelligence, information and data to undertake their duties. You will make informed assessments and predictions to support decision making through reporting on high risk industry operations and outbreaks.

Some of your duties will include:
Lead the collation, analysis, and controlled dissemination and reporting of intelligence to authorised parties, in a timely manner.
Prepare and present intelligence briefings, and make high quality recommendations including the identification and evaluation of emerging strategic risks, opportunities, patterns and trends.
Support management, staff and external agencies by participating in the development and planning of intelligence-led compliance operations, which may include both engagement and enforcement activities.
To learn more about this role before applying, please read the attached position description.
What's in it for you
To thrive in this role, you will be intrinsically motivated by the challenge of work that can change constantly and prove very difficult. You will call on your intellect and grit every day. You will take your responsibility to keep Victorians safe seriously and will be proud of a job well done.

Additionally, you will likely appreciate:
✔ Free access to mental health service – personal and confidential counselling support on personal and work-related issues.
✔A fair salary – enjoy great work conditions and salary sacrificing options for superannuation and motor vehicles.
✔Transparent performance framework – approach your work with confidence in how you're tracking, working to professional development plans with performance-based salary increases.
Click here to discover more benefits in working for the department.
If this job sounds like a challenge you would love to take on, then we encourage you to apply now.
The Department of Justice and Community Safety is continually working towards increasing our Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander (Aboriginal) workforce. The Aboriginal Employment Team aims to attract, recruit and retain Aboriginal staff in a number of roles, including those in management. This support includes a culturally appropriate attraction and recruitment process. To learn more, click here or email aboriginal.employment@justice.vic.gov.au.
Successful candidates will be required to undergo pre-employment checks which may include national police checks and misconduct screening.
Applications will be regularly reviewed up until the closing date, so please do not delay in submitting your application.
13 days ago
Report job"
33,Culinary Business Analyst,Compass Group Australia,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Compass Group is the world leader in hospitality and support services, employing more than 500,000 people across 50 countries who serve over 5 billion meals every year. Here in Australia we employ more than 14,000 people across 400 sites. Our core sectors are Business & Industry, Healthcare & Seniors, Education, Defence and Offshore & Remote.
Reporting to the National Culinary Manager, we’re looking for an exceptional Culinary Business Analyst to work in this highly visible and business facing position. This role requires someone who can engage with stakeholders at all levels to support our incredible National Culinary team. If you are a foodie with a passion for data, this is the role for you!
The Role:
Identifying data sources and the collection of data
Supporting the Business Development team with bid costings
Analysing data to find answers to specific questions
Supporting and developing national menu analytics and food cost analysis
Menu costing support for the national culinary team
Generating information and insights from data sets and identifying trends and patterns
Preparing reports and presentations for executive, project teams and client meetings
Creating visualisations of data
Identifying and mitigating potential risks
The Person:
A Bachelor’s degree in a relevant field
Experience working with and influencing senior decision makers
Experience handling and analysing complex, high volume data with excellent attention to detail
Presentation skills – ability to write and speak clearly to easily communicate complex idea in a way that is easy to understand
Extensive knowledge and experience of MS Office products, with advance Excel skills
The ability to work in a fast-paced environment with cross-functional teams
Ability to support site based personnel on remote mine sites during regular site visits
Ability to prioritise and manage conflicting deadlines
Excellent interpersonal and demonstrated facilitation skills
The Benefits
We place great importance on being an employer of choice and offer excellent career opportunities for high performers. As a large organisation we often have opportunities for career advancement, as well as opportunities to move within the business. We offer competitive salaries, recognition programs including individual and team awards, long service and company event days; site based benefits; and company discounts.
So, if you are a 'can-do' person, who thrives on new challenges; likes working in a team within a diverse environment; and consistently delivers to the highest quality, then you'll fit right in and we'd like to have you on our team.
2 days ago
Report job"
34,2021 Intern - Digital Media Marketing Analyst,Adobe,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Our Company

Changing the world through digital experiences is what Adobe’s all about. We give everyone—from emerging artists to global brands—everything they need to design and deliver exceptional digital experiences! We’re passionate about empowering people to create beautiful and powerful images, videos, and apps, and transform how companies interact with customers across every screen.

We’re on a mission to hire the very best and are committed to creating exceptional employee experiences where everyone is respected and has access to equal opportunity. We realize that new ideas can come from everywhere in the organization, and we know the next big idea could be yours!

The Opportunity
Adobe is hiring interns to join the team in 2021! The DMe (Digital Media) Marketing Analytics team is responsible for supporting the DMe Marketing Team through analysis of marketing performance, as well as measurement of, and research into, business and consumer trends which help inform marketing strategy. You will support the team in developing insights and perform analysis across a range of areas including Web Traffic and Conversion, and a variety of marketing activities including paid media, organic search, email, testing and more. We’re looking for someone who can identity and interpret data, has strong technical skills and possesses a strategic approach, is comfortable working in a fast-paced environment and can adapt to shifting conditions, priorities, and deadlines. You are meticulous, detail focused, and an ambitious self-starter
The role will be a valued member and provide vital support to the DMe CSMB A.com Marketing Team. This role is working across a 6-month fixed term basis and is suitable for those in their final year of study.
What you'll do:
Support in the development of weekly analysis, insights, and recommendations to the marketing team
Conduct ad hoc deep-dive analysis on marketing opportunities or problem areas
Support team to develop quarterly forecasting of marketing performance
Maintain marketing dashboards
Observe and evaluate trends of marketing efforts and business results
Provide data visualizations and reports to marketing team and management
Support in the development of weekly and quarterly reporting updates to internal partners.
Stay on the cutting edge of industry standard methodologies, trends, and new technologies
The ideal candidate for this position has:
Be in the final year of relevant academic studies in marketing, communications, business or related fields
Able to work a minimum of 4 days per week for six months
Work experience in a data analyst role, or a technology or ecommerce business
Analytical skills, including ability to conduct research, analysing data and developing hypotheses
Proficiency in Excel (pivot-tables, V-lookups, graphics)
Experience using Adobe Analytics or similar analytics platform
Experience using other analytics/dashboard platforms like Tableau, Microsoft BI, Datorama etc
Time management and project management skills.
Ability to work collaboratively with a team members and internal partners.
Ability to communicate ideas (verbally and in writing)
30+ days ago
Report job"
35,"Data Analyst - Product, Features, & Growth",Canva,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"At Canva, we’re transforming the way the world designs, and we need you to help us transform the way we use data to achieve that goal. The mountains of data are large, but our data team is small, and we’re looking to change that.
Our product has grown by over 25 times in the last 2 years, and we now have 10s of millions of users generating enormous quantities of data every day. To help us fuel our future growth and help even more users, we need to better understand our data - this is where we need your help.
Our Analytics folks manage huge volumes of data in order to help our friends in other teams to build the right product. You’ll be coming into a diverse team of people who really do enjoy finding answers to the problems that the business and our users have. We can often be found chatting about all the latest trends in data and how we can apply them at Canva. We’re looking forward to growing the team and gaining a range of new perspectives and ideas on how we can do things better.
Role Responsibilities
Help us understand both Canva and our customers - we want you to be creative and insightful, rather than just throwing the usual metrics at the wall to see what sticks
Suggest, set up, and run interesting experiments that will actually move our metrics - when we push tests to 100% we want to actually see the bump in the relevant graph
Build and maintain dashboards for our product teams, and make them look really good - you don’t need to be a designer or have any design talent, you just need to want to build things that look cool
Use our giant databases to answer the sort of questions that sound really simple but turn out to be challenging (and fun!)
Help us extend data literacy and curiosity throughout the whole company
Required Skills & Experience
Experience with very large data sets - if you’re familiar with that sinking feeling that your computer doesn’t have quite enough RAM for what you’re trying to do, then you’ll be at home here
Strong competency with SQL; experience with big data SQL Query Engines like Presto, Hive, or Impala is a plus!
Experience wrangling and analyzing data using Python or R
Experience with optimising AARRR funnels, A/B Testing and building dashboards that effectively communicate results and outcomes
A grounding in mathematics / statistics and a bachelor's degree in a STEM area is preferred; but not required
Strong communication skills - verbal and written - be able to break down complex topics into simple solutions and ideas
Company Benefits
Competitive salary, plus equity options
Flexible working hours, we value work-life balance
In-house chefs that cook delicious breakfast and lunch for us each day
Free Yoga membership
Generous parental leave policy
Pet friendly offices including a garden, climbing wall, unisex toilets
Sponsored social clubs and team events
Fun and quirky celebrations
Relocation budget provided for interstate or overseas candidates
One of our core values at Canva, “Being a force for good” means we are actively working towards a world that isn't just good for a small few, but one that’s good for everyone. We believe deeply that bringing together diversity of thoughts, perspectives and expression is key for building the best product for our equally diverse community. To achieve this, we need to constantly work towards making Canva the best place to work, for everyone.
Want to experience Canva for yourself?
Check out what life is like at Canva on Instagram.
Check out what our users are saying about us on Twitter.
Learn how we work from Dave, our CTO
Get to know our Chef, Chris
Meet our CEO, Melanie
Finally, give Canva a go!
If you're a passionate data analyst seeking a truly challenging opportunity with one of the world's premier technology companies, then apply now to start the discussion with us!
We will not accept or review any CVs from external recruitment agencies.
30+ days ago
Report job"
36,Technical Business Analyst - Data Delivery,Hays,Not shown,Sydney Central Business District NSW,"Permanent opportunity for a Technical BA to work in a Big 4 Bank!

Your new company
One of the largest financial services providers in Sydney, which offers multiple products across the domestic market, is looking to recruit a Technical Business Analyst to be part of their Group-wide Technology and Data team. Its purpose is to provide Data Delivery to multiple simultaneous projects in different areas and businesses of the bank.


Your new role
You will work closely with the data delivery team to deploy data management enablement tools and provide support to the different portfolios, while acting as a bridge between the technical teams and the business to facilitate accurate and appropriate decisions being made. You will be working together with stakeholders to understand their needs and concerns and document the current and proposed state in order to identify improvements and develop requirements.


What you'll need to succeed
Strong data analysis experience
Strong SQL skills
Financial Services background
Experience with Big data platforms
Experience engaging with the business side and working with different stakeholders
Previous experience working in data migration or separation projects will be highly regarded
Swift system knowledge will be highly regarded



What you'll get in return
You will receive a competitive salary and work as a permanent employee for a leading Financial Services organization. You'll be offered flexible working arrangements and exciting career progression opportunities, while working in an ideal Sydney CBD location!


What you need to do now
If you're interested in this role, click 'apply now' to forward an up-to-date copy of your CV, or send it to lucia.turner@hays.com.au.
If this job isn't quite right for you but you are looking for a new position, please contact us for a confidential discussion on your career.

SA Licence number : LHS 297508
18 days ago
Report job"
37,Data Analyst - Home Loans,ANZ Banking Group,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Requisition Title -
Data Analyst - Home Loans
Job Number: - AUS125413
Description

Job Title: Data Analyst
Location: Docklands, Melbourne

Help shape the future as we leverage data to flip traditional banking on its head
Get stuck into our huge data sets to create solutions for our customers
Join a progressive organisation with the people and policies you want
At ANZ our purpose is to shape a world where people and communities thrive and to achieve this, we need a talented Data Analyst to join our Home Loans Tribe. Are you passionate about driving great outcomes for customers? Could your skills and passion help us drive innovation and critical remediation work for the Home Loans Tribe? Are you a team player who loves to uplift the capability of our Home Loans data chapter? We need someone like you to join our squad
Our data analysts deeply understand the power of data to generate quality customer insights, manage information and identify trends to accelerate sound business decisions.
Your skillset will enable you to source and interrogate data, working with a focus on the future, with an active understanding of industry trends to ensure capability development is aligned. You will influence strategic direction by translating insights into practical business recommendations, communicating team objectives and presenting data in digestible, logical and compelling ways.
What a typical day might look like
Assist in sourcing, extracting and analysing data from multiple systems, applications, products and processes
Interpret data into insights, identify patterns and trends in the dataset to communication findings to project SME’s and other stakeholders
Communication to stakeholders and senior management to influence squad priorities
Perform calculations and apply critical thinking to determine root cause analysis
Assist in reports preparation based on analysis and presenting to management
What will likely be in your toolkit?
Hands-on experience with data processing platforms, tools and techniques:
SQL (mandatory & proficient)
Traditional database management platforms (e.g. Oracle, Teradata, EBD)
Scripting in Python, R, Pyspark (advantageous)
Innovation and problem solving skills
Good communication and presentation skills.
Hands-on knowledge and experience in the use of Jira, Confluence and Git.
Strong stakeholder engagement skills across various levels of the organisation.
A strong execution mindset and ability to deliver quality outputs and manage actions within required timeframes.
Critical thinking skills allowing you to question and investigate root cause analysis
Knowledge of Home Loan products, processes and system knowledge would be beneficial
You’re not expected to have 100% of these skills. At ANZ a growth mindset is at the heart of our culture and we actively encourage people to try new things. So if this role interests you and you feel you have most of these things in your toolbox, we’d love to hear from you.

About ANZ
We’re reinventing the way we do banking, and our community of collaborative, innovative thinkers who create human centred solutions are helping us get there. We’re responding faster to changing customer requirements, focusing on the things that matter and helping people achieve incredible things – be it buying their home, building a business or saving for things big or small.
We support our people by providing a range of flexible working options so they can work in the way that best suits them. We encourage you to talk to us about your need for flexibility and any adjustments you may require to our recruitment process or the role itself.
We’ll also offer you the opportunity to develop your career, working in a diverse and inclusive workplace where the different backgrounds, perspectives and life experiences of our people are celebrated and create a great place to grow, thrive and belong.
Interested in joining us? Click Apply now, or visit www.anz.com/careers to find out more or view other opportunities.
Reference number AUS125413
#GD4.4
5 days ago
Report job"
38,Business Analyst,Department of Customer Service,"$90,661 - $106,888 a year",Sydney NSW,"Business Analyst
Full Time Ongoing
Location – Sydney - McKell
SNSW Grade 7/8 - base salary starting at $90,661

About Service NSW
Service NSW is making it easier for people and businesses across NSW to access government services.

Since launching in July 2013, we have successfully transformed and streamlined NSW Government service delivery with cutting edge digital solutions and an award-winning culture of passion and teamwork.

Our customer-centric solution offers simpler and faster access to government transactions through our digital channels, a 24/7 phone service and an expanding network of Service Centres.

We currently partner with more than 50 agencies to offer in excess of 1,000 NSW Government transactions including driver licences, vehicle registration renewals, applications for birth certificates, Senior Cards, Housing NSW payments, fines, contractor licences and many more.

Your remuneration
SNSW Grade 7/8- The package includes the base salary range of $90,661 to $106,888, plus employer's contribution to superannuation and annual leave loading.

Opportunity
We are looking for a Business Analyst role to join our team. This role supports the Project Manager and Senior Business Analyst and requires an understanding of the importance of high value customer service delivery. Contact Centre experience desired but not essential.

To be successful in the role you as a Business Analyst, you will require:

Analytical and problem-solving skills that can be applied to any business or technical area without detailed knowledge of that area
Be detail-oriented and capable of delivering a high level of accuracy
Take responsibility for delivering high quality customer focused services
Very good interpersonal and consultative skills
Very good communication skills, both oral and written and the ability to communicate complex problems in a way the audience can understand.
A can-do attitude and be willing to have a go

The key accountabilities for the Business Analyst include:

Assist with discovery activities including development of customer journey maps, and service blueprints and customer research
Development of process maps
Data analysis and presentation of findings
Work closely and support the Senior Business analyst to produce key deliverables on the projects
Assist the project manager to complete project artefacts including scope definition, options analysis, steering committee packs, prepare of presentation packs, pilot planning, showcases and go-live support

Please note that employment at Service NSW is subject to a satisfactory Criminal Records Check.

Applications Close: Wednesday 3rd March @ 10.59am

When applying you need to:
Provide a covering letter and resume (Resume not exceeding 5 pages) that details your experience and how you meet the capabilities of the role.

Want to know more?
For a confidential discussion about this role or the Service NSW recruitment process, please contact at Kannan Iyer at Kannan.iyer@customerservice.nsw.gov.au

Additional information
Part of the assessment process includes additional online capability testing, skills testing or work samples in accordance with the Government Sector Employment Act 2013. A talent pool may be created for future ongoing and temporary roles and is valid for a period of up to 12 months. Employment to Service NSW is subject to a satisfactory national criminal record check.

Service NSW is passionate about building a culture that values and supports diversity and inclusion. Service NSW encourages applications from people with disability, Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islanders, LGBTQI and people from culturally and linguistically diverse backgrounds. If you are a person with disability and need adjustment in the recruitment process, please contact the Recruitment team via email on CSrecruitment@customerservice.nsw.gov.au.
NSW Public Service Commission
Today
Report job"
39,Data Integrity Analyst,The University of Queensland,"$80,784 - $86,768 a year",St Lucia QLD,"The role is responsible for enhancing data integrity within the Advancement CRM (Raiser’s Edge), in advance of the transition to a new CRM in 2022. The role has a strong focus on data configuration, and will be responsible for significantly enhancing the import of data sets to deliver enrichment of data.
This position is located at our picturesque St Lucia campus, renowned as one of Australia’s most attractive university campuses, and located just 7km from Brisbane’s city centre. Bounded by the Brisbane River on three sides, and with outstanding public transport connections, our 114-hectare site provides a perfect work environment – you can enjoy the best of both worlds: a vibrant campus with the tradition of an established university.
Our Ideal Candidate
Our ideal candidate will have experience and well-developed skills undertaking data analysis and optimising data integrity, ideally within an Advancement context, and will hold relevant qualifications.
You must have ongoing unrestricted work rights in Australia to apply for this opportunity.
We value diversity and inclusion, and actively encourage applications from those who bring diversity to the University. Our Diversity and Inclusion webpage contains further information if you require additional support. Accessibility requirements and/or adjustments can be directed to recruitment@uq.edu.au.
What We Can Offer
This is a full-time fixed term position at HEW level 6.
The full-time equivalent base salary will be in the range $80,784 to $86,768 per annum plus super of up to 17%.
You will be able to take advantage of UQ Sport Facilities, recreation leave loading (of 17.5%), salary sacrificing options, on-campus childcare, discounted private health insurance, cheap parking, development programs and many other benefits.
For further information, please review The University of Queensland's Enterprise Bargaining Agreement 2018-2021.

Questions?
To discuss this role please contact Kevin Owen, Manager, Business Solutions and Services at kevin.owen@uq.edu.au.
For application queries, please contact recruitment@uq.edu.au stating the job number in the subject line.
13 days ago
Report job"
40,Data and Analytics Strategist,Akcelo,$350 - $550 a day,Pyrmont NSW,"This role is positioned to manage the data strategy and analytics offering for Akcelo, and help better understand our customer behaviour with market leading data strategy, connection and insights.
Role requirements:
You are a Subject Matter Expert in all things analytics and have the ability to understand core practices from data collection/creation through to visualisation.
Responsibilities range from consulting through to developing data models, data visualisation, and analytics set-up.
Provide direction, insights and guidance and create roadmaps for current – and target state – data architectures, whilst empowering brands to build analytics capabilities over time.
Work with brands on the design, development, implementation, and maintenance of complex data systems and solutions
Ability to pivot from analytics platforms such as Google Analytics and Adobe Analytics, through to analytics skills such as R, SQL, and BI tools.
Constantly search for insights that drive real value to the client, turning data into actionable insights and programs of work.
Ability to communicate different analytics and attribution models, ranging from control groups across customer lifecycle campaigns, media spend attribution, and acquisition activities, through to App goals.
Identify opportunities to further expand and develop an account.
Manage the implementation of tagging solutions for a core analytics platforms, websites, mobile apps, DMP solutions, digital marketing, and other 3rd party tracking solutions.
Help brands build strong analytics capability and embed data and insights into client teams to identify opportunities and drive business growth.
Hands-on experience with Advanced Google Analytics implementation including custom dimensions, custom events, and Adobe Analytics
Strong experience working with Google Tag Manager
Minimum 5+ years' working experience with web analytics implementation
Contract length: 3 months
Application Deadline: 09/02/2021
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Salary: $350.00 – $550.00 per day
Benefits:
Work from home
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Work Eligibility:
Permitted to work permanently with no restriction on hours (e.g. citizen, permanent resident) (Required)
Work Remotely:
No
COVID-19 Precaution(s):
Social distancing guidelines in place
14 days ago
Report job"
41,Actuarial Analyst,QBE,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Actuarial Analyst
Location: Sydney preferred, but not essential
Type: Permanent, Full Time.
Your part in a changing world
At QBE, we’re driven by our purpose – to give people the confidence to achieve their ambitions .
We are an international insurer and reinsurer offering a diverse portfolio of commercial, personal and specialty products, as well as risk management solutions. Our product portfolio includes property, motor, crop, energy, marine and aviation. We employee a team of more than 11,800 people, in 27 countries around the world.
The opportunity
This is an exciting opportunity to be a part of the Actuarial Team at QBE. If you flourish in a team committed to transformation and exceptional outcomes then this is the opportunity for you. We are looking for a motivated and talented individual to join our growing Actuarial team within the pricing function.
Deep dive into general insurance products, providing advice on tactical price setting, price modelling, overall price changes and detailed pricing recommendations
Continuously drive improvements in our approach and our systems, taking a cross-product and wider functional view, covering aspects of pricing, modelling, monitoring, and reserving
Work closely with other analytical professionals in our Pricing, Data & Analytics, and wider finance teams
Key stakeholder engagement, developing trusted relationships with peers in product, underwriting, distribution, and claims
Work with business stakeholders to assist them in meeting their P&L targets through quality analytics and provision of information
Your story so far
A relevant degree in Mathematics, Science, Data Science, Business, Actuarial Studies, or Computer Science field
Some experience in General Insurance pricing is desired. Personal lines pricing experience is advantageous but not essential
Strong MS Excel skills, experience in SAS programming
Familiarity with R, Emblem and Radar will be advantageous
Ability to communicate your analysis and findings to a wide range of stakeholders within the business
Ability to work autonomously and solve problems
Strong attention to detail
We are here to support you
We are proud to have been Voted #5 in the 2019 Top 20 Australian Workplaces for New Dads - HBF Direct Advice for Dads and we achieved Gold employer status in the 2019 & 2020 Australian LGBTI Inclusion Awards. We are also a finalist in the 2020 Australian HR Awards, shortlisted for Best Workplace Diversity & Inclusion Program and Best Health & Wellbeing Program.
We also offer a range of benefits to help provide holistic support for your work life, whatever your circumstance.
As a QBE employee, we will offer you:
Flex@QBE leave to enhance your work/life integration
Our ‘At My Best’ wellbeing program, which includes a free 12-month subscription to Headspace
The ability to maximise retirement savings through voluntary super contributions and company matching
Income protection insurance and reimbursed Death and Total Permanent Disability insurance premiums
Access to REACH My Best - free holistic wellbeing coaching, nutritional, financial and legal advice and confidential counselling
Discounts on insurance products, car hire, hotels, goods and services
Benefits through our various sports and arts sponsorship partners such as free and discounted tickets.
Join us.
Click APPLY to submit your application. Successful applicants will need to complete work rights, police and credit checks through our online provider as a condition of employment.
QBE recognise the value of diverse perspectives and experience. We are committed to an inclusive workplace where everyone feels valued and respected for who they are. If we can provide support with access requirements, alternative work arrangements or you would like to connect with one of our networks please contact us at recruitment@qbe.com .
Number of Openings:
1
How to Apply:
To submit your application, click ""Apply"" and follow the step by step process.
Equal Employment Opportunity:
QBE is an equal opportunity employer and is required to comply with equal employment opportunity legislation in each jurisdiction it operates.
7 days ago
Report job"
42,"Research Analyst, Industrials – Sydney, Australia",Credit Suisse,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Credit Suisse is a leading global wealth manager with strong investment banking capabilities. Headquartered in Zurich, Switzerland, we have a global reach with operations in about 50 countries and employ more than 45,000 people from over 150 different nations. Embodying entrepreneurial spirit, Credit Suisse delivers holistic financial solutions to our clients, including innovative products and specially tailored advice. Striving for quality and excellence in our work, we recognize and reward extraordinary performance among our employees, provide wide-ranging training and development opportunities, and benefit from a diverse range of perspectives to create value for our clients, shareholders and communities. We are Credit Suisse.
We Offer
An opportunity to assist coverage of both the Building Materials sector and the Utilities sector through analysis of industry macro trends and company financials.
Being part of Credit Suisse’ Global Securities Research offering (within the Sustainability, Research & Investment Solutions division) and collaborating across sector and macro teams to produce commercial, investment-relevant insights for clients.
Reviewing and analyzing business and trade publications, annual reports, financial filings and other sources to gather, synthesize and interpret data on the sector and relevant listed and unlisted companies within.
Building, maintaining and updating industry databases as well as detailed financial models for earnings forecasts and valuations.
Preparing and publishing thought-provoking, relevant research reports and providing timely updates for the firm's sales force and institutional clients.
Interacting and engaging with institutional clients and facilitating access to senior management of coverage companies.
You Offer
2 years or more successful experience in Accounting or Finance, or a commercial role in another industry but with a demonstrable interest in finance.
Experience in any of the Building Materials, Construction, Real Estate, or Electricity & Gas industries preferred but not essential.
A good understanding of equity markets, experience in mastering industry coverage quickly, skills in fundamental financial analysis and valuation as well as ability to generate strong investment ideas.
Partial or completed qualifications such as Chartered Accountant/Chartered Financial Analyst/MBA/Actuarial preferable.
Outstanding commercial acumen, strong communication, presentation, verbal and written proficiency in English.
A strong analytical mind, numerical skills, intellectual curiosity, being a self-starter, with a high level of attention to detail.
Thinking ahead, finding answers and being engaging in growing with the ability to learn quickly.
Being able to work in Sydney, Australia as part of a diverse team environment, cross collaborating with connected teams regionally and globally.
*LI-CL1*
<p hidden>efc-ags1</p>
Credit Suisse is an equal opportunity employer. Welcoming diversity gives us a competitive advantage in the global marketplace and drives our success.
7 days ago
Report job"
43,Commercial Analyst,AimBig Employment,Not shown,Sydney Central Business District NSW,"About AimBig
At AimBig Employment, people are at the centre of our business. We are an innovative, dynamic employment service provider with a national footprint with 96 locations. We have a proven track record of working with people with disabilities to deliver meaningful employment opportunities. We are the highest rated National DES provider in Australia, now for 6 months running, with 51% of our sites receiving a 5-star rating.
About the Role – In essence we are looking for a switched on Commercial Analyst that is responsible for undertaking market analysis and has the ability to clearly and concisely present data, conclusions, and recommendations to Senior Leadership to drive business improvement.


What we are ideally looking for:
Relevant tertiary degree qualified
2-3 years working in a similar role.
Strong technical and business intelligence tools skills
Comprehensive knowledge of relevant legislation and project management
Experience developing reporting and dashboards in Microsoft Power BI
Market/Industry Analysis
Engage with the business to develop a deep understanding of business context and priorities
Prepare, develop and analyse a market and industry reports
Drive insight-led decision making across industry trends
Contribute towards the annual budget setting process
Prepare relevant presentation reports for key stakeholders
Data & Reporting
Efficient and effective delivery of insightful market data
Retrieve data from relevant sources to provide insightful data
Communicate data in a way that meets audience needs
Provide industry trends and forecasts based on market data analysis
In other words, someone really smart with the confidence to present to our Leadership.

About You
Excellent and confident verbal and written business communication skills
Solid technical knowledge
Great analytical skills and attention to detail
Exceptional decision making and problem solving skills
Excellent customer service skills
Good time management and organisational skills,
Understanding of the commercial framework of business
If you think this is you, we would love to hear from you. Submit your resume

AimBig Employment is committed to the principles of Equal Employment Opportunity.
6 days ago
Report job"
44,Reporting and Data Analyst -> Commercial finance focus.,Noble People,"$65,000 - $70,000 a year",Melbourne VIC,"Know accounting but not keen to be one anymore!
True analytical role - add value to financial decisions
Well known National peak body


This well-known peak body is responsible for an industry that generates billions of dollars of economic revenue, as well as employment for over 100,000 Australians. A truly national body, they work right across the country, with their influence contributing to regional areas as much as major cities.


Growth and a need to increase the accuracy and effectiveness of commercial decisions has led to the creation of this finance focused Analyst role. Working closely with the Finance Manager and CFO, you will provide regular and ad-hoc financial insights and analysis that result in a commercial impact on the industry and organisation as whole.


In this varied and hands-on role, you will:


Provide a broad range of financial and broader performance analysis
Generate strategic analysis across budget and forecast support
Partner internal operational leaders on key decisions with clear metrics
Build and refine long term modelling and forecasting activities
Analyse and advise on key balance sheet and cash flow requirements
Support investment decisions via analysis. Monitor financial risk.
With an inquisitive mind and a constant business process improvement focus, you will need a core base of accounting experience or sound commerce background to ensure you understand the strategy, intent and financial implications of the information and analysis that you produce. This experience will be supported by strong Excel skills, clear and confident communication skills, and an enthusiastic and challenging mindset backed up by a highly analytical approach.


Salary shall be around $65 - $70k + super
1 day ago
Report job"
0,Data Business Analyst - Enterprise Data Management,Macquarie Group Limited,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Utilise your experience in Enterprise Data Management in the Financial Services sector in this newly created role within Macquarie's Financial Management Group. In this key business focused role, you will be required to work with the business cross functionally to build strong relationships and influence your key stakeholders.
In this role you will work closely with senior members of Finance and the business teams to drive data provisioning & enhancing data quality in a high-profile, change-oriented team.
You will be a self-starter, curious and driven, with the ability to self-manage workload and deadlines whilst maintaining a degree of accuracy and quality.
Your strong analytical, problem solving skills, coupled with your experience within Finance and/or product knowledge of financial instruments, will ensure you are successful in this role.
An understanding of Enterprise Data Management and data quality concepts would be desirable for this role.
Detailed Role & Responsibilities:
As a Data business analyst in data governance team for various mandatory and regulatory projects your key focus would be:
Ensure data risks are managed by supporting the team to:
evaluate aggregate data risks within the Group.
ensuring controls are implemented and tested for effectiveness
support monitoring of controls effectiveness
maintain strong working relationships with the risk management teams (FORM, Assurance)
Ensure management understanding of data quality issues and impacts:
engage with the Operations & Data Quality team to confirm issue status
perform thematic analysis of data incidents and issues
engage with stakeholders (Data Owners) to validate observations and agree call outs
ensure material issues are escalated / have visibility to data governance forums
Ensure risk / control gaps and or data quality issues are addressed by supporting the team to:
establish remediation plans for gaps and thematic/material data issues
ensure solutions are aligned to data frameworks and strategies
monitor actions to ensure delivery within agreed timelines
deliver status updates to the Data management team and Stakeholders (Data Owners)
You will bring to this role:
To be successful in this role, you will have 3-4 years of relevant experience in Data and Information Management roles as Data Business Analyst in the Financial Services industry. Regulatory projects experience within the financial services industry is preferred.
Working at the interface of business and technology teams, you will also possess:
an understanding of Enterprise Data Management and data quality concepts would be desirable
business Intelligence tool experience an advantage, for example Informatica, Alteryx and PowerBI
be analytical and have demonstrated experience in effective problem solving
experience working in a team-oriented, collaborative environment
finance and/or product knowledge of financial instruments is preferred
About the Financial Management Group
The Financial Management Group provides financial, tax and treasury services to all areas of Macquarie. The group is focused on providing strategic analysis and advice to Macquarie's businesses and senior management, managing Macquarie's funding, liquidity and capital position, ensuring Macquarie continues to meet regulatory and compliance obligations and managing Macquarie's corporate affairs.
Our commitment to Diversity and Inclusion
The diversity of our people is one of our greatest strengths, and in combination with our inclusive environment, it enables us to deliver innovative and sustainable outcomes for our people, clients, shareholders and communities. From day one, you'll be encouraged to be yourself and supported to perform at your best. If our purpose of ‘empowering people to innovate and invest for a better future’ is as inspiring to you as it is to us, please apply. With the right technology, support and resources, our people can work in a range of flexible ways.
We are committed to providing a working environment that embraces and values diversity and inclusion. We encourage candidates to speak with a member of our recruitment team if you require adjustments to our recruitment process to support you, and the type of working arrangements that would help you thrive.

About Macquarie
A career at Macquarie means you’ll have the opportunity to develop and utilise new skills, explore interesting fields and do challenging work that will impact the lives of people around the world—whether it’s accelerating the green energy transition, helping sustain global food supplies, financing social housing projects or investing in essential infrastructure. At Macquarie, we’re empowering people to innovate and invest for a better future.
Our size and international presence means your work can take you anywhere—across business groups, disciplines, sectors and borders. With 16,300+ employees and offices in 31 markets around the world, we’re a truly global organisation.
You’ll be supported by a diverse team where the unique perspectives, ideas and experiences that all of our people bring are valued. You’ll be empowered to address unmet needs in our communities whilst advising and investing alongside our clients and partners. Working with us, you’ll have the opportunity to make a difference.
Macquarie is a global financial group providing clients with asset management, retail and business banking, wealth management, leasing and asset financing, market access, commodity trading, renewables development, investment banking and principal investment.

Job no: FMG-956103
Work type: Full time
Location: Sydney
Category: Mid-level, Accounting & Finance, Data & Analytics, Projects, Improvements & Change
Group: Financial Management Group
Division: FMG Central
Recruiter: Maddy Wilson
Opening Date: 14/2/2021
1 day ago
Report job"
1,Data Analyst – Lean Data Analytics – Business Bank Remediation,Westpac Group,Not shown,Sydney Central Business District NSW,"Contribute to and drive the delivery of solutions that create both short-run and long-term benefits for customers and the business
Broad focus across Design, Insights, Capability, Delivery & Stakeholder Management
Permanent opportunity
How will I help?


As a Data Analyst in our Business Bank Remediation team, you will contribute to the development and deployment of significant improvements through the application of Analytics practices. This is achieved through structuring data to develop insights, enabling the business to resolve problems and drive strategic direction.

Other key day to day responsibilities will include:
Designing and articulating complex data visualisations intuitive graphics to a non-technical audience and forming/owning a backlog for building data capability to ensure it reflects the division’s strategic and financial goals
Delivering insights and capability through understanding what data is required to validate business problems, creating a collection plan and implementing it
Gathering data using various data mining tools and techniques followed by translating them into data that is structured, reusable and provides insight capability to the wider team and business
Building, owning and continuously improving data logic, structure and visualisations to drive the shaping and delivery of projects across multiple platforms
Sharing information and knowledge between internal and external networks and partnerships to boost performance and productivity.
What's in it for me?


You will build your profile internally with senior stakeholders and be part of the future of a business that has been around for 200 years and whose vision is becoming the world’s best service company.
You’ll be working for an organisation that supports development, internal career moves and flexible working. Along with competitive salary, you’ll receive Westpac's generous benefits and a whole array of customer discounts. Being an integral part of Business Bank Product, you will constantly be challenging the status quo and delivering high quality customer outcomes.

What do I need?


To be considered for this opportunity will need to demonstrate:
Tertiary or post graduate qualification in a mathematical/finance discipline
Proficient in using SQL & analytical toolkits (R or Python desirable) with demonstrated experience
Previous experience developing data solutions in either data warehouses or big data platforms (leveraging both quantitative and qualitative data)
Proficiency in translating and analysing large data sets
Lean Six Sigma awareness.
Highly proficient using MS suite.

What is it like to work there?


You’ll join one big, supportive team – but you’ll also be doing your bit to reach our vision to become of the world's greatest service companies. As an equal opportunity employer, we celebrate difference and love having a diverse and inclusive workplace. As part of our commitment to creating a flexible, diverse and inclusive workplace, this role is open to experienced candidates seeking workplace flexibility. We invite candidates of all ages, people with a disability and Indigenous Australians to apply.

How do I Apply?


Start here. Just click on the APPLY button.

Brand : Westpac Group
Job : Product
Primary Location : NSW-Sydney CBD
Employee Status : Permanent
Schedule : Full-time
Recruiter : David Lenny
Posting Date : 07/02/2021, 10:49:51 PM
Closing Date : 10/03/2021, 6:59:00 AM
8 days ago
Report job"
2,Business Analyst,MPG BUSINESS INFORMATION SYSTEMS PRIVATE LIMITED,"$70,000 - $80,000 a year",Parramatta NSW,"Working with End users of clients to Identify, inspect, and analyse business processes, procedures, and work practices to propose right solution.
Development of Proof of Concept and Technical Solutioning for client demonstration to showcase how suggested solution can add value to their business operations.
Using project management procedures, standards, and methods to develop detailed Technical scope of work, project plan and cost estimation for client consideration.
Assisting client to understand the Solution benefits, Technical Scope and associated cost estimations for smooth solution decision making process.
Working along with Consulting team and End users of client for detailed analysis study for business operations, preparation and Finalization of Business requirement and solution blueprints documents.
Performing proper GAP Fit analysis along with Technical team using data and process modelling techniques to create clear system specifications and fulfilling gap in proposed solution.
Regular review of project developments/Customizations and ensure quality development with Technical Team
Helping project team in creating project documentation and take timely approval from end users of client.
Working along with delivery and client user team for deployment of functional solutions and ensuring quality and reliability of the proposed solution & system.
Ensuring quality delivery of project through regular reviews with project delivery team and ensuring projects are delivered on Time, with zero cost overrun and zero bug.
Job Types: Full-time, Permanent
Salary: $70,000.00 – $80,000.00 per year
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
ICT Business analyst: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor Degree (Required)
Work Eligibility:
Permitted to work permanently with no restriction on hours (e.g. citizen, permanent resident) (Required)
Work Remotely:
No
14 days ago
Report job"
3,Data Analyst (Japanese Language requirement),Intercontinental Exchange,Not shown,Southbank VIC,"Intercontinental Exchange (NYSE ICE) is a Fortune 500 company that operates global markets and clearing houses, and delivers information and technology designed to help companies around the world manage risk, access information and raise capital. We serve customers in over 70 countries with a team of world-class employees. We recruit passionate, knowledgeable professionals and offer a collaborative, results-oriented environment where they help build innovative solutions to help our customers thrive in global markets.

At Intercontinental Exchange, our diverse team is working to create and improve technology that solves market structure challenges for market participants around the world. Whether it’s designing and managing the tech infrastructure for global trading and clearing or developing leading-edge market data solutions, our teams are a critical part of global markets.

As we continue to grow and expand, we’re looking for motivated, results-oriented professionals who share our entrepreneurial spirit and commitment to improving the global marketplace. We offer a comprehensive and competitive compensation and benefits package to ensure the health and financial security of our employees.
Our Melbourne office is primarily focused on data collection for Equities, Funds and Derivative Instruments.. This role is pivotal to the data collection process. The data we maintain enables us to provide a variety of market trusted products to our clients. All our Analysts are multilingual and are assigned to a geographical territory depending on their spoken languages.

Responsibilities
Researching, capturing and inputting market data in a timely and accurate manner for our covered markets
Identifying data quality issues, recommending procedural and technical changes to improve productivity and data quality for ICE Data Services
The Research Analyst will be expected to stay current in Industry initiatives and organizations that impact the data covered
Assist in ICE Data Services Data Quality Program
Address client inquiries on Asia Pacific Markets.
Confirm existing information and/or provide additional information when internal and external customers inquire about data discrepancies
Research information on initial sources and may have verbal discussions with underwriters, financial advisors, agencies, trustees, etc
Work with Data Collection and Product to achieve common goals of improving data quality, accuracy and timeliness
Communicate, verbal and written, with Customer Services and Evaluated Services
Maintain daily and monthly statistics and metrics of client inquiries
This is a research position and not a technical IT role.
Knowledge And Experience
Strong interpersonal, reading and written communication skills
Business level English (reading, writing and spoken) and also fluency in Japanese

Preferred
Experience in a similar field or has conducted research extensively as part of a degree or the working environment. Applicants without experience can apply as training will be provided
Good PC skill would be advantage
Multiple language skills will be a plus

We offer experience working in dynamic, professional, fast paced environment, friendly and multicultural colleagues.


We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of gender, civil status, family status, sexual orientation, religion, age, disability, race or membership of the travelling community.

Additional Information
Schedule Full-time
Shift flexibility - available to work flexibly on shifts from 09am to 11pm
30+ days ago
Report job"
4,"Business Analyst, Data Governance and Management",Cancer Institute (NSW),"$114,076 - $130,047 a year",Sydney NSW,"Employment Type: Permanent Full Time
Position Classification: Health Manager Level 3
Remuneration: $114,076 - $130,046 per annum, excluding superannuation
Hours Per Week: 38
Requisition ID: REQ214249
Be part of an organisation that makes a difference in cancer control in NSW
Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander peoples are encouraged to apply
Exciting opportunity for an experienced Business Analyst to join a team specialising in data management

Where you’ll be working
The Cancer Institute NSW is the NSW Government’s cancer control agency, established to lessen the impact of cancer across the state.
Working at the Cancer Institute NSW means joining a team of committed and dedicated staff who are proud to be a part of the Institute’s purpose of overseeing and accelerating the effectiveness of cancer control in NSW.

The Cancer Institute is a collaborative working environment that encourages diversity and inclusion in how we work and the way we work together. Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander peoples are strongly encouraged to apply. Greater consideration will be given to suitable applicants, in order to improve access to employment and career opportunities (GSE Rule 26)

What you will be doing
You will have demonstrated experience in eliciting business and technical requirements and maintaining documentation received from internal and external stakeholders. You will drive the integration of datasets into the Institute-wide data warehouse using a consistent corporate approach.

This is a multifaceted role providing business and technical knowledge, expertise and advice to inform management decision making. The role includes being the lead in integrating user feedback, policy changes, evolving business needs, system upgrades and schema/ETL changes into the Screening and Prevention data architecture.
For your application to be considered
To submit your application, please provide:
Your resume (maximum five pages)
A covering letter addressing the Essential Requirements, as outlined below
A response to the Pre-screening Questions, as outlined below.
Essential requirements
Tertiary qualifications in health information management, business, computer science, information technology or related discipline or demonstrated equivalent professional experience and training
Demonstrated experience in working with large scale datasets, preferably in a complex health environment
Demonstrated experience with SQL Server and data warehousing
Demonstrated experience in stakeholder management including negotiating and influencing to achieve positive outcomes
Understanding of the NSW Health Records and Information Privacy Act and other relevant legislation.

Pre-screening question
Please outline your experience and what your role was in any data remediation/management project or activity?
Please explain where you have lead integration of user feedback, policy changes, evolving business needs, system upgrades or schema/ETL changes into any form of data architecture.

Interested?
Need more information?


2) Find out more about applying for this position


For more information about the Cancer Institute NSW please visit www.cancer.nsw.gov.au. For role related queries or questions contact Victor Kapruziak on Victor.Kapruziak@health.nsw.gov.au

Applications Close: Sunday, 28 February 2021 at 11.30 pm.

All Cancer Institute roles are based at St Leonards.
The CORE+4 Values define what is important to the Cancer Institute NSW and our employees.
Our values are: Collaboration, Openness, Respect, Empowerment, Strategic, Supportive, Innovative and Flexible.

The Cancer Institute NSW is unable to offer salary packaging. Salaries will be negotiated commensurate to experience and qualifications of the role.

The Cancer Institute NSW welcomes applications from Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander people, people from diverse cultural backgrounds and people with disabilities. Stepping Up aims to assist Aboriginal job applicants by providing information about applying for roles in NSW Health. For more information please visit www.steppingup.health.nsw.gov.au.

Please indicate if you have any accessibility requirements in your application or speak with the contact person should you be called for an interview. We provide reasonable adjustment for people with a disability during the recruitment process and during their employment.

To be eligible for permanent appointment to a position in NSW Health, you must have Australian citizenship or permanent Australian residency.
NSW Public Service Commission
1 day ago
Report job"
5,Business Analyst Facilities,Corporate Services,"$103,965 - $116,441 a year",Sydney NSW,"About us?
?
Over the next 40 years, Sydney’s population is projected to swell to over 12 million residents and regional NSW will accommodate an extra 700,000 people.?Transport for NSW is delivering an unprecedented $72.2b investment?into a truly game changing Future Transport strategy which will bring together several?modes and?cutting edge?technologies?to?deliver satisfaction and safety for our customers while supporting a rapidly growing economy.???
?

The Division

Corporate Services provides sustainable strategies, solutions and services to enable our clients to deliver with confidence Transport's vision. Providing a robust to commercial management, ensuring financial sustainability across the cluster and driving strategic projects, procurement and transformation through the provision of corporate services to internal clients.
?

The opportunity
?
We are currently recruiting for a Business Analyst - Facilities to join the Asset and Workplace Services team within Corporate Services.

You will be responsible for providing data, analysis, and reporting, as well as preparation of business cases and presentation packs that are useful in developing initiatives for service improvement, tracking key metrics and informing decision making across the branch.

Establish systems and processes to provide the branch dashboard reporting to ensure performance indicators and targets can be accurately measured and monitored.
Probe information systems to establish information sources and provide nonstandard data extraction, modelling, and the development of high-quality custom reports.
Identify gaps in the availability of information across a variety of internal and third-party systems and participate in the development of strategies to solve the problem.
Assist with the development of business cases and improvement initiatives by providing and analysing data and preparing high-quality presentation packs.
?

About You:

We are looking for someone who has a the ability to create innovative and practical ways to analyse available information. You will have experience using tableau, excel, work processing and other data visualisation applications to present data in a clear and impactful way.

You will have demonstrated knowledge and experience working with a variety of systems and deliver quality data manipulation, analytics and modelling with a broad understanding of Facilities Management Services.

This role will require a security clearance and criminal clearance prior to appointment.

How to apply

To apply for this position, please submit your resume and respond to the questions that are asked as part of the online application process.

This position will be recruited through a gated process, whilst we welcome all applications, they will be assessed based on priority.

TfNSW permanent employees in the Asset and Workplace Services and notified TSS effected staff.
All other TfNSW permanent employees and external applicants.

Salary and Benefits

The salary for this position is Grade 7 ($103,965 - $116,441) per annum plus superannuation and leave loading.

Our Commitment to Diversity

Great people come from all walks of life. At Transport for NSW, we are committed to creating a diverse, inclusive and flexible workforce which reflects the community and the customers we serve.
We welcome and encourage applications from all people regardless of age, gender, ethnicity, cultural background, or sexual orientation.

For any enquiries, please email Cassandra Grosso on Cassandra.grosso@transport.nsw.gov.au

Applications close: Sunday the 28th of February 2021 at 11:59pm
NSW Public Service Commission
1 day ago
Report job"
6,Junior Business Intelligence Analyst,GenesisCare,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"At GenesisCare we want to hear from people who are as passionate as we are about innovation and working together to drive better life outcomes for patients around the world.
Do your life’s best work!
We are looking for a passionate Junior Business Intelligence Analyst to join us with the following responsibilities:
Work closely with BI team and business stakeholders to build reports and dashboards and data extracts to allow decision support
Extract data from clinical, financial and other source systems into new and existing data models in the existing data warehouse, along with technical documentation
What you’ll do:
Engage with business stakeholder to provide data extracts and reports to support research/clinical trial initiatives and regulatory reporting.
Create Tableau dashboards to support business decision making
Support BI Team with unit and integration testing
Provide Tableau support, users queries and production incidence
Document requirements, scope, outcome and acceptance criteria
Solution design and prototyping
Development QA & Peer review
Who you are:
1+ year experience in Tableau (10.0 upwards) and SQL development.
1+ year experience in data analytics, preferably last worked in a similar role
Experience data analysis and presenting insights
Experience with data extraction and preparation
Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal
Good technology and systems analysis background
Bachelor degree in IT, computer science, computer engineering or related field
Database modelling (entity based and snowflake/star schema) SQL Server (SSMS/SSIS/SSRS) and Python experience a plus
Outstanding personal manners, courtesy and respect
Ability to work with minimal supervision
What’s in it for you:
Own your development, learn everyday with career development opportunities globally
Thriving close-knit culture and communities
To be part of the exciting digital transformation journey in healthcare and make a difference in our patients’ clinical and emotional needs
Who we are:
We are 5500+ highly trained healthcare professionals and support staff across Australia, the U.K., Spain, China and the United States, designing innovative treatments and care for people with cancer and heart disease.
Global care
Across the world, we have more than 440+ centres to help us bring the right care to our patients. For radiation therapy, that includes 14 centres in the UK, 21 in Spain, 36 in Australia and 300 in the U.S. We also offer cardiology and sleep services at more than 80 locations across Australia. Every year our team sees more than 400,000 people globally.
People centricity is at the heart of what we do—whether that person is a patient, a referring doctor, a partner or someone in our team. We aim to build culture of ‘care’ that is patient focused and performance driven. Our people promise is “do your life’s best work, by always growing, having a profound human impact and making great things happen together.” If you’d like to make a difference, join us at GenesisCare.
GenesisCare is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
29 days ago
Report job"
7,Business Analyst,Realtekh Australia,"$89,944 - $109,938 a year",Sydney NSW,"Role: Business Analyst/Data Analyst
Location: Sydney
Mode: Permanent
Key Accountabilities
× Investigate and analyse business problems and opportunities and design future data management requirements, processes and capabilities
× Define and document requirements for changes to business data processes, policies and systems to achieve business outcomes
× Participation in internal process improvement projects and initiatives
× Perform data quality monitoring activities for the customer domain
× Utilise a variety of data sources and associated tools and technical skills, e.g. Teradata, Informatica etc.
× Consult with operations, projects and other stakeholders on current known customer data issues that could impact project delivery.
× Ensure project implementations go-live without impact to customer data.
Skills
× Strong business analysis and data skills
× Proven ability to interact effectively with senior internal and external stakeholders
× Advanced skills in Teradata SQL, Microsoft applications (like -Excel)
× Intermediate to advanced skills in process and control documentation, including flowcharting
× Experience in continuous improvement activities and implementation of related projects
× Know How of Tableau or PowerBI or SAS will be advantageous
Job Types: Full-time, Permanent
Salary: $89,944.00 – $109,938.00 per year
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Today
Report job"
8,Senior Data Analyst,Health System Support Group,"$113,735 - $129,658 a year",Sydney NSW,"COVID Public Health Response - Expression of Interest
Thank you for your interest in assisting the NSW Health with the COVID-19 response.
We have opportunities to assist the Epidemiology and Surveillance Team within the COVID Public Health Response based at St Leonards.
Who is eligible to express their interest?
To be eligible for employment in these roles you must be one of the following. You can only be offered employment in this role for the duration that your current visa allows you to work in Australia, and you can only be offered ongoing employment if you have a permanent visa that allows you to work in Australia:
an Australian Citizen, or
a permanent resident of Australia, or
a New Zealand citizen with a current New Zealand Passport, or
a citizen of another country with an appropriate visa that allows you to work in Australia
What will a COVID-19 Senior Data Analyst be doing?
The Data Analysis Team is responsible for a wide range of data management, data cleaning and preparation and reporting activities to support NSW’s public health response to the COVID-19 pandemic.
The COVID-19 Senior Data Analyst is located within the COVID Public Health Response responding to the COVID-19 Pandemic. The Senior Data Analyst will support the Team Leader in managing the Data Analysis Team, including providing mentorship for junior team members. The Senior Data Analyst will make a significant contribution to provision of high quality, reliable data for NSW Health and intergovernmental agencies through: managing the acquisition of COVID related data from a range of sources; guiding analysis and enhancement of data to provide reports and data visualisations; and considering strategic challenges in data acquisition and reporting in a high scrutiny environment.
Working time
The Response team is scheduled across 7 days a week over two shifts (8.30 am - 4 pm and 2.30 - 10 pm).
Remuneration
Classification: Health Manager Level 3
Salary range: $113,735.00 - $129,658.00
Hourly rate: $57.36 - $65.39

Key skills required
1. Post-graduate qualifications in epidemiology or biostatistics or equivalent in public health or related discipline and relevant experience.
2. Substantial experience in data management, analysis and reporting of health data.
3. Substantial experience with statistical packages such as SAS, Python or R.
4. Demonstrated experience in managing a team with ability to delegate effectively to achieve positive outcomes; demonstrated leadership skills with experience in developing the capability of a team, establishing, monitoring and ensuring achievement of clear performance objectives; coaching and advising staff, and fostering a collegial, professional work environment.
5. Highly developed communication, negotiation and interpersonal skills.
6. High level oral and written communication skills with demonstrated ability to prepare, review and edit correspondence, briefings, reports, research papers and project proposals, and able to interact effectively with staff, management and external stakeholders
Key accountabilities of the role
Manage the acquisition of COVID related data including preparation of data extracts.
Liaison with data providers, data users, subject matter experts and other stakeholders to ensure optimal use and translation of data.
Undertake and guide analysis and enhancement of data.
Prepare high quality data visualisations and other data products when requested.
Provide timely advice and response to data-related enquires from the COVID Public Health Response teams.
Consider and develop a response to strategic challenges in data acquisition and reporting in a high scrutiny environment.
Assist the Team Leaders with team leadership and management responsibilities.
Key challenges
Work under time pressure to tight deadlines
High attention to detail required
Evening and weekend work required
Apply appropriate analyses to complex data
Work across sometimes conflicting and/or contrasting requirements from different stakeholder groups
Match technical feasibility of data analyses with operational requirements
Things to consider when expressing interest:
Your availability will need to be across 7 days per week, for 5 shifts (morning and afternoon)
Weekend and/or evening work will be required
What do I need to provide?
Attach your current resume / curriculum vitae (CV) (maximum 5 pages) ONLY to the application
Complete the pre-screening questions on the application form.
Provide your availability including time frame/duration you are available.
2 x referees will need to be supplied prior to an offer being made.
Are you currently a NSW Government employee?
Current NSW Health, NSW Ministry of Health and NSW Government staff, must have their manager’s approval prior to expressing interest.
This will be an off-payroll arrangement for current Public Sector Staff, your agency can invoice NSW Health for salary expenses.
The team works on a shift work arrangement, you will be required to amend your working conditions to accommodate shift working.
Who will view my EOI?
Manager and Team leaders of COVID Publich Health Response teams may review your expression of interest.

Our Commitment to Diversity
NSW Health values diversity and is committed to building an inclusive workplace culture that reflects the community we serve. We encourage applications from diverse community groups including Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander people, LGBTIQ+, those with special needs and people from culturally and linguistically diverse backgrounds.

For any technical issues, contact Recruitment at HSSG-Recruitment@health.nsw.gov.au.

Please note that not everyone who expresses their interest will be called to work in the centres.
NSW Public Service Commission
30+ days ago
Report job"
9,Data Quality Analyst,Macquarie Group Limited,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Our Financial Management Group has a unique opportunity for a Data Quality Analyst to help Macquarie make better data-driven decisions and deliver a more informed and agile Finance function. Sitting within the Data Operations and Data Quality team, you will be responsible for the proactive identification, assessment and resolution of data quality issues.
Working as a key member of the Data Quality team, you will lead efforts to continually improve the quality of data across finance platforms. Key duties and responsibilities will include:
Reconcile data across systems to resolve discrepancies
Contribute to data governance by escalating data quality issues and inconsistencies for assessment and remediation
Support governance of the internal control framework
Develop an intimate understanding of the flow of data through the organisation
Contribute to the design of the Macquarie data model and framework, having regard for business and regulatory drivers
Produce detailed documentation outlining data flows and processes
Work with IT to on board and embed tools that enable an analytical approach to data
Interrogate and investigate the Data Warehouse to deliver an improved reporting & analysis toolkit, supporting strategic decision- making across the broader organisation
Participate in process improvement reviews by making suggestions and contributing ideas
To be successful in this Data Quality Analyst role, you will need 1-3 years’ of relevant work experience, a passion for data quality and a high level of attention to detail. Other skills and requirements include:
A degree in statistics, maths, data analytics, or similar
Strong technical skills including familiarity with databases, data modelling, SQL, and analytics. Advanced Excel skills. Exposure to Alteryx is a bonus
The ability to concisely share your data insights in both the spoken and written form
Proven ability to work across all levels of stakeholders and build relationships quickly
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Previous experience within Finance and/or product knowledge of financial instruments would be highly regarded
Some understanding of Enterprise Data Management and data quality concepts would be desirable
This is a great opportunity for a Data Quality Analyst to join the team to deliver on a significant book of work that is crucial to the Group. In addition, the role will reward someone who can use their initiative to help drive maturity into the reporting functionality and deliver improvements within that space.
The Financial Management Group provides financial, tax and treasury services to all areas of Macquarie. The group is focused on providing strategic analysis and advice to Macquarie's businesses and senior management, managing Macquarie's funding, liquidity and capital position, ensuring Macquarie continues to meet regulatory and compliance obligations and managing Macquarie's corporate communications and investor relations.

Macquarie understands the importance of diversity and inclusion - our long history of success has come from being different. At Macquarie we value the innovation and creativity that diversity of thought brings. The one thing we all have in common is our focus on high performance. If you're capable, motivated and can deliver, we want you on our team.
We facilitate a range of flexible working arrangements within our teams. Talk to us about what flexibility may be available.

If you have any questions on this position, please feel free to reach out to me at maddy.wilson@macquarie.com

About Macquarie
A career at Macquarie means you’ll have the opportunity to develop and utilise new skills, explore interesting fields and do challenging work that will impact the lives of people around the world—whether it’s accelerating the green energy transition, helping sustain global food supplies, financing social housing projects or investing in essential infrastructure. At Macquarie, we’re empowering people to innovate and invest for a better future.
Our size and international presence means your work can take you anywhere—across business groups, disciplines, sectors and borders. With 16,300+ employees and offices in 31 markets around the world, we’re a truly global organisation.
You’ll be supported by a diverse team where the unique perspectives, ideas and experiences that all of our people bring are valued. You’ll be empowered to address unmet needs in our communities whilst advising and investing alongside our clients and partners. Working with us, you’ll have the opportunity to make a difference.
Macquarie is a global financial group providing clients with asset management, retail and business banking, wealth management, leasing and asset financing, market access, commodity trading, renewables development, investment banking and principal investment.

Job no: FMG-955450
Work type: Maximum term
Location: Sydney
Category: Junior, Accounting & Finance, Data & Analytics
Group: Financial Management Group
Division: FMG Central
Recruiter: Maddy Wilson
Opening Date: 02/12/2020
30+ days ago
Report job"
10,Intelligence Analyst - High Risk Industries Operation,Department of Justice and Community Safety,"$87,640 - $99,438 a year",Melbourne City Centre VIC,"Utilise your experience delivering strategic or tactical intelligence to help drive the Victorian response to COVID-19
Fixed-term opportunity in the Victorian Public Service
VPS Grade 4: $87,640 - $99,438 per year, plus superannuation
What will the Intelligence Analyst do?
As the Intelligence Analyst, you will have the primary responsibility for undertaking the collection, recording, analysis and dissemination of information, with a specific focus on High Risk Industry Engagement and Enforcement to identify potential businesses and industries creating risks or threats, and prevent outbreaks. You will also provide intelligence which supports the Operation to engage with and support industry in its efforts to improve Covid-safety.
Within this role, you will be a member of a small team of Intelligence specialists who ensures the High Risk Industry Engagement and Enforcement team and its stakeholders are supported with the appropriate intelligence, information and data to undertake their duties. You will make informed assessments and predictions to support decision making through reporting on high risk industry operations and outbreaks.

Some of your duties will include:
Lead the collation, analysis, and controlled dissemination and reporting of intelligence to authorised parties, in a timely manner.
Prepare and present intelligence briefings, and make high quality recommendations including the identification and evaluation of emerging strategic risks, opportunities, patterns and trends.
Support management, staff and external agencies by participating in the development and planning of intelligence-led compliance operations, which may include both engagement and enforcement activities.
To learn more about this role before applying, please read the attached position description.
What's in it for you
To thrive in this role, you will be intrinsically motivated by the challenge of work that can change constantly and prove very difficult. You will call on your intellect and grit every day. You will take your responsibility to keep Victorians safe seriously and will be proud of a job well done.

Additionally, you will likely appreciate:
✔ Free access to mental health service – personal and confidential counselling support on personal and work-related issues.
✔A fair salary – enjoy great work conditions and salary sacrificing options for superannuation and motor vehicles.
✔Transparent performance framework – approach your work with confidence in how you're tracking, working to professional development plans with performance-based salary increases.
Click here to discover more benefits in working for the department.
If this job sounds like a challenge you would love to take on, then we encourage you to apply now.
The Department of Justice and Community Safety is continually working towards increasing our Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander (Aboriginal) workforce. The Aboriginal Employment Team aims to attract, recruit and retain Aboriginal staff in a number of roles, including those in management. This support includes a culturally appropriate attraction and recruitment process. To learn more, click here or email aboriginal.employment@justice.vic.gov.au.
Successful candidates will be required to undergo pre-employment checks which may include national police checks and misconduct screening.
Applications will be regularly reviewed up until the closing date, so please do not delay in submitting your application.
13 days ago
Report job"
11,eCommerce Analyst,Dyson,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"About us
Dyson is a global technology enterprise. We solve the problems others choose to ignore, with surprising new inventions that defy convention and simply work better. We’re growing fast and our ambition is huge – more categories, more locations and more people.
About the role
Reporting to the Head of Direct (TBC) you will manage all digital performance reporting across both ANZ .com platforms. Working with the team you will use your analytical expertise to provide actionable recommendations on how to improve all aspects of the eCommerce funnel.
Using Analytical tools to review performance and provide recommendations on where opportunity exists to grow Dyson Direct business, specifically our .com platforms.
Work with internal and external eCommerce teams and own the eCommerce performance lifecycle from traffic/conversion forecasting to reporting/analysis to optimisations and AB testing to post campaign review
Review and find ways to optimise the .com digital ecosystem including Dyson owned channels and paid/earned channels (SEM, SEO, social, etc).
Manage performance across various types of work (trading, campaign, NPDs, project, etc) • Embed and lead regular performance updates, learnings and recommendations.
Responsible for daily/weekly/monthly performance KPI reports on traffic and conversion to wider team
Optimise and improve conversion throughout both .com platforms
Communicate insights and optimisations effectively to a wide audience Insight
Develop, monitor and provide frequent digital performance updates to the Direct team
Develop consistent and regular reports to help wider team understand trajectory and past performance
Build visualisations piecing together multiple data sources in order to tell the story in a compelling way
Work with Direct and Digital team members to optimise future promotions and executions using previous analysis and learnings
Drive Digital Analytics understanding throughout the business
Stay informed of new industry technology and techniques to drive innovation and efficiency in role and team Optimisation
Drive the conversion rate of all marketplace stores using analysis and recommendations
Embed A/B testing and continuous learning and use these insights to drive growth in conversion
Develop relationships with Global teams to understand other markets learnings and processes eCommerce Forecast
Understand and measure performance vs forecast using Financial and eCommerce metrics • Manage regular traffic and conversion forecasting to feed into the Direct planning cycle
Identify gaps to target and find opportunities ahead of time Behaviours
Achieve a standard of excellence in our work processes and outcomes, ensuring adherence to Dyson policies and all relevant regulatory and legal requirements.
Promote and demonstrate Dyson behaviours.
Promote, implement and comply with health and safety procedures.
About you
Degree level (or equivalent) ideally in Marketing, Business, Statistics or web related subject
2 years+ experience in an analytical role with a focus on digital including ecommerce and online marketing
Digital analytics/visualisation tools (e.g. Google Analytics, Search ads 360, Google Data Studio) – Highly desirable • Marketplace analytic tools (e.g. eBay)
Desirable
Optimisation/journey tools (e.g. Adobe Target, Decibel Insight) – Desirable
Strong data analysis skills using Excel, Google Sheets and SQL (Excel required, SQL a plus)
Passionate about online, data and analytics • Able to work with complex data to deliver meaningful, relevant, actionable insights
An excellent communicator and storyteller
High attention to detail
Ability to manage multiple stakeholders & secure buy-in
Continuous improvement mind-set
Ability to adapt to change and successfully work with ambiguity
Ability to multi-task and manage multiple projects on an ongoing basis
Ambition to grow Dyson business
Benefits
At Dyson, our people are at the heart of everything we do. We value you bringing yourself to work and we want to deliver an employee experience that matches the quality we give to our customers. Outside of a competitive salary and sales bonus, our team members receive generous product discounts, additional paid annual leave, paid parental leave and ongoing learning and development opportunities. Innovation is in our DNA and we are excited to adopt new ways of doing things differently, and better.
Interview guidance
We are following the government guidelines regarding COVID19. At this time all interviews will be conducted via video or telephone. We’re taking these precautionary measures to protect both our employee and candidate wellbeing. Our Talent Acquisition team will work with you and provide further information as appropriate.
15 days ago
Report job"
12,"Data Analyst - Product, Features, & Growth",Canva,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"At Canva, we’re transforming the way the world designs, and we need you to help us transform the way we use data to achieve that goal. The mountains of data are large, but our data team is small, and we’re looking to change that.
Our product has grown by over 25 times in the last 2 years, and we now have 10s of millions of users generating enormous quantities of data every day. To help us fuel our future growth and help even more users, we need to better understand our data - this is where we need your help.
Our Analytics folks manage huge volumes of data in order to help our friends in other teams to build the right product. You’ll be coming into a diverse team of people who really do enjoy finding answers to the problems that the business and our users have. We can often be found chatting about all the latest trends in data and how we can apply them at Canva. We’re looking forward to growing the team and gaining a range of new perspectives and ideas on how we can do things better.
Role Responsibilities
Help us understand both Canva and our customers - we want you to be creative and insightful, rather than just throwing the usual metrics at the wall to see what sticks
Suggest, set up, and run interesting experiments that will actually move our metrics - when we push tests to 100% we want to actually see the bump in the relevant graph
Build and maintain dashboards for our product teams, and make them look really good - you don’t need to be a designer or have any design talent, you just need to want to build things that look cool
Use our giant databases to answer the sort of questions that sound really simple but turn out to be challenging (and fun!)
Help us extend data literacy and curiosity throughout the whole company
Required Skills & Experience
Experience with very large data sets - if you’re familiar with that sinking feeling that your computer doesn’t have quite enough RAM for what you’re trying to do, then you’ll be at home here
Strong competency with SQL; experience with big data SQL Query Engines like Presto, Hive, or Impala is a plus!
Experience wrangling and analyzing data using Python or R
Experience with optimising AARRR funnels, A/B Testing and building dashboards that effectively communicate results and outcomes
A grounding in mathematics / statistics and a bachelor's degree in a STEM area is preferred; but not required
Strong communication skills - verbal and written - be able to break down complex topics into simple solutions and ideas
Company Benefits
Competitive salary, plus equity options
Flexible working hours, we value work-life balance
In-house chefs that cook delicious breakfast and lunch for us each day
Free Yoga membership
Generous parental leave policy
Pet friendly offices including a garden, climbing wall, unisex toilets
Sponsored social clubs and team events
Fun and quirky celebrations
Relocation budget provided for interstate or overseas candidates
One of our core values at Canva, “Being a force for good” means we are actively working towards a world that isn't just good for a small few, but one that’s good for everyone. We believe deeply that bringing together diversity of thoughts, perspectives and expression is key for building the best product for our equally diverse community. To achieve this, we need to constantly work towards making Canva the best place to work, for everyone.
Want to experience Canva for yourself?
Check out what life is like at Canva on Instagram.
Check out what our users are saying about us on Twitter.
Learn how we work from Dave, our CTO
Get to know our Chef, Chris
Meet our CEO, Melanie
Finally, give Canva a go!
If you're a passionate data analyst seeking a truly challenging opportunity with one of the world's premier technology companies, then apply now to start the discussion with us!
We will not accept or review any CVs from external recruitment agencies.
30+ days ago
Report job"
13,Business Intelligence Analyst,HelloFresh,Not shown,Chippendale NSW,"About HelloFresh
Here at HelloFresh, we're passionate about bringing dinner inspiration to everyday Australians. With 8 years of service under our belt, we are the market leader in the growing world of meal kit delivery services, operating in 14 different countries.
As we continue to deliver fresh, seasonal ingredients and delicious, wholesome recipes to our customers, we see our inspired community of empowered home-cooks continue to grow, and you could be a part of it!
Are you energetic and motivated with a team focus? Do you thrive in a dynamic, high-growth environment? If you're looking for a role that lets you make an impact every single day, we'd love to hear from you.
Job description
We are looking for a Junior Business Intelligence Analyst to be part of our Analytics team, whose objective is to help continue the ongoing HelloFresh growth!
Reporting through to the Head of Analytics:
You will...
Provide analytics on a variety of growth and marketing topics, including customer acquisition, marketing mix, retention and monetisation.
Improve our analytics capability: identify inefficiencies and gaps within our analytics process and work to streamline and improve the way the team operates.
Exemplify best practice: develop processes, analysis methodologies and dashboards to increase efficiency and consistency within the wider growth functions.
Enable data-driveness for better decisions making: create innovative solutions that enable colleagues to easily track, report and identify trends and opportunities.
Identify growth opportunities: analyse business performance to identify opportunities to invest marketing budget more efficiently.
You have/ are...
Excellent analytical skills, including working with large data sets
Excellent knowledge of Google Sheets/Excel, SQL (Tableau is a plus)
Working knowledge of Python (or R) and a willingness to become an expert
Strong organisational skills with a proven ability to manage multiple projects and deadlines
An aspiration to drive optimal decision making and maximum productivity
A logical way of working and high attention to detail
The ability to document findings in a clear and concise way, and present them to key stakeholders
An analytical degree; experience in analytics, data science or marketing is a plus
Passion for HelloFresh and the desire to be part of an extremely fast-paced business
What You'll Get In Return...
Heavily discounted HelloFresh boxes
High level of responsibility from day one
A position designed with room for evolution
Working with a fun, energetic and supportive team
Start date: Immediately - Can wait notice period
Duration: Full time role. You must have the right to work full-time in Australia.
Location: Chippendale Head Office - currently partly working from home
We are committed to building and nurturing an inclusive community for our employees. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender identity, sexual orientation, disability, age or other legally protected status.
To put it simply, everyone is welcome at our table.
30+ days ago
Report job"
14,Junior Business Analyst,The Project Lab,"$57,000 - $62,000 a year",Hobart TAS,"The Project Lab is a consulting and advisory firm that bases its services on management consulting principles. We help our clients build and grow; understand; and change their organisations to ensure they are high performing and remain sustainable, compliant and relevant. Our core focus is on the outcome regardless of what service we are providing, or how it is being provided e.g., solving complex problems, identifying opportunities for growth, ensuring compliance, or guiding through change.
For further information about The Project Lab visit www.theprojectlab.com.
About You
As a Junior Consultant (Business Analysis) you must have a desire to extend your work experience and academic learnings into business value. As someone building on their career, your passion and drive to succeed will be noticeable and your inquisitive mind will generate an endless supply of meaningful questions and offer up fresh ideas. You understand and practise active listening to absorb the wisdom of those more experienced than you. You will have a Masters degree in Business/IT or a related field and a minimum of 2 years' experience in business analysis or a related field.
You will be able to demonstrate your skills and experience in;
· working with not-for-profit organisations
· workshop facilitation, stakeholder engagement, and process mapping
· understanding customer experience specifically customer and user journey mapping
· using project management methodologies, principles and techniques
· using data and process modelling techniques
· influencing stakeholders and working closely with them to determine acceptable solutions
You will also have exceptional analytical and conceptual thinking skills, accuracy and multitasking skills.
About the Role
Based in Hobart, you will participate in many and varied areas of the business to undertake hands on consultancy company work. Product development, sales, and service delivery are areas you are likely to be supporting with your enthusiasm, writing skills, team-work and can-do attitude. You will attend meetings with clients to formulate and document business requirements, identify, investigate and analysis business procedures and work practices.
How to apply
Please email your CV and cover letter detailing why you are the perfect fit for us to by 15 March 2021.
Application Deadline: 15/03/2021
Expected Start Date: 01/04/2021
Job Types: Full-time, Permanent
Salary: $57,000.00 – $62,000.00 per year
Benefits:
Work from home
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
business analyst: 2 years (Preferred)
Education:
Masters Degree (Required)
Location:
Hobart TAS (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
No
COVID-19 Precaution(s):
Remote interview process
Social distancing guidelines in place
Virtual meetings
Sanitising, disinfecting or cleaning procedures in place
1 day ago
Report job"
15,Technical Analyst - Data,Macquarie Group Limited,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Join a high performing Data Team and collaborate on a portfolio of Capital related projects within Macquarie’s Financial Management Group.
A great opportunity for you to bring your experience as a Technical Analyst to work on a significant Macquarie program. Using your strong background in translation of business requirements into technical requirements you will be key to driving this project to completion.
Working as part of a team you will complete detailed technical documentation for all data requirements delivered from the Business Analyst and in conjunction with the Data Subject Matter Experts. In doing this, you will work collaboratively with relevant groups to deliver the project, developing and implementing appropriate solutions. In addition, you will input into the development and delivery of a test strategy requiring the alignment of numerous systems and data feeds.
You will have extensive technical analysis experience in complex projects coupled with the ability to coordinate multiple assignments and work independently. You will have the ability and poise to maintain stakeholder satisfaction when faced with competing priorities, as well as the ability to motivate and influence project stakeholders.
If you are motivated by the opportunity to work in a high performing team in a fast-paced environment, we would like to hear from you.
You will bring the following experience:
three or more years of experience in technical business analyst roles
excellent knowledge of SQL, data warehousing principles and methods
exposure to analytics, visualisation and big data platforms such as Alteryx and Power BI and Cloudera / Hadoop
domain knowledge in treasury or regulatory reporting is ideal, although candidates with other relevant experience are encouraged to apply
excellent academic results and relevant professional qualifications.
About the Financial Management Group
The Financial Management Group provides financial, tax and treasury services to all areas of Macquarie. The group is focused on providing strategic analysis and advice to Macquarie's businesses and senior management, managing Macquarie's funding, liquidity and capital position, ensuring Macquarie continues to meet regulatory and compliance obligations and managing Macquarie's corporate affairs.
Our commitment to Diversity and Inclusion
The diversity of our people is one of our greatest strengths, and in combination with our inclusive environment, it enables us to deliver innovative and sustainable outcomes for our people, clients, shareholders and communities. From day one, you'll be encouraged to be yourself and supported to perform at your best. If our purpose of ‘empowering people to innovate and invest for a better future’ is as inspiring to you as it is to us, please apply. With the right technology, support and resources, our people can work in a range of flexible ways.
We are committed to providing a working environment that embraces and values diversity and inclusion. We encourage candidates to speak with a member of our recruitment team if you require adjustments to our recruitment process to support you, and the type of working arrangements that would help you thrive.

About Macquarie
A career at Macquarie means you’ll have the opportunity to develop and utilise new skills, explore interesting fields and do challenging work that will impact the lives of people around the world—whether it’s accelerating the green energy transition, helping sustain global food supplies, financing social housing projects or investing in essential infrastructure. At Macquarie, we’re empowering people to innovate and invest for a better future.
Our size and international presence means your work can take you anywhere—across business groups, disciplines, sectors and borders. With 16,300+ employees and offices in 31 markets around the world, we’re a truly global organisation.
You’ll be supported by a diverse team where the unique perspectives, ideas and experiences that all of our people bring are valued. You’ll be empowered to address unmet needs in our communities whilst advising and investing alongside our clients and partners. Working with us, you’ll have the opportunity to make a difference.
Macquarie is a global financial group providing clients with asset management, retail and business banking, wealth management, leasing and asset financing, market access, commodity trading, renewables development, investment banking and principal investment.

Job no: FMG-956051
Work type: Full time
Location: Sydney
Category: Mid-level, Data & Analytics
Group: Financial Management Group
Division: FMG Central
Recruiter: Chloe Lee
Opening Date: 01/2/2021
14 days ago
Report job"
16,Risk Analyst,Prospa,"$90,000 - $96,000 a year",Darlinghurst NSW,"Prospa has established itself as a clear #1 online lender to small businesses in Australia and current growth trajectories see the business continuing to invest in its rapidly growing team, currently over 200 strong. This represents a unique opportunity to join us, one of Australia's most exciting and fastest-growing Fintech businesses with an awesome culture.
We are driven by our people. Their diversity, skills and passion are the foundation of what we deliver to our customers – where employees are dedicated to achieving stellar results and exceeding customer expectations. Our values: obsess about customers; deliver value fast; day 1; simplicity; be bold, open and real; and one team, inform how we think and act every day. We are also recognised as an AON Hewitt Best Employer in 2017 and 2018 FINNIES Best Fintech Place to Work and a Great Place to Work in 2019!
The role
Prospa is a growing business looking for someone with a strong econometric background who can apply their knowledge in a small business lending context. As a Risk Analyst, you will be asked to build and maintain models and risk settings within the risk analytics scope. These will include, but not limited to, behavioural models & forecast models. You will be given the responsibility to take a business problem, research the best solution using your economic knowledge, ensure the model is fit for purpose and then present solution back to a variety of stakeholders. In addition, the role requires inclusive collaboration inclusively across the business.
What you will be doing
Use your econometric knowledge to explore models that perform well across industry, risk profile & socioeconomic groups and continue to adapt to changing economic environment and portfolio strategy
Modeling within the team’s scope:
Behavioural models: using relationships to economic variables & customer’s payment behaviour to predict their payment behaviour
Budget models: using forecasted macroeconomic variables and anticipated portfolio strategy for Prospa’s annual budget
Identify latest economic policy changes and understand how these impact the small business sector and consequently Prospa’s portfolio/models
Recommend strategies for deployment into the Prospa Credit Decision Engine and portfolio management
Present analysis and findings to a variety of stakeholders
Collaborate across the broader business to communicate how risk impacts their activities.
What you'll need to succeed
3 + years of experience in a econometric modelling
Passionate about unsecured SME / personal lending
Strong knowledge of at least one of the following;
Forecast modelling for economic scenario testing & budgeting
Behavioural modelling
Able to analyse economic trends in order to generate insights for portfolio management
Ability to work independently, generate ideas, and challenge the status quo
Ability to communicate findings to a variety of stakeholders
An understanding of the consumer or small business lending process
Ability to apply your quantitative background in the “real world” economic environment (e.g. unemployment, interest rates etc)
Databricks / R / Python / SAS / MATLAB programming or similar experience with a keen interest in learning new technologies
What's nice to have
An undergraduate econometric, postgraduate study
Come and Join Our Team
If you can see yourself at Prospa and feel you can contribute to the ongoing success of our company, please hit ‘apply’.
We embrace diversity in our people and our thinking and provide a collaborative, inclusive, innovative and respectful environment. We celebrate who you are, recognise & reward great achievements, and actively provide our people the same great experience we provide our customers.
We are committed to being an equal opportunities employer and we never discriminate on the basis of race, religion, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, age, marital or disability status.
Salary on offer is between $90,000 to $96,000 plus super based on experience.
With the greatest respect CVs will not be accepted from recruitment agencies at this time.
11 days ago
Report job"
17,Senior Data Analyst,Department of Education,"$122,038 a year",Sydney NSW,"Senior Data Analyst
Duration: Temporary full-time appointment for a period up 27 January 2022 with the possibility of extension.
Dynamic, energetic and flexible work environment

Clerk level grade 9/10, plus employer’s contribution to superannuation and annual leave loading.

An exciting opportunity exists for a Senior Data Analyst to use your analytical expertise and excellent communication skills. We're looking for a person with resilience, flexibility and initiative, in particular the ability to interact well with all stakeholders. The successful applicant will undertake a wide range of research and analysis functions including communicating analysis and advice, as part of the Teaching Quality and Impact team.
About the Department of Education
We ensure young children get the best start in life by supporting and regulating the early childhood
education and care sector. are the largest provider of public education in Australia with responsibility for
delivering high-quality public education to two-thirds of the NSW student population.
For more information please visit NSW Department of Education.

About the Learning Improvement Group
Learning Improvement Group commissions, develops and delivers programs that improve educational standards, the quality of teaching and learning in NSW schools, and provides support for children and students.
We are responsible for:
Maximising access, inclusion and wellbeing of students in education P-12, through oversight of relevant school policies and by commissioning programs or strategic partnerships with other agencies and service providers.
Developing and monitoring policies and advice that require teachers to use evidence-based practice and achieve high professional standards in the delivery of curriculum, assessment and reporting.
Developing evidence-based programs, professional learning and instructional resources to build the capability of teachers and school leaders and delivering improvement at scale through local support to groups of teachers or tailored to schools and principal networks.
Monitoring, supporting and regulating early childhood education services in NSW, working to ensure the delivery of quality early education for children from birth up to and including school age.
About the role
This role identifies major reports, evaluations and initiatives where extensive data analysis is required to inform the development of directions of the Quality Teaching and Impact unit.
The role is also accountable for managing and analysing data using the Salesforce platform and database systems to contribute to key projects. Support the delivery of sound and evidence-based recommendations through the application of advanced analytical and quantitative problem-solving skills.
Manage the operation of the CSAW Salesforce platform including the resolution of issues to ensure the reliable operation by the more than 700 users
Conduct valid and reliable analysis and resource of data to support the delivery of sound and evidence-based recommendations through the application of advanced analytical and quantitative problem-solving skills
Prepare reports and documentation based on information synthesised from complex data sources using advanced data analysis and reporting techniques
Build effective working relationships and work collaboratively with stakeholders, internal and external clients and other business partners to access data, products and advice and improve the quality control of data collection
Undertake and manage data requests as required and directed for the Strategic Delivery and Delivery Support services
Ensure data integrity and quality control are embedded within service delivery teams using the platform
Coordinate data management activities, data collection, processing, high quality control and documentation are delivered on time and to the required standard
Support the evaluation of key project initiatives through data analysis to identify accomplishments and areas of continuous improvement
Managing the Salesforce relationship and changes to the platform for the effective operation of Strategic Services Tailored Support.

How to apply
The NSW Department of Education is committed to a diverse and inclusive workforce as an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) employer. We encourage diverse applicants from a range of backgrounds to apply for roles in the department.

To be considered for this role, you must include:
a one page cover letter
a resume (no longer than 5 pages)

For enquiries about this role, contact Jordi Austin, Director, School Performance North, Department of Education, at 0436 807 005 or by email to jordi.austin@det.nsw.edu.au.

If you are progressed to interview you will need to provide the following documents and your employment may be subject to the Department’s Nationally Coordinated Criminal History Check to determine your suitability for employment.

Please note: If you are progressed to interview, you will be required to provide your proof of identity information and complete an INFORMED CONSENT declaration.

Note: A recruitment pool may be created through this recruitment process. A recruitment pool is a group of applicants who have been assessed and identified as suitable for this role or similar roles, and who may be considered for a range of similar roles, including temporary, term or ongoing roles, over the next 12 months.
ESSENTIAL REQUIREMENTS
Knowledge of and commitment to the Department's Aboriginal education policies (Please find Aboriginal Education Review – Information)
Working with children check for paid employment


Pre-Screening Questions
Tell me about a time when you were required to implement an IT solution to a variety of stakeholders with different technical abilities. How did you go about planning the implementation? What was the outcome? (Max 400 words)
How have you helped your manager to promote a positive attitude in the team? Give an example. (Max 400 words)
NSW Public Service Commission
13 days ago
Report job"
18,BUSINESS INTELLIGENCE DATA MODELER,University of Melbourne,"$105,684 - $114,389 a year",Parkville VIC,"Job no: 0051888
Work type: Continuing
Location: Parkville
Division/Faculty: Chief Operating Officer Portfolio
Department/School: Operational Performance Group
Salary: $105,684 - $114,389 (UOM 8)
Role & Superannuation rate: Professional - Full time - 17% super
In 2021 The University of Melbourne has embarked on the Professional Services Redesign (PSR) to enable services improvement and more effective ways of working. This opportunity has been newly created as part of the PSR.
About Operational Performance Group
The Operational Performance Group delivers functions that facilitate the design, evaluation, and improvement of services across the University, and business partnering services to Chancellery.
About the role
As the Business Intelligence (BI) Data Modeler, you will undertake the following activities to create and maintain a data blueprint for the University’s Data Assets (Data Warehouse, Enterprise Reporting System and Data Lake):
Providing project teams and developers detailed data models to guide their development activities.
Ensuring consistency across all data domains and data models.
Developing and maintaining coding and naming standards.
Working with IT application and project teams to ensure their reporting requirements meet agreed architectural principles and patterns.
Assisting with technical designs and development as required.
Resolution of data issues.
Assisting in root cause analysis of any data issues.
About you
You are a proactive individual who works well within a team environment, while also seeking tasks and working independently where required. You are a strong communicator, both written and verbal, with excellent attention to detail.
You will further have:
A bachelor’s degree in Information Technology, Business or an equivalent combination of relevant experience and education/training.
In-depth experience working as a BI data modeler within a large and complex data warehouse environment and in creating strategic and operational data designs.
Experience working with diverse teams of technology professionals.
Experience working with Oracle based technology.
Benefits
Maximise your benefits through our Salary Packaging scheme
Flexible family friendly policies, providing generous leave and working conditions
The opportunity to work in a culturally rich environment
A substantial discount to eligible staff and their immediate families in undertaking further studies at the University of Melbourne
To find out more, go to http://about.unimelb.edu.au/careers/staff-benefits
Culture
The University is a vibrant campus. We have well-established clubs and networks giving the opportunity to engage and collaborate with other staff around the University. We strive to create an environment where staff and students promote culturally inclusive behaviour and activities, ensure cultural differences are heard and explored, and actively seek to learn from other cultures.
How to apply
Your application submitted should include a cover letter (one page) outlining your motivation to apply for this role and describing what skills and experience you will bring to it. Please further attach a current version of your CV.
Please note that you are not expected to provide detailed responses against the selection criteria in the .
Staff in the redeployment pool will be considered for this role in the first instance where appropriate.

Advertised: 17 Feb 2021 12:05 AM AUS Eastern Daylight Time
Applications close: 03 Mar 2021 11:55 PM AUS Eastern Daylight Time
Today
Report job"
19,"Senior Epidemiologist/Data Analyst, COVID-19 Vaccine (VPSG5)",Department of Health and Human Services,"$101,120 - $122,348 a year",Melbourne VIC,"Job Description
Location: Melbourne | CBD
Job type: Full time / Until 30 June 2021
Organisation: Department of Health and Human Services
Salary: $101,120 - $122,348
Occupation: Health and Allied Health
Reference: VG/DHHS/CD/1511825
The Department of Health and Human Services develops and delivers policies, programs and services that support and enhance the wellbeing of all Victorians. Our services are in line with the government's vision for making Victoria a stronger, more caring and innovative state.
Our vision is to achieve the best health, wellbeing and safety of all Victorians so that they can live a life they value.
We are building an inclusive workplace that embraces diversity of backgrounds and differences to realise the potential of our employees for innovation and delivering services aimed at enhancing the lives of vulnerable Victorians.
The department is committed to the safety of its clients. The department takes a zero tolerance approach to abuse, including child abuse and abuse of people with disability.
Departmental employees are required to comply with all legal requirements including the Child Safe Standards to keep children safe from harm and abuse.
All jobs can be worked flexibly and we encourage job applications from Aboriginal people, people with disabilities, LGBTI and people from culturally diverse backgrounds.
If you want a career within a department striving to make Victoria the best place to be and helping shape communities we all want to be part of, then we encourage you to apply.
If you are an Aboriginal or Torres Strait Islander applicant, or if you have a disability, and require advice and support with the recruitment process, contact our Diversity Unit on DiversityInclusion@dhhs.vic.gov.au.
The department has a zero tolerance towards violence within the workplace and recognises the rights of all staff to be free from violence and gender-related discrimination.
Application Closes: 17th February 2021
Role: Senior Epidemiologist/Data Analyst, COVID-19 Vaccine (Role until - 30 June 2021)
Number of vacancies available: 3
Office Location(s): 50 Lonsdale Street/Work from home
Position Summary:
The COVID-vac group is responsible for managing and coordinating the roll-out of the COVID-19 vaccination to the state of Victoria. Operating as a dynamic multi-disciplinary team, the group will work closely with key internal and external stakeholders to deliver an effective and efficient immunisation campaign.
The Senior Data Analyst/Epidemiologist will work closely with the Data, Intelligence, Modelling and Epidemiology team responsible for COVID vaccine data, intelligence and reporting teams to ensure appropriate, consistent and comprehensive data and reporting processes, and epidemiological analysis and assessment across the program.
Responsibilities:
Support the delivery of full life-cycle project tasks across the Safety and Quality portfolio to meet program and departmental objectives
Provide thorough detailed data analysis and investigation, provide authoritative advice on trends, risks and issues and support business need.
Provide expert advice on the quality, accuracy and relevance of data
Contribute to the preparation of reports, ministerial briefs, cabinet and agency submissions.
Undertake epidemiological investigations and analyses supporting an effective, efficient and safe COVID vaccination program
Liaise with reporting and technical teams to support data collection and analysis, including preparation of briefs and presentations to a broad range of stakeholders
Maintain situational awareness of the evolving epidemiological issues relevant to the COVID-19 vaccine safety space with specific focus on safety and integrated vaccine surveillance systems
Establish and maintain effective working relationships across the department and work in collaboration with key stakeholders.
Identify current and future data requirements trends and provide input into continuous improvement recommendations.
Demonstrate how the actions and outcomes of this role and work unit impact clients and the department's ability to deliver, or facilitate the delivery of, effective support and services.
Take reasonable care for your own health and safety and for that of others in the workplace by working in accordance with legislative requirements and the department's occupational health and safety (OHS) policies and procedures.
-
How to Apply:
Applicants are encouraged to apply online, submitting a cover letter and a current resume.

Please note:
For this role, you are not required to address each of the key selection criteria in a separate written document. Applicants are strongly encouraged to review our Careers Page. This page provides information on the department's recruitment and pre-employment screening processes. Preferred candidates will be required to complete pre-employment screening, including a national police check and misconduct screening.
Click 'Apply Now' below to submit your interest in this role.

For further information please visit the Department of Health and Human Services website: https://www.dhhs.vic.gov.au/
Applicants must be an Australian Citizen, Permanent Resident or hold a valid work permit or visa. Work eligibility will be checked as part of the recruitment process.
Victorian Government
7 days ago
Report job"
20,Business Strategy and Performance Analyst,HSBC,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Business Strategy and Performance Analyst
Some career choices have more impact than others.
We’re looking for progressive minds who are driven and forward-thinking, who are open to different ideas and cultures, who can connect with customers and colleagues and who’ll work with courageous integrity every day.
As an HSBC employee in Australia, you’ll have access to tailored professional development opportunities, competitive pay, an embedded flexible working culture and a range of employee benefits. These include market-leading subsidised private health cover, enhanced parental pay and support when returning to work, subsidised banking products and services and wellness programmes including discounted gym memberships.
The primary responsibility of the Business Strategy and Performance Analyst is to provide support across Wealth and Personal Banking’s (WPB) Strategy, Business Management and Operations. This includes financial management, strategic analysis, performance monitoring, governance and operational execution.
Responsibilities:
Support the definition and monitoring of WPB Australia’s strategic priorities
Support undertaking structured problem solving of business challenges, with relevant analysis and compelling recommendations to respond.
Conduct analysis and due diligence on investment opportunities
Provide analysis of emerging industry, social and economic trends to identify commercial opportunities
Provide support delivering strategic projects, initiatives and events
Provide oversight and monitoring of costs, supporting P&L owners across the business
Identify and investigate operational and financial trends, working with the business on recommendations to respond
Qualifications
Requirements:
3+ years (approx.) of experience in Top Tier / Big 4 consultancy, investment bank or corporate strategy team
Degree in business / finance / economics preferred, but not essential
Outstanding academic record and social achievements
Strong Analytics and Quantitative modelling
Advanced MS Office (excel, powerpoint, etc.) skills
Robust analytical background and proven ability in financial/analytical reasoning, including contextualizing data to draw relevant insights and conclusions
Excellent written and oral communication with proven interpersonal skills and ability to influence at all levels of the organization
Demonstrated knowledge and experience in strategy and problem-solving frameworks, project and change management
Related experience in retail banking preferred but not essential
Due to current international travel restrictions and border closures, we can only consider candidates who hold either Australian Permanent Residency or Citizenship, or New Zealand Citizenship
HSBC is committed to building a culture where all employees are valued and respected and where opinions count. We take pride in providing a workplace that fosters continuous professional development, flexible working and opportunities to grow in an inclusive environment. Personal data held by the Bank relating to employment applications will be used in accordance with our Privacy Statement, which is available on our website. Issued by HSBC Bank Australia Limited. #LI-HSBCAS1
4 days ago
Report job"
21,Master Data and Pricing Analyst - North Ryde,CSR Group,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Master Data and Pricing Analyst - North Ryde

Job no:
Work type: Specific Term
Location: Sydney
Categories: Administration/Support, Corporate/Other
Master Data & Pricing Analyst (Maternity Leave Contract) - North Ryde
CSR is the name behind many powerful brands, providing innovative and sustainable building solutions across the residential, commercial, and industrial segments.
Part of the CSR family, our Masonry & Insulation Business Unit comprises of Bradford Insulation, Monier Roofing and PGH Bricks & Pavers. We manufacture and market a full range of products for residential and commercial applications including a large range of products and systems that cover insulation, ventilation, solar, bricks and roof tiles.
The Opportunity
We are looking for an experienced and self-motivated professional to join our team as our new Master Data & Pricing Analyst on a maternity leave contract. Reporting to the General Manager Customer Operations, your primary purpose will be to ensure compliance to master data standards in accordance with policy and procedure. You will be responsible for managing master data improvement projects and actively participate in projects requiring master data maintenance.
This role will be based at Head Office in North Ryde, close to trains and buses.
Key responsibilities include;
Ensure supply and install customer pricing and vendor pricing is processed in SAP in a timely and accurate manner;
Create and maintain service materials, customer material info. records, truck and suburb master data in SAP;
Ensure compliance to all master data conventions and defined standards from business master data personnel;
Identify areas for improvement in master data process and maintenance;
Assist the National Pricing Analyst in their responsibilities including:
Customer price changes
Implementation of Bradford price rises
National Customer price files
Customer Trading arrangement forms
Educate internal customers on process for material and pricing maintenance in SAP;
Carry out testing on new SAP functionality relating to master data.
To secure this role you will ideally need to demonstrate;
Previous experience in a similar role;
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills combined with a collaborative working style;
The ability to interact with people at all levels across the business;
Strong SAP ECC6 knowledge: SD, MM, PP and MS Excel skills;
Ability to handle pressure, prioritise and manage multiple tasks;
Strong attention to detail.
How to apply
If this is the type of role you would love to be involved in and you are passionate about developing your skills, apply online today with a resume and cover letter.
To learn more about us visit www.csr.com.au
Advertised: 04 Feb 2021 AUS Eastern Daylight Time
Applications close: 05 Mar 2021 AUS Eastern Daylight Time
12 days ago
Report job"
22,2021 Intern - Digital Media Marketing Analyst,Adobe,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Our Company

Changing the world through digital experiences is what Adobe’s all about. We give everyone—from emerging artists to global brands—everything they need to design and deliver exceptional digital experiences! We’re passionate about empowering people to create beautiful and powerful images, videos, and apps, and transform how companies interact with customers across every screen.

We’re on a mission to hire the very best and are committed to creating exceptional employee experiences where everyone is respected and has access to equal opportunity. We realize that new ideas can come from everywhere in the organization, and we know the next big idea could be yours!

The Opportunity
Adobe is hiring interns to join the team in 2021! The DMe (Digital Media) Marketing Analytics team is responsible for supporting the DMe Marketing Team through analysis of marketing performance, as well as measurement of, and research into, business and consumer trends which help inform marketing strategy. You will support the team in developing insights and perform analysis across a range of areas including Web Traffic and Conversion, and a variety of marketing activities including paid media, organic search, email, testing and more. We’re looking for someone who can identity and interpret data, has strong technical skills and possesses a strategic approach, is comfortable working in a fast-paced environment and can adapt to shifting conditions, priorities, and deadlines. You are meticulous, detail focused, and an ambitious self-starter
The role will be a valued member and provide vital support to the DMe CSMB A.com Marketing Team. This role is working across a 6-month fixed term basis and is suitable for those in their final year of study.
What you'll do:
Support in the development of weekly analysis, insights, and recommendations to the marketing team
Conduct ad hoc deep-dive analysis on marketing opportunities or problem areas
Support team to develop quarterly forecasting of marketing performance
Maintain marketing dashboards
Observe and evaluate trends of marketing efforts and business results
Provide data visualizations and reports to marketing team and management
Support in the development of weekly and quarterly reporting updates to internal partners.
Stay on the cutting edge of industry standard methodologies, trends, and new technologies
The ideal candidate for this position has:
Be in the final year of relevant academic studies in marketing, communications, business or related fields
Able to work a minimum of 4 days per week for six months
Work experience in a data analyst role, or a technology or ecommerce business
Analytical skills, including ability to conduct research, analysing data and developing hypotheses
Proficiency in Excel (pivot-tables, V-lookups, graphics)
Experience using Adobe Analytics or similar analytics platform
Experience using other analytics/dashboard platforms like Tableau, Microsoft BI, Datorama etc
Time management and project management skills.
Ability to work collaboratively with a team members and internal partners.
Ability to communicate ideas (verbally and in writing)
30+ days ago
Report job"
23,"Principal Data Analyst, Data and Intelligence (VPSG6)",Department of Health and Human Services,"$124,033 - $165,983 a year",Melbourne VIC,"Job Description
Location: Melbourne | CBD
Job type: Full time / Until 30 June 2021
Organisation: Department of Health and Human Services
Salary: $124,033 - $165,983
Occupation: IT and Telecommunications
Reference: VG/DHHS/CD/1513090
The Department of Health and Human Services develops and delivers policies, programs and services that support and enhance the wellbeing of all Victorians. Our services are in line with the government's vision for making Victoria a stronger, more caring and innovative state.
Our vision is to achieve the best health, wellbeing and safety of all Victorians so that they can live a life they value.
We are building an inclusive workplace that embraces diversity of backgrounds and differences to realise the potential of our employees for innovation and delivering services aimed at enhancing the lives of vulnerable Victorians.
The department is committed to the safety of its clients. The department takes a zero tolerance approach to abuse, including child abuse and abuse of people with disability.
Departmental employees are required to comply with all legal requirements including the Child Safe Standards to keep children safe from harm and abuse.
All jobs can be worked flexibly and we encourage job applications from Aboriginal people, people with disabilities, LGBTI and people from culturally diverse backgrounds.
If you want a career within a department striving to make Victoria the best place to be and helping shape communities we all want to be part of, then we encourage you to apply.
If you are an Aboriginal or Torres Strait Islander applicant, or if you have a disability, and require advice and support with the recruitment process, contact our Diversity Unit on DiversityInclusion@dhhs.vic.gov.au.
The department has a zero tolerance towards violence within the workplace and recognises the rights of all staff to be free from violence and gender-related discrimination.
Application Closes: 26th February 2021
Role: Principal Data Analyst, Data and Intelligence (Role until - 30 June 2021)
Number of vacancies available: 1
Office Location(s): 50 Lonsdale Street/Work from home
Position Summary:
Design and develop predictive algorithms for optimizing and driving efficiencies in order fulfillment.
Design and contribute to develop predictive models using modern techniques in the domains of demand forecasting, assortment optimization, robotics, and for testing planning.
Responsibilities:
Develop models, algorithms, and applications in the areas of AI, advanced Analysis.
Hands-on ownership architecting and developing highly scalable & highly available implementations in public Cloud.
Participate in the entire testing data analytics lifecycle driving adoption and scale applying best practices that drive agility and quality
Apply data and statistical analytics to government data to drive transparency and accountability through our performance audit program
Play a leading role in collaborating with TDI/DIME modelling team
Establish and maintain positive relationships with internal and external partners.
Drive an evidence-based, scientific approach to modelling.
Teach and learn every day to continuously develop your own and others' technical and professional skills
Identify and monitor trends and translate them into strategic advice for the team and organisation.
Maintain informative and succinct documentation on, data models, designs etc in a shared knowledge base.
Share knowledge develop and mentor capabilities of team members, and client teams.
Attend relevant team meetings and meetings with other teams within the response to stay updated on developments and cultivate opportunities for collaboration between teams.
Provide updates on routine reporting and other ad hoc requests to the data Lead and unit managers.
-
How to Apply:
Applicants are encouraged to apply online, submitting a cover letter and a current resume.

Please note:
For this role, you are not required to address each of the key selection criteria in a separate written document. Applicants are strongly encouraged to review our Careers Page. This page provides information on the department's recruitment and pre-employment screening processes. Preferred candidates will be required to complete pre-employment screening, including a national police check and misconduct screening.
Click 'Apply Now' below to submit your interest in this role.

For further information please visit the Department of Health and Human Services website: https://www.dhhs.vic.gov.au/
Applicants must be an Australian Citizen, Permanent Resident or hold a valid work permit or visa. Work eligibility will be checked as part of the recruitment process.
Victorian Government
1 day ago
Report job"
24,Culinary Business Analyst,Compass Group Australia,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Compass Group is the world leader in hospitality and support services, employing more than 500,000 people across 50 countries who serve over 5 billion meals every year. Here in Australia we employ more than 14,000 people across 400 sites. Our core sectors are Business & Industry, Healthcare & Seniors, Education, Defence and Offshore & Remote.
Reporting to the National Culinary Manager, we’re looking for an exceptional Culinary Business Analyst to work in this highly visible and business facing position. This role requires someone who can engage with stakeholders at all levels to support our incredible National Culinary team. If you are a foodie with a passion for data, this is the role for you!
The Role:
Identifying data sources and the collection of data
Supporting the Business Development team with bid costings
Analysing data to find answers to specific questions
Supporting and developing national menu analytics and food cost analysis
Menu costing support for the national culinary team
Generating information and insights from data sets and identifying trends and patterns
Preparing reports and presentations for executive, project teams and client meetings
Creating visualisations of data
Identifying and mitigating potential risks
The Person:
A Bachelor’s degree in a relevant field
Experience working with and influencing senior decision makers
Experience handling and analysing complex, high volume data with excellent attention to detail
Presentation skills – ability to write and speak clearly to easily communicate complex idea in a way that is easy to understand
Extensive knowledge and experience of MS Office products, with advance Excel skills
The ability to work in a fast-paced environment with cross-functional teams
Ability to support site based personnel on remote mine sites during regular site visits
Ability to prioritise and manage conflicting deadlines
Excellent interpersonal and demonstrated facilitation skills
The Benefits
We place great importance on being an employer of choice and offer excellent career opportunities for high performers. As a large organisation we often have opportunities for career advancement, as well as opportunities to move within the business. We offer competitive salaries, recognition programs including individual and team awards, long service and company event days; site based benefits; and company discounts.
So, if you are a 'can-do' person, who thrives on new challenges; likes working in a team within a diverse environment; and consistently delivers to the highest quality, then you'll fit right in and we'd like to have you on our team.
2 days ago
Report job"
25,Data Analyst - Home Loans,ANZ Banking Group,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Requisition Title -
Data Analyst - Home Loans
Job Number: - AUS125413
Description

Job Title: Data Analyst
Location: Docklands, Melbourne

Help shape the future as we leverage data to flip traditional banking on its head
Get stuck into our huge data sets to create solutions for our customers
Join a progressive organisation with the people and policies you want
At ANZ our purpose is to shape a world where people and communities thrive and to achieve this, we need a talented Data Analyst to join our Home Loans Tribe. Are you passionate about driving great outcomes for customers? Could your skills and passion help us drive innovation and critical remediation work for the Home Loans Tribe? Are you a team player who loves to uplift the capability of our Home Loans data chapter? We need someone like you to join our squad
Our data analysts deeply understand the power of data to generate quality customer insights, manage information and identify trends to accelerate sound business decisions.
Your skillset will enable you to source and interrogate data, working with a focus on the future, with an active understanding of industry trends to ensure capability development is aligned. You will influence strategic direction by translating insights into practical business recommendations, communicating team objectives and presenting data in digestible, logical and compelling ways.
What a typical day might look like
Assist in sourcing, extracting and analysing data from multiple systems, applications, products and processes
Interpret data into insights, identify patterns and trends in the dataset to communication findings to project SME’s and other stakeholders
Communication to stakeholders and senior management to influence squad priorities
Perform calculations and apply critical thinking to determine root cause analysis
Assist in reports preparation based on analysis and presenting to management
What will likely be in your toolkit?
Hands-on experience with data processing platforms, tools and techniques:
SQL (mandatory & proficient)
Traditional database management platforms (e.g. Oracle, Teradata, EBD)
Scripting in Python, R, Pyspark (advantageous)
Innovation and problem solving skills
Good communication and presentation skills.
Hands-on knowledge and experience in the use of Jira, Confluence and Git.
Strong stakeholder engagement skills across various levels of the organisation.
A strong execution mindset and ability to deliver quality outputs and manage actions within required timeframes.
Critical thinking skills allowing you to question and investigate root cause analysis
Knowledge of Home Loan products, processes and system knowledge would be beneficial
You’re not expected to have 100% of these skills. At ANZ a growth mindset is at the heart of our culture and we actively encourage people to try new things. So if this role interests you and you feel you have most of these things in your toolbox, we’d love to hear from you.

About ANZ
We’re reinventing the way we do banking, and our community of collaborative, innovative thinkers who create human centred solutions are helping us get there. We’re responding faster to changing customer requirements, focusing on the things that matter and helping people achieve incredible things – be it buying their home, building a business or saving for things big or small.
We support our people by providing a range of flexible working options so they can work in the way that best suits them. We encourage you to talk to us about your need for flexibility and any adjustments you may require to our recruitment process or the role itself.
We’ll also offer you the opportunity to develop your career, working in a diverse and inclusive workplace where the different backgrounds, perspectives and life experiences of our people are celebrated and create a great place to grow, thrive and belong.
Interested in joining us? Click Apply now, or visit www.anz.com/careers to find out more or view other opportunities.
Reference number AUS125413
#GD4.4
5 days ago
Report job"
26,Data and Analytics Strategist,Akcelo,$350 - $550 a day,Pyrmont NSW,"This role is positioned to manage the data strategy and analytics offering for Akcelo, and help better understand our customer behaviour with market leading data strategy, connection and insights.
Role requirements:
You are a Subject Matter Expert in all things analytics and have the ability to understand core practices from data collection/creation through to visualisation.
Responsibilities range from consulting through to developing data models, data visualisation, and analytics set-up.
Provide direction, insights and guidance and create roadmaps for current – and target state – data architectures, whilst empowering brands to build analytics capabilities over time.
Work with brands on the design, development, implementation, and maintenance of complex data systems and solutions
Ability to pivot from analytics platforms such as Google Analytics and Adobe Analytics, through to analytics skills such as R, SQL, and BI tools.
Constantly search for insights that drive real value to the client, turning data into actionable insights and programs of work.
Ability to communicate different analytics and attribution models, ranging from control groups across customer lifecycle campaigns, media spend attribution, and acquisition activities, through to App goals.
Identify opportunities to further expand and develop an account.
Manage the implementation of tagging solutions for a core analytics platforms, websites, mobile apps, DMP solutions, digital marketing, and other 3rd party tracking solutions.
Help brands build strong analytics capability and embed data and insights into client teams to identify opportunities and drive business growth.
Hands-on experience with Advanced Google Analytics implementation including custom dimensions, custom events, and Adobe Analytics
Strong experience working with Google Tag Manager
Minimum 5+ years' working experience with web analytics implementation
Contract length: 3 months
Application Deadline: 09/02/2021
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Salary: $350.00 – $550.00 per day
Benefits:
Work from home
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Work Eligibility:
Permitted to work permanently with no restriction on hours (e.g. citizen, permanent resident) (Required)
Work Remotely:
No
COVID-19 Precaution(s):
Social distancing guidelines in place
15 days ago
Report job"
27,Data Integrity Analyst,The University of Queensland,"$80,784 - $86,768 a year",St Lucia QLD,"The role is responsible for enhancing data integrity within the Advancement CRM (Raiser’s Edge), in advance of the transition to a new CRM in 2022. The role has a strong focus on data configuration, and will be responsible for significantly enhancing the import of data sets to deliver enrichment of data.
This position is located at our picturesque St Lucia campus, renowned as one of Australia’s most attractive university campuses, and located just 7km from Brisbane’s city centre. Bounded by the Brisbane River on three sides, and with outstanding public transport connections, our 114-hectare site provides a perfect work environment – you can enjoy the best of both worlds: a vibrant campus with the tradition of an established university.
Our Ideal Candidate
Our ideal candidate will have experience and well-developed skills undertaking data analysis and optimising data integrity, ideally within an Advancement context, and will hold relevant qualifications.
You must have ongoing unrestricted work rights in Australia to apply for this opportunity.
We value diversity and inclusion, and actively encourage applications from those who bring diversity to the University. Our Diversity and Inclusion webpage contains further information if you require additional support. Accessibility requirements and/or adjustments can be directed to recruitment@uq.edu.au.
What We Can Offer
This is a full-time fixed term position at HEW level 6.
The full-time equivalent base salary will be in the range $80,784 to $86,768 per annum plus super of up to 17%.
You will be able to take advantage of UQ Sport Facilities, recreation leave loading (of 17.5%), salary sacrificing options, on-campus childcare, discounted private health insurance, cheap parking, development programs and many other benefits.
For further information, please review The University of Queensland's Enterprise Bargaining Agreement 2018-2021.

Questions?
To discuss this role please contact Kevin Owen, Manager, Business Solutions and Services at kevin.owen@uq.edu.au.
For application queries, please contact recruitment@uq.edu.au stating the job number in the subject line.
13 days ago
Report job"
28,Data Analyst | Australia,Swanky,"$60,000 - $75,000 a year",Toowoomba QLD,"Job Description: Data Analyst

About Swanky

We are a fast-growing Digital Consulting and eCommerce agency. We are leaders in the Shopify movement in Europe and are quickly making inroads into the US, Canadian and Australian markets.

Our focus is on creating nimble, flexible and cost-effective enterprise ecommerce solutions using Shopify Plus - the fastest growing Enterprise eCommerce platform on the planet.

Our growth has been achieved by helping our clients maximise their commercial potential through our Growth Accelerator service. Within the Growth Accelerator team, we have specialists that make up a full-service ecommerce function: CRO strategists, Performance Marketeers, UX Designers, SEO & Content Specialists & Project Managers.

We are looking for a Data Analyst with experience in CRO and customer insight development to help us cement our position as the best agency in the sector

Responsibility / Skills

Develop our analytical process - particularly expediting how we turn customer data into insight and therefore action
Developing flexible insight solutions across every stage of the customer journey (acquisition, conversion and retention) to facilitate quicker learnings.
Coaching and mentoring to up skill the company through advancing their use of data, including analysis, interpretation and presentation of data
Turn data and ideas into action by supporting the team with test ideation, strategy and presentation (including supporting with every stage of the testing process)
Internal reporting - this role could handle internal reporting (on our impact), and client reporting (both internally for learning and for the client) with a view to establishing ourselves as the source of truth for our clients data-led decisions
Research and development - advising and assisting with the analytical setup and ongoing management of new websites. To include the research and development of analytical opportunities during and prior to the new build stage of client engagement

This will involve having skills in the following areas:

Data analysis across all stages of the customer journey (acquisition, conversion & retention) and all areas of ecommerce performance.
Being able to create a story that communicates customer behaviour and reporting on client performance.
Being data curious and have the capability to out what the data says, and more importantly, why
Be a great data communicator - being able to relay data in a way that is accessible to everyone
Enjoy collaborating on projects
Be able to create an insight generation programme, including knowing how to understand the customer, process and interpret the data
Be a problem solver and enjoy being able to find the solution to a business/customer issue

Requirements

(Ideally) proven experience in a data analytics and conversion rate optimisation role
(Ideally) experience using split testing software
Familiarity with Agile frameworks
Ability to document and troubleshoot errors
Excellent communication skills
Attention to detail
Analytical mind and problem-solving aptitude
Strong organisational skills
Familiarity with web technologies such as HTML, CSS, JavaScript useful but not a pre-requisite

Benefits:

Starting salary of $60k-$75k
Opportunity to grow and shape the position
Personal development within a fast-growing company
Opportunities to travel to work with remote working teams
Collaborative, creative working environment
Regular company socials and events, including Games Nights, and lunchtime sports
30+ days ago
Report job"
29,Business Analyst,Department of Customer Service,"$90,661 - $106,888 a year",Sydney NSW,"Business Analyst
Full Time Ongoing
Location – Sydney - McKell
SNSW Grade 7/8 - base salary starting at $90,661

About Service NSW
Service NSW is making it easier for people and businesses across NSW to access government services.

Since launching in July 2013, we have successfully transformed and streamlined NSW Government service delivery with cutting edge digital solutions and an award-winning culture of passion and teamwork.

Our customer-centric solution offers simpler and faster access to government transactions through our digital channels, a 24/7 phone service and an expanding network of Service Centres.

We currently partner with more than 50 agencies to offer in excess of 1,000 NSW Government transactions including driver licences, vehicle registration renewals, applications for birth certificates, Senior Cards, Housing NSW payments, fines, contractor licences and many more.

Your remuneration
SNSW Grade 7/8- The package includes the base salary range of $90,661 to $106,888, plus employer's contribution to superannuation and annual leave loading.

Opportunity
We are looking for a Business Analyst role to join our team. This role supports the Project Manager and Senior Business Analyst and requires an understanding of the importance of high value customer service delivery. Contact Centre experience desired but not essential.

To be successful in the role you as a Business Analyst, you will require:

Analytical and problem-solving skills that can be applied to any business or technical area without detailed knowledge of that area
Be detail-oriented and capable of delivering a high level of accuracy
Take responsibility for delivering high quality customer focused services
Very good interpersonal and consultative skills
Very good communication skills, both oral and written and the ability to communicate complex problems in a way the audience can understand.
A can-do attitude and be willing to have a go

The key accountabilities for the Business Analyst include:

Assist with discovery activities including development of customer journey maps, and service blueprints and customer research
Development of process maps
Data analysis and presentation of findings
Work closely and support the Senior Business analyst to produce key deliverables on the projects
Assist the project manager to complete project artefacts including scope definition, options analysis, steering committee packs, prepare of presentation packs, pilot planning, showcases and go-live support

Please note that employment at Service NSW is subject to a satisfactory Criminal Records Check.

Applications Close: Wednesday 3rd March @ 10.59am

When applying you need to:
Provide a covering letter and resume (Resume not exceeding 5 pages) that details your experience and how you meet the capabilities of the role.

Want to know more?
For a confidential discussion about this role or the Service NSW recruitment process, please contact at Kannan Iyer at Kannan.iyer@customerservice.nsw.gov.au

Additional information
Part of the assessment process includes additional online capability testing, skills testing or work samples in accordance with the Government Sector Employment Act 2013. A talent pool may be created for future ongoing and temporary roles and is valid for a period of up to 12 months. Employment to Service NSW is subject to a satisfactory national criminal record check.

Service NSW is passionate about building a culture that values and supports diversity and inclusion. Service NSW encourages applications from people with disability, Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islanders, LGBTQI and people from culturally and linguistically diverse backgrounds. If you are a person with disability and need adjustment in the recruitment process, please contact the Recruitment team via email on CSrecruitment@customerservice.nsw.gov.au.
NSW Public Service Commission
Today
Report job"
30,Entry level Data Scientist / Risk Analyst opportunities,Commonwealth Bank,Not shown,Sydney Central Business District NSW,"Entry level Data Scientist / Risk Analyst opportunities
At CommBank, we never lose sight of the role we play in other people’s financial wellbeing. Our focus is to help people and businesses move forward, to progress. To make the right financial decisions and achieve their dreams, targets and aspirations.
Risk Management is responsible for protecting the Group’s and Bankwest’s interests by offering insightful risk leadership and a commercial yet independent approach to managing risks. The Board and Regulators trust Risk Management to be the line of defence that ensures returns are achieved within an acceptable level of risk.
We support flexible working and are looking to help you get your foot in the door while completing your university studies. Here in Retail Banking Services Risk Management, we are open to part time employment opportunities during 2021 with a move to full time in 2022 once you graduate.
We’re interested in hearing from people who
Are interested in risk management, willing to learn and be part of a highly engaged team
Have proficient written communication skills, can problem solve and collaborate well with other colleagues
Can think creatively, handle change and deadlines
Are on track to graduate in 2021/early 2022 (or have recently graduated) and have a degree with a major in Actuarial Studies, Computer Science, Economics, Engineering, Mathematics, Quantitative Finance, Physics or Statistics.
Use what you have learnt at university and through on the job training to:
Perform data analysis to monitor, measure, and manage risks.
Assist in development of risk analysis and use tools to do this.
Support the management and monitoring of credit or operational risk.
Help management in the implementation and communication of risk management projects.
Work productively together with your team to meet deadlines.
** Please Note – your University transcripts must be included in your application for it to proceed to the next recruitment stage **
If you're already part of the Commonwealth Bank Group (including Bankwest), you'll need to apply through Sidekick to submit a valid application. We’re keen to support you with the next step in your career.
We're aware of some accessibility issues on this site, particularly for screen reader users. We want to make finding your dream job as easy as possible, so if you require additional support please contact HR Direct on 1800 989 696.
Advertising End Date: 05/03/2021
1 day ago
Report job"
31,IT Business Analyst,Arista Technologies,"$80,000 - $100,000 a year",Alexandria NSW,"About us
Arista Technologies provide IT Consultancy, Management & Support Solutions, to business Australia wide. Our aim is to provide professional & cost effective enterprise level solutions to all businesses no matter the size.
Your responsibilities (not limited to)
Developing and implementing technology systems to optimise business processes and maximise profits for our organisation.
Analysis of business data regarding marketing, clients, strategies, IT processes, and operations.
Analysis of consumers behaviour and logic behind each feature of the product.
Manage the overall IT scope, providing guidance and assistance in the system software project decision-making process.
Work with users to formulate system requirements, develop system plans and documentation, review and evaluate existing systems, and design and modify systems to meet users' business needs.
Liaise with customers to determine best practices and guidelines for system functionality.
Prepare training documentation for users as well as organise formal sessions and seminars.
Maintain an up-to-date knowledge of IT and business processes.
Use process and data modelling techniques to develop and manage system software.
Utilise IT resources to create IT solutions effective in meeting the requirements of Arista Technologies.
Proffer recommendations to upper management on ways to maximise profits by improving systems processes.
Maintain accurate records of relevant technical and business information.
Communicate with users to obtain feedback and assist in resolving issues.
Conduct research to identify ways to improve systems performance and efficiency.
Skills, qualification and experience:
IT qualifications or 5 years’ of relevant experience may substitute for Degree.
Advanced Excel Skills.
Flexible and adaptive, can cope with priorities changing.
A high degree of written and verbal communication skills and proven interpersonal skills that assist in gaining the cooperation and support of others, particularly in a team situation.
Ability to document complex business processes and handle all types of client requests.
Sound analytical skills, mathematical skills and ability to solve critical problems.
Portuguese language skills are a plus as we have a number of Portuguese speaking clients.
Job Type: Full-time, Permanent
Salary: $80,000.00 – $100,000.00 per year
Job Types: Full-time, Permanent
Salary: $80,000.00 – $100,000.00 per year
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Work Remotely:
No
25 days ago
Report job"
32,Client and Customer Insights Analyst,"Anglicare NSW South, NSW West and ACT","$62,738 - $77,854 a year",Canberra ACT,"The core mission of Anglicare (NSW South, West & ACT) is to break the cycle of intergenerational poverty for children, young people and families. We have a particular focus on serving vulnerable communities in the ACT and regional, rural NSW.
We are looking for a Client and Customer Insights Analyst to be responsible for ensuring the voices of those people we serve are heard and used to make continuous quality improvement, enhance client sense of safety and empowerment. This role mainly involves managing internal evaluation/survey projects, in collaboration with frontline services. You will also get the chance to develop program evaluation reports that will assist in measuring and reporting on our client-focused outcomes.
In this role, you will be expected to:
Support the Deputy CEO and Senior Manager Research and Business Intelligence in developing Anglicare's Stakeholder Voice Strategy and Program.
Manage a rolling program of client and customer surveys in close collaboration with regional services.
Promote client engagement in the various client voice survey projects to ensure high client engagement and response rate
Analyse and interpret trends in complex client voice data sets, and develop timely evaluation and action reports in response to.
Support services to use the results to drive continuous improvement and service innovation.
Design new client voice surveys instruments, and identify data gaps in service quality, client outcomes and design data collection methods to close the gap.
Manage the Rental Affordability Snapshot(RAS) research project in collaboration with other Anglicare Australia network organisations
Any other duties related to evaluation and research that may be required to service the Anglicare Strategic Plan and Mission.
Prior experience in managing multiple research and evaluation projects simultaneously, and proven ability to analyse and interpret quantitative and qualitative data trends in complex data sets will be highly regarded. You need to have the ability to proactively and effectively engage with a broad range of stakeholders across the organisation. You should have a strong working knowledge of a wide range of qualitative and quantitative research methods, and an understanding of the role of advocacy in helping to address conditions of social disadvantage. Excellent writing skills and an ability to translate evidence and data into meaningful communications/reporting for specific target audiences would be a key skill required for this position.
The salary range for this position is from $62,738 to $77,854 per annum, plus 9.5% employer superannuation guarantee. Generous salary packaging benefits are available under Anglicare's PBI status.
Applicants will be required to undertake the psychometric profiling instrument. Applicants must obtain a Working With Children clearance through the Office of the Children's Guardian (NSW), Working With Vulnerable People clearance through the Office of Regulatory Services (ACT) and undergo a National Criminal History Check prior to an offer of employment.
For all inquiries, please contact Shirley Lin on (02) 6245 7179.
If you would like to join the Anglicare team, please send your written application addressing the key requirements to: https://anglicare.recruitmenthub.com.au/Job-Vacancies & enter Job Ref: 5363006*
*Applications close 26 February 2021 *
Job Types: Full-time, Permanent
Indeed
11 days ago
Report job"
33,Reporting and Data Analyst -> Commercial finance focus.,Noble People,"$65,000 - $70,000 a year",Melbourne VIC,"Know accounting but not keen to be one anymore!
True analytical role - add value to financial decisions
Well known National peak body


This well-known peak body is responsible for an industry that generates billions of dollars of economic revenue, as well as employment for over 100,000 Australians. A truly national body, they work right across the country, with their influence contributing to regional areas as much as major cities.


Growth and a need to increase the accuracy and effectiveness of commercial decisions has led to the creation of this finance focused Analyst role. Working closely with the Finance Manager and CFO, you will provide regular and ad-hoc financial insights and analysis that result in a commercial impact on the industry and organisation as whole.


In this varied and hands-on role, you will:


Provide a broad range of financial and broader performance analysis
Generate strategic analysis across budget and forecast support
Partner internal operational leaders on key decisions with clear metrics
Build and refine long term modelling and forecasting activities
Analyse and advise on key balance sheet and cash flow requirements
Support investment decisions via analysis. Monitor financial risk.
With an inquisitive mind and a constant business process improvement focus, you will need a core base of accounting experience or sound commerce background to ensure you understand the strategy, intent and financial implications of the information and analysis that you produce. This experience will be supported by strong Excel skills, clear and confident communication skills, and an enthusiastic and challenging mindset backed up by a highly analytical approach.


Salary shall be around $65 - $70k + super
1 day ago
Report job"
34,"Investment Bank - Fixed Income & Currencies: Sales, Trading and Structuring Graduate - Analyst",Deutsche Bank,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Details of the Division and Team:
Deutsche Bank is the leading German bank with strong European roots and a global network. We’re driving growth through our strong client franchise. Against a backdrop of increasing globalization in the world economy, Deutsche Bank is very well-positioned, with significant regional diversification and substantial revenue streams from all the major regions of the world. We serve our clients’ real economic needs in commercial banking, investment banking, private banking and asset management. We are investing heavily in digital technologies, prioritizing long term success over short-term gains, and serving society with ambition and integrity. All this means a career packed with opportunities to grow and the chance to shape the future of our clients.
The Deutsche Bank Graduate Programme:
From the day you join Deutsche Bank, you’ll be working as part of a global team that is transforming the world of banking. Our development programme offers extensive training, exposure to stimulating projects, and the opportunity to gain the knowledge and skills you need to provide innovative products and services to our clients. You’ll work alongside some of the industry’s top minds and build a valuable network that will support you as you progress in your career. You’ll be given various opportunities to not only have your opinions heard, but also get to make an impact at our company and for our clients. If you have the drive to succeed in the fast-paced financial services industry, Deutsche Bank is an exciting, supportive place for you to begin your career.
About the business division:
Fixed Income & Currencies (FIC) brings together a top-ranked institutional sales force, world-class research and trading expertise across Foreign Exchange, Rates, Credit and Emerging Markets. The Fixed Income & Currencies business enables Deutsche Bank to respond to increasing automation, regulatory expectations and client demand for standardization and transparency in execution across fixed income, currency and emerging markets.
Foreign Exchange
Deutsche Bank is an industry recognised leader in the foreign exchange business. Our client centric approach helps us to serve the needs of our customers across the full product spectrum from basic liquidity provision in the spot market to innovative derivative solutions for both asset and liability managers.
Rates
Deutsche Bank’s Rates business provides a comprehensive range of fixed income securities and OTC derivatives. We give clients access to the Bank’s liquidity and product expertise through our global sales and trading teams, as well as our electronic trading channels and clearing offering. Our product range includes Government, Agency and Mortgage-Backed Securities (MBS) as well as a suite of interest rate and inflation derivative products.
Credit
Deutsche Bank’s global Credit trading business enables clients to meet their investment objectives and manage credit risk. With industry-leading expertise in market-making and credit valuation, we offer clients a wide range of products across Flow Credit, Distressed Products and Structured Finance Trading. Products traded include bonds, loans and claims, ranging from the strongest investment grade issuers through high yield to distressed assets. Our Structured Finance experts provide structured risk and non-flow financing solutions for clients across multiple industries and asset classes.
What we will offer you:
A healthy, engaged and well-supported workforce are better equipped to do their best work and, more importantly, enjoy their lives inside and outside the workplace. That’s why we are committed to providing an environment with your development and well-being at its center.
You can expect:
Competitive Salary and non-contributory pension
Competitive salary as well as pension, insurance contributions and salary packaging
4 weeks annual leave, plus additional and wellbeing leave
Parental leave benefits including Childcare Assistance Payment
A range of flexible benefits including the Online discount program, employee referral program,
Your key responsibilities:
Upon joining the Bank you will begin your learning journey with our global orientation, followed by professional skills training and technical financial training.
During your first year with us you will benefit from a graduate learning journey, comprising both technical and professional skills training, further enhancing your learning experience.
Your day-to-day tasks will vary depending on your role and the desk you’re working on. In FIC you might be pricing products for traders, preparing financial data analysis, examining market trends or assisting in the origination, structuring and execution of transactions.
You will learn from the best, evolve professionally as well as personally, and build a firm foundation upon which to specialize later.
Whichever path you take, by the end of your programme you’ll have the skills and experience to launch a long-term career with us as a salesperson, trader or structurer.
Your skills and experience:
We recruit highly intelligent graduates who are ambitious and adaptable. They have degrees in many different disciplines. Even though good levels of numeracy are important for some roles, you won’t necessarily need a formal mathematical or financial background. We have very comprehensive training programmes that will give you all the technical knowledge you’ll need to build a career with us. Above all, we’re looking for entrepreneurial people who thrive best in a diverse culture where innovation and agile thinking abound.You should not only be passionate about the world of finance, but also show a keen interest in your chosen field. You already have a record of outstanding academic achievement and you’re eager to go on learning at the same intensive rate. So you’ll thrive on working in a highly collaborative environment with some of the best minds in banking.
How we’ll support you:
Flexible working to assist you balance your personal priorities
Coaching and support from experts in your team
A culture of continuous learning to aid progression
A range of flexible benefits that you can tailor to suit your needs
Training and development to help you excel in your career
About us and our teams:
Deutsche Bank is the leading German bank with strong European roots and a global network. Click here to see what we do.
Deutsche Bank & Diversity
Our values define the working environment we strive to create – diverse, supportive and welcoming of different views. We embrace a culture reflecting a variety of perspectives, insights and backgrounds to drive innovation. We build talented and diverse teams to drive business results and encourage our people to develop to their full potential. Talk to us about flexible work arrangements and other initiatives we offer.
We promote good working relationships and encourage high standards of conduct and work performance. We welcome applications from talented people from all cultures, countries, races, genders, sexual orientations, disabilities, beliefs and generations and are committed to providing a working environment free from harassment, discrimination and retaliation.
20 days ago
Report job"
35,Associate Data Analyst,Environment Protection Authority,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"There has never been a more exciting time at EPA as we work to prevent the harmful effects of pollution and waste on Victoria's environment and people, with a focus on zero tolerance for waste crime and unsafe waste management.
We are seeking Associate Data Analyst's - Waste Crime Programs (VP3.2) to join the new Waste Crime Prevention Directorate to implement the Government's Recycling Victoria policy and plan, based with the EPA in Sunshine.

Your role:
Provide high quality and timely data analytic information to prevent, detect and disrupt waste crime
Monitor and evaluate all incoming information to identify trends and patterns leading to waste crime
Deliver fit for purpose data analysis outputs that provide strategic direction to the Directorate
Build capability along with Senior Data Analysts and develop key insights to lead and aid strategic decision making
Qualifications & Attributes

Please refer to the attached position description
What's in it for you?

Work alongside a team of highly committed specialists to deliver programs and services that prevent harm to the environment and human health
Contribute to the EPA becoming a national and international leader in detecting and disrupting waste crime
Opportunity to provide key value and input into program design, roll out, and implementation
Flexible work options, personal and professional development
How to Apply:
Read the attached position description and apply online via our EPA Career Services. Within your application, please submit the following:

A completed application form
A completed cover letter addressing your experience, motivation, and suitability for the role
Your resume including the contact details of two appropriate referees
Inquiries can be directed to David Lovell - Manager - Waste Crime Programs on David.lovell@epa.vic.gov.au or contact People and Culture Services at Recruitment@epa.vic.gov.au
All prospective employees are required to undergo a National Criminal Record Check before an employment offer being made. Individual responses to key selection criteria listed on the Position Description are not required. EPA Victoria is committed to supporting employees through flexible work arrangements and encouraging work/life balance.
We are dedicated to maintaining a safe and inclusive work environment where all employees are respected, valued, and supported. We proactively seek to employ a diverse workforce to leverage the varied ideas of all employees, that drive innovation and success in everything we do. Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander people are encouraged to apply. EPA Victoria welcomes applications from serving or past members of the Australian Defence Force. If you require advice and support with the application process, please contact the Recruitment team on 1 300 372 842.
EPA Victoria utilise an Order of Merit process whereby applicants deemed suitable may be retained on a Merit List, from which their application may be accessed for recruitment to this role within a 3-month period. Note: Applications received via e-mail will not be considered. For further information on Environment Protection Authority Victoria, please visit www.epa.vic.gov.au
6 days ago
Report job"
36,Data Scientist / Senior Analyst,Deloitte,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Date: 16-Feb-2021

Location:
Sydney, NSW, AU

Department:Description:
About our team

The A&A Analytic Solutions team is at the heart of the Audit & Assurance Digital Strategy across Deloitte Asia Pacific. Our team of data technologists (Artificial Intelligence / Machine Learning / Deep Learning), designers, developers and management consultants coupled with our proprietary data platform powers the next generation offerings helping clients make better data-driven decisions. We're absolute data nerds and love working with numbers and large data sets (the more unstructured, the better). Data brings us together; our difference inspires creativity and our focus on culture is our adhesive!

We believe that success comes from fully understanding the impact of choices and using a data driven approach drives improved operational and strategic decision making. Our team brings diverse thinkers from multiple disciplines to work together in a dynamic, fast paced and creative environment. We thrive on challenges enabled by our diverse portfolio, promote curiosity and continuous learning, all whist providing a supportive and inclusive team culture.

What will your typical day look like?

Advising clients to help solve real-life business problems across diverse industries through use of data, cloud, analytics and AI technologies;
Performing “hands on” statistical and machine learning modelling, computations, and data engineering to deliver best-of-breed analytical solutions to meet the need of the problem space;
Aiding in solution development from design through to production;
Involvement in identifying trends and innovation in deep learning, machine learning and related technologies to inform the future development of solutions for our clients.

Enough about us let's talk about you. You’re someone with…

Strong track record in understanding business problems and implementing analytical solutions to solve them with extensive experience in explaining complex technical concepts in simple terms.
3 – 5 years relevant work experience with data analytics, feature engineering and model development using market leading machine learning and deep learning techniques. Client facing experience will be strongly valued.
Expertise in writing production code using Python, in particular Pytorch and Tensorflow.
Fluency in data querying and manipulation using cloud-based SQL and NoSQL database technologies.
Minimum of BA/BSc degree in a quantitative degree such as Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Epidemiology, Computer Science, Engineering, or related field. Advanced degree (MA/MSc, equivalent or higher) is an advantage.
Foundational understanding of statistical techniques like (generalised)linear regression, statistical inference, clustering, time series, etc
Experience in utilising modern MLOps/DevOps approaches to manage and deploy models at scale on Azure (preferred), AWS or GCP.
Ideally, experience or a strong interest in developing Cognitive analytics solutions including NLP, Voice and Video Analytics.
Experience with Big Data analytics, including Hadoop, Spark, graph analytics would be desirable..
Additional experience with other programming languages is ideal such as Scala, R, Julia, or other programming language for big data analysis would be valued.
Ideally experience in building ML solutions within the Finance Function on at least one of the following industries - Government, Financial Services, Insurance, and Consumer and Industrial Products.

Why Deloitte?
At Deloitte we create positively differentiated work experiences that enable our people to feel valued and achieve their full potential. We value difference and embrace people with diverse backgrounds and thinking styles. Knowing that people work best in different ways we are happy to discuss alternative arrangements if the working pattern you are looking for is not specifically indicated.
30+ days ago
Report job"
37,Senior ETL Data Analyst,Cognizant,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Position Summary:
ETL Data Analyst proficient in analyzing, interrogating and modelling complex data at an enterprise scale.
As an ETL Analyst, the candidate should have a good understanding of Data warehousing and have hands-on on Oracle, Teradata and Mainframe expertise.
Hands-on SQL knowledge and should be able to write complex queries.
Experience in working with Bigdata platforms and with various utilities like Hive, spark, pig, scala, impala, kafka
Demonstrated experience in gathering and documenting data requirements, data migration business rules and development of complex data maps.
Mandatory Skills:
The candidate should have expertise in various ETL tools and experience in data analysis of critical business data coming from different source systems.
He/She should also be able to remediate any data related issues in large and complex datawarehouse applications and provide necessary insight for key business decisions.
Candidate should have expertise on SQL server and Oracle databases and Power BI based applications
Knowledge of source control such as Git, Bitbucket
Knowledge of Unix system and IBM QuerySurge testing tool.
Strong understanding of various custom and industry standard data warehouse applications used large enterprise environments.
Ability to effectively communicate and present to all stakeholders (translate technical requirements into non-technical and vice versa).
Duties and Responsibilities:
The candidate should have experience in release management and deployment activities, incident management, capacity management for datawarehouse applications.
The requirement is for a client facing position that requires the candidate to be able to work independently at client site and work within stringent timelines ensuring organizational standard of efficiency and quality.
Candidate will have strong documentation skills and translate technical documentation.
An understanding and working experience in reporting & data visualization techniques and tools such as Business Objects, PowerBI.
He/She should have Excellent analytical skills - the ability to identify trends, patterns and insights from data.
He/she should have Presentation skills – ability to write and easily communicate complex ideas in a way that is easy to understand.
Perform statistical and forensic analysis.
Should be both an individual contributor and a team player.
He has experience in working on Agile and Waterfall project models
Salary Range: AUD >80,000

#LI-CTSAPAC
Employee Status : Full Time Employee
Shift : Day Job
Travel : No
Job Posting : Feb 16 2021
About Cognizant
Cognizant (Nasdaq-100: CTSH) is one of the world's leading professional services companies, transforming clients' business, operating and technology models for the digital era. Our unique industry-based, consultative approach helps clients envision, build and run more innovative and efficient businesses. Headquartered in the U.S., Cognizant is ranked 194 on the Fortune 500 and is consistently listed among the most admired companies in the world.
Today
Report job"
38,PRODUCT LIFECYCLE DATA ANALYST,McCormick,Not shown,Palmwoods QLD,"PALMWOODS, QLD, AU, 4555
Product Lifecycle Data Analyst, McCormick Australia
Opportunity to work from Moorabbin, VIC or Palmwoods, QLD sites
Work with well known brands in one of Australia's best FMCG businesses
Make your mark whilst contributing to the McCormick long term plan
It's an exciting time to be in APZ - McCormicks growth region. Our business here is transforming in remarkable ways. From the rice and spice fields of India and South East Asia to Australia's herb farms, our mosaic of rich distinct cultures inspires the boldest of flavours. Our headquarters and TIC in Singapore, along with our new and transformed facilities in Thailand, India and Australia are powering our regional growth ambitions. Here you'll find a culture that celebrates the best of both; the energy of and pulse of a startup and the solid legacy of our McCormick brand. We're a region on the rise - bold, committed and hungry - so only changemakers need apply!
Reporting to the Commercialisation Manager within the Marketing department, this role is responsible for the build of product master data utilizing SAP & QAD to support all business functions; and to review, improve and develop product lifecycle processes to assist the business to better utilize SAP and QAD. Liaising with many departments and key subject matter experts, this role will be responsible for the deletion and change of all materials/products both current and new. Initially you would be capturing all available data within internal systems for future interfacing and E-commerce.
Our Company
What if there was a company who puts people first - people who take what they do seriously, but not themselves? People who strive for excellence, have a great attitude, care for the safety of each other and our consumers, people who are innovative and lead by example - because these are the values necessary for a successful career with McCormick Australia.
McCormick’s Passion for Flavour is brought to life through our consumer brands Gourmet Garden, Keen’s, Aeroplane, French’s and Frank’s. But more than this, we are passionate about our people and our supportive, high performance culture - that’s what it takes to build Australia’s Leading Flavour Company!
Ongoing training will lead into being a SAP super user, and key subject matter expert for E-commerce functions within the business. Working with all relevant departments, sites, and divisions within the business to capture data to support E-commerce. Challenge and question data with subject matter experts as required.
The ideal candidate will have a solid understanding of end to end business processes and how master data impacts and affects these processes, as well as general knowledge of retail industry useful for understanding and evaluating data.
Role Responsibilities
Delete and change all SAP and QAD master data items, for the complete lifecycle of the product
Participate in new product development processes to ensure all data is captured by subject matter experts to support B2B and B2C processes
Ensure integrity of data for EDI, B2B and B2C information interfaces, including regular audit reports
Support with GSX for new customers progressing on the EDI platform
Communicate to other departments as data is required or requires changing and action such as deletions, exposure and financial impact
Technical Skills & Experience Required
High attention to detail
Intermediate to advanced excel
Exceptional cross functional communication skills
Ability to adapt to the agile needs of the business
Ability to understand change management (for when the position progresses to SAP global integration)
Ability to make/grow internal relationships and influencing skills to meet timelines
This role requires a sophisticated level of problem-solving capability and the ability to think a problem through from end to end. With the B2B environment still evolving, the ability to research and propose solutions that may not currently be in use is critical, whether this is through utilizing the existing data better or developing new processes.
We are seeking someone who has a methodical and considered approach.
Our ambitions are bold. If you are a change-maker with a passion for flavour and an appetite for a good challenge, come have a seat at our table. Your application will be treated in strict confidence.
McCormick is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. If you are a qualified applicant, you will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, colour, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.
4 days ago
Report job"
39,"Reporting Analyst, RPO",KORNFERRY,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Req Number:
KFINT16750

Location:
SYDNEY, New South Wales

Posted:
1/25/2021

Category:
SOLUTIONS

Job Type:
Permanent
About us
At Korn Ferry we are passionate about what we do, the value we bring to our clients and the careers we provide our people. We pride ourselves on high quality execution, encourage a culture of ongoing career development and recognise performance and commitment.
As the global industry leader in high-impact recruitment solutions, we offer fully customised, flexible services to help our clients meet their talent and recruitment needs. Our focus on unlocking IP, relationships within the broader Korn Ferry group, the calibre of people and delivering excellence, helps to provide a compelling and competitive proposition.
Korn Ferry provides its employees with a truly global opportunity to work with the best clients, as well as the best tools, technologies and expertise in the industry.
What's on offer
We have an exciting opportunity for a Reporting Analyst to join Korn Ferry RPO team. This role will allow you to showcase your analytics and reporting skills, as you take responsibility for a portfolio of key clients. You be responsible for building and supporting reporting development, producing scheduled and ad hoc reports and performance dashboards.
You will work with our onsite RPO teams and stakeholders, to support client reporting and data requirements, workforce planning and account management.
This is an excellent opportunity for someone with a demonstrated experience and a passion for gathering information from various sources and tools, transforming the information and effectively presenting to key stakeholders. The role offers the opportunity to expand your knowledge, as well as diversity and agility as you work across various accounts and industries.
Experience
To be successful in this role, you will enjoy collaborating with teams across the business to seek information. You will enjoy working within a busy, fast-paced environment and will be action-oriented with have high levels of motivation and attention to detail.
If you’re an expert at multitasking, working to tight timeframes and enjoy taking accountability for your work, then you will thrive in this role. Equally, you will be someone who deals well with ambiguity, isn’t afraid to try new things and has a solution focus to problem solving.
In addition, you will have:
demonstratable experience working in a hands-on data or reporting role
excellent data visualization capability and ability to translate business requirements into dashboards that are easy to read and interpret preferably with PowerBI
extensive Excel skills including building macros, VBA, pivot tables
Experience presenting reports and data to key stakeholders would be highly advantageous, as would previous experience in a reporting analyst role within recruitment and HR.
The role can be based in Sydney or Melbourne.
Next steps
If you would like to play a role in shaping our clients vision, whilst building a career with Korn Ferry, get in touch today!
If you currently work for Korn Ferry or one of our affiliates, you must be eligible to apply for a different position within Korn Ferry to use the Careers Site. If you accept such a position, your benefits programs and Human Resources policies may change. Please consult with your HR contact for the new position concerning application eligibility, benefit programs, and HR policies applicable to that position.
22 days ago
Report job"
40,Course Development Analyst,Deakin University,"$89,427 - $98,468 a year",Australia,"Job no: 506998
Work type: Full-time
Location: Flexible
Categories: Administration
Based at our Melbourne Burwood, Geelong Waterfront or Warrnambool campus
Full-time, continuing position
HEW 7 $89,427-$98,468 p.a + 17% super
Deakin is Australia’s sixth largest university and ranks first in Victoria for both student satisfaction and graduate employment.
The Market Insights Unit is one of the high-performing units of the University’s Marketing Division and is responsible for gathering and sharing insights, information and advice in relation to the customer, course development and review, competitor behaviours, brand and campaigns and the broader market environment in order to inform and influence University business and marketing strategy.
An opportunity now exists to join the Unit as Course Development Analyst where your primary role will be to collaborate with Faculty and other agencies within the University to research, analyse and provide marketing advice and support on the development of new courses and the revision of existing courses.
Your key responsibilities will include:
Design and execute qualitative and quantitative research projects when required to provide robust testing of new/existing course developments.
Undertake proactive data mining, research to identify course development opportunities (domestic and international) and develop and present analysis and reporting to support further consideration of these opportunities.
Work with Faculties to identify course development priorities and undertake the collection and analysis of insights to support these priorities.
Ensure the implementation of all University policies that relate to the areas for which the position is responsible, in particular, those relating to the conduct of surveys, information privacy, information and records managements and trade promotion lotteries.
To be successful, you’ll have:
A tertiary degree in marketing, business analytics or other disciplines providing for the development of strong analytical skills; and formal training or qualifications in strategic analysis
Demonstrated extensive experience in transforming and interpreting market data into well-articulated actionable insights on product, market and customer trends.
A strong understanding of traditional and contemporary market research methodologies, both qualitative and quantitative, including strong data extraction, analysis and numerical skills and attention to detail in regard to statistical reports.
Use of Microsoft Office, in particular advanced use of MS Excel in data analysis and visualisation and Tableau along with a knowledge/experience of open source, and online information repositories, surveys, and analysis.
Proven capability to work positively and effectively as part of a collaborative work team
Demonstrated ability to organise and plan, and to meet rigid and conflicting demands and deadlines, along with the ability to adapt to changed priorities.

Applications for this position close on February 21st 2021.
Please submit your updated resume and a short cover letter outlining your skills and experience for this role.
Are You Ready?
Deakin is one of the new breeds of global universities – agile, dynamic and innovative. We are committed to making a genuine difference in people’s lives through excellence in education and research. As a Victorian university with a global impact, join us and let’s see what we can achieve together.
Our people are important to us, and we understand the significance of providing them with a dynamic and diverse working environment, with opportunities to grow and develop their careers.
At Deakin, we offer a variety of benefits including a flexible and sustainable working environment, lifestyle benefits and various discounts with our third-party suppliers.
We value diversity and aim to build an inclusive environment that champions, embraces and respects differences. We support and encourage applications from Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander people, and people of all abilities, cultures, sexual orientation, and genders.
Advertised: 09 Feb 2021 AUS Eastern Daylight Time
7 days ago
Report job"
41,Campaign Data Analyst,ANZ Banking Group,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Requisition Title -
Campaign Data Analyst
Job Number: - AUS125562
Description

Data Analyst (Campaign)- Deposits Tribe
Location: Melbourne or Sydney
At ANZ, everything we do boils down to ‘why’ – our purpose – to shape a world where people and communities thrive. We're just as focused on seeing our people thrive as well as our customers. We'll give you every opportunity to develop your career. We are responding faster to changing customer requirements, focusing on the things that matter the most, energising our people, eliminating waste and reducing bureaucracy.
ANZ has moved to a new way of working, leveraging agile practices. To understand more about this new way of working and if this role is right for you, we strongly encourage you to take a look at The ANZ Way vimeo channel where you’ll find ‘The ANZ Way’ animation and the ‘New Ways of Working’ animation.
We’ve also got some great information about what it’s like to work in ‘Data@ANZ’ on our new LinkedIn Life page.
The Role
Data Analysts deeply understand the power of data to generate quality customer insight, manage information, identify trends and make decisions. Campaign Developers take that knowledge and use it to drive customer contact and business outcomes.
This Data Analyst (Campaign Development) role sits within the Deposits Tribe. This is an opportunity for a campaign developer to build expertise in our remediation and compliance customer engagement, participate in projects that will seek to solve customer issues and communicate the outcomes to our customers.
This is a role for someone who wants to deliver tangible business and customer outcomes in one of the strategic focuses for the bank and use data and insights to drive changes and embed processes.
What will be in your toolkit?
Hands-on knowledge and experience with tools and techniques for analysis, data manipulation and presentation (e.g. SAS, SQL, Tableau)
Analytical and inquisitive mind-set to continuously improve the level of insight surfaced
Strong ability to translate data insights into practical business recommendations
Strong data visualisation skills
Ability to effectively communicate to all stakeholders (technical and non-technical) is absolutely essential
Broad capability and a proven ability to innovate and adapt to the latest developments
Minimum 1 years’ experience with a marketing automation tool
Minimum 3 years’ experience with SQL and relational databases
Strong interpersonal skills, including the ability to inspire, mentor, coach and develop others
Ability to quickly grasp new content and pick up new skills and technologies
Ability to ask for and give feedback
High attention to detail
Experience with Unica Campaign is highly desirable.
Experience with other Campaign management systems highly regarded especially experience with Adobe Campaign
Strong ability to operate without day-to-day direction. You will be self-driven, and able to navigate your way around new tools and teams to gain the knowledge required in order to perform your role end-to-end.
Able to understand data and process flows and map them through investigation and reverse-engineering
Privacy and risk savvy when it comes to data and marketing
What might a day in the life look like?
Analysing customer journeys across web and non-web channels
Mapping out the path of acquisition and conversion for web visitors from awareness to evaluation to conversion, understanding the journey of a prospect and their conversion into a customer
Designing journeys for prospect engagement and conversion across multiple channels
Using marketing and advertising platforms to implement marketing campaigns and journeys, including: Adobe Suite (campaign, analytics, audience manager, target), Google Suite (double-click, AdWords), Social (Facebook, LinkedIn), Unica Suite (Campaign, Optimise, UMO)
Working with Legacy, Modern and Emerging data platforms (GIW, ECDM, Teradata/CAA, GCP (CDE), EBD and others.
Authoring copy, building email templates, and other creative/content elements
Development of new reports or customisation of existing reports to provide the required measurements
Engaging with peers, vendors and agency partners to establish new capabilities and data feeds in order to achieve stated business objectives
Continuous generation, monitoring, presenting and conducting of 'fact-based' analysis of relevant customer and product insights to use at any time for the development and improvement of the business lending portfolio and its metrics
Continuous measurement and analysis of various customer journeys
Generate, monitor, present and analyse relevant customer insights, costs, benefits, and risks for customers, clients and cohort products; this could include business casing, what if scenarios and opportunity sizing & assessments as well as portfolio optimisation opportunities
Develop tools and methods to fully profile products, product categories, customers and customer segments to identify opportunities and areas of relative underperformance
Source data from a variety of sources to combine, synthesise and analyse to generate insights
Support key data platform and/or data scheduling jobs to support insights delivery to key audiences (e.g. frontline, other tribes)
Lead, Optimise, Design and execute business interventions (customers and operational) to uplift customer engagement and business performance
Share knowledge and align development across your chapter members
Things that I am (or strive to be!)
A team player
The customer’s biggest fan
A collaboration champion
Comfortable being uncomfortable
Continuous improvement junkie
Committed to my own and other’s growth
A problem solver
Commercially and Tech curious
Risk savvy
Pro-active
#GD4.4
5 days ago
Report job"
42,Data Business Analyst - Enterprise Data Management,Macquarie Group Limited,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Utilise your experience in Enterprise Data Management in the Financial Services sector in this newly created role within Macquarie's Financial Management Group. In this key business focused role, you will be required to work with the business cross functionally to build strong relationships and influence your key stakeholders.
In this role you will work closely with senior members of Finance and the business teams to drive data provisioning & enhancing data quality in a high-profile, change-oriented team.
You will be a self-starter, curious and driven, with the ability to self-manage workload and deadlines whilst maintaining a degree of accuracy and quality.
Your strong analytical, problem solving skills, coupled with your experience within Finance and/or product knowledge of financial instruments, will ensure you are successful in this role.
An understanding of Enterprise Data Management and data quality concepts would be desirable for this role.
Detailed Role & Responsibilities:
As a Data business analyst in data governance team for various mandatory and regulatory projects your key focus would be:
Ensure data risks are managed by supporting the team to:
evaluate aggregate data risks within the Group.
ensuring controls are implemented and tested for effectiveness
support monitoring of controls effectiveness
maintain strong working relationships with the risk management teams (FORM, Assurance)
Ensure management understanding of data quality issues and impacts:
engage with the Operations & Data Quality team to confirm issue status
perform thematic analysis of data incidents and issues
engage with stakeholders (Data Owners) to validate observations and agree call outs
ensure material issues are escalated / have visibility to data governance forums
Ensure risk / control gaps and or data quality issues are addressed by supporting the team to:
establish remediation plans for gaps and thematic/material data issues
ensure solutions are aligned to data frameworks and strategies
monitor actions to ensure delivery within agreed timelines
deliver status updates to the Data management team and Stakeholders (Data Owners)
You will bring to this role:
To be successful in this role, you will have 3-4 years of relevant experience in Data and Information Management roles as Data Business Analyst in the Financial Services industry. Regulatory projects experience within the financial services industry is preferred.
Working at the interface of business and technology teams, you will also possess:
an understanding of Enterprise Data Management and data quality concepts would be desirable
business Intelligence tool experience an advantage, for example Informatica, Alteryx and PowerBI
be analytical and have demonstrated experience in effective problem solving
experience working in a team-oriented, collaborative environment
finance and/or product knowledge of financial instruments is preferred
About the Financial Management Group
The Financial Management Group provides financial, tax and treasury services to all areas of Macquarie. The group is focused on providing strategic analysis and advice to Macquarie's businesses and senior management, managing Macquarie's funding, liquidity and capital position, ensuring Macquarie continues to meet regulatory and compliance obligations and managing Macquarie's corporate affairs.
Our commitment to Diversity and Inclusion
The diversity of our people is one of our greatest strengths, and in combination with our inclusive environment, it enables us to deliver innovative and sustainable outcomes for our people, clients, shareholders and communities. From day one, you'll be encouraged to be yourself and supported to perform at your best. If our purpose of ‘empowering people to innovate and invest for a better future’ is as inspiring to you as it is to us, please apply. With the right technology, support and resources, our people can work in a range of flexible ways.
We are committed to providing a working environment that embraces and values diversity and inclusion. We encourage candidates to speak with a member of our recruitment team if you require adjustments to our recruitment process to support you, and the type of working arrangements that would help you thrive.

About Macquarie
A career at Macquarie means you’ll have the opportunity to develop and utilise new skills, explore interesting fields and do challenging work that will impact the lives of people around the world—whether it’s accelerating the green energy transition, helping sustain global food supplies, financing social housing projects or investing in essential infrastructure. At Macquarie, we’re empowering people to innovate and invest for a better future.
Our size and international presence means your work can take you anywhere—across business groups, disciplines, sectors and borders. With 16,300+ employees and offices in 31 markets around the world, we’re a truly global organisation.
You’ll be supported by a diverse team where the unique perspectives, ideas and experiences that all of our people bring are valued. You’ll be empowered to address unmet needs in our communities whilst advising and investing alongside our clients and partners. Working with us, you’ll have the opportunity to make a difference.
Macquarie is a global financial group providing clients with asset management, retail and business banking, wealth management, leasing and asset financing, market access, commodity trading, renewables development, investment banking and principal investment.

Job no: FMG-956103
Work type: Full time
Location: Sydney
Category: Mid-level, Accounting & Finance, Data & Analytics, Projects, Improvements & Change
Group: Financial Management Group
Division: FMG Central
Recruiter: Maddy Wilson
Opening Date: 14/2/2021
1 day ago
Report job"
43,Business Analyst,Genpact,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Genpact helps organizations build resilience and prepare for tomorrow by reimagining their businesses today. We build solutions that demonstrate outstanding design for our clients and their customers. This is your opportunity to be part of a team that is building a positive impact on the world by crafting solutions that people love and making a difference in people’s lives.
Inviting applications for the role of Business Analyst:
Our focus is to make sure we have the right set of people delivering what we promise. People who obsess over operations, focus on the details, and lead change by being curious, incisive and courageous in everything they do—on a foundation of steadfast integrity.
Responsibilities:
Develop understanding of the business problem and suggest solutions.
Review, analyze, and evaluate business systems, practices and user needs.
Document requirements, define scope and objectives, and formulate systems to parallel overall business strategies.
Translate Business Requirements from users into standard templates for the project.
Linking of requirements across the project.
Write code in Power BI/Alteryx and other big data technologies.
Documenting the Test cases.
Engage with stakeholders to ensure open communication and a ‘one team’ approach.
Qualifications:
Experience with Power BI, Alteryx or big data technologies like Hadoop.
Experience with Jira and Confluence.
Experience questioning requirements and data to provide the best solution.
Minimum 1+ years of experience as a Business Analyst, and knowledge of commonly-used concepts, practices, and procedures.
Bachelor's degree in a related area.
Preferably have experience in Treasury and Group Reg Reporting projects.
Please note that this is a contract role providing services to Genpact through our direct sourcing partner, the Ian Martin Group, who manages Genpact’s Contractor Talent Community. If you are selected for this role, you will be employed by Ian Martin and will not be an employee of Genpact.
Genpact is committed to creating a dynamic work environment that values diversity and inclusion, respect and integrity, customer focus, and innovation. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and will consider applicants for all positions without regard to race, color, religion or belief, sex, age, national origin, citizenship status, marital status, military/veteran status, genetic information, sexual orientation, gender identity, physical or mental disability or any other characteristic protected by applicable laws. For more information, visit www.careers.genpact.com
Fitzii
30+ days ago
Report job"
44,Entry Level Data Analyst,Royal Australian Navy,"$85,000 - $89,999 a year",Melbourne VIC,"Your role:
This isn’t your average Intelligence or cyber job. As a Navy Data Analyst (also known in the Navy as a Cryptologic Networks position), you’ll be supported by classified Government intelligence programs to do a variety of tasks associated with computer network operations. You’ll obtain specialist intelligence and cyberspace operational skills and use high-tech computer equipment and software to support maritime operations at sea and ashore.
Your career will start in a variety of different environments where you'll master the fundamental skills. You’ll then move into a specialist Data Analyst role.
Teamwork is an important part of the job. You’ll work in a close-knit team that really rely on each other. There are also many opportunities for career growth and travel; all while playing a vital role in protecting Australia and her interests.
You’ll receive training that covers all aspects of cyberspace operations and intelligence. Some of your core duties include, but aren’t limited to:
- Collecting and analysing information,
- Detecting and responding to cyber incidents,
- Identifying threats,
- Protecting and hardening networks,
- Providing intelligence to support cyberspace operations,
- Preparing and presenting intelligence briefs and provide advice to Commanders and other audiences as required.
Prior experience isn’t needed. You’ll gain all the necessary skills and qualifications to become a Navy Data Analyst as part of your training.
Life in the Navy:
A career in the Navy is a challenging and highly rewarding working environment that comes with good work/life balance, competitive salary and skills for life. You can expect to feel a unique sense of accomplishment and pride from serving and protecting our country and helping to keep our vast coastlines safe.
Life in the Navy is anything but mundane. You’ll enjoy varied lifestyles, rewarding careers, opportunities to travel, and excellent social and fitness facilities, free medical and dental; all in a dynamic and fulfilling working environment.
Don’t worry, it’s not all life at sea—there’s more to the Navy than ships, submarines and helicopters. Some days, you might be exploring exciting new countries with your fellow crewmates. Other days, you could be stationed locally not too far from home.
Salary:
Be paid to train and learn the skills required to become a qualified Entry Level Data Analyst. Upon completion of your initial military and initial employment training, you’ll enjoy a competitive starting salary package of up to: $85,154 including service and uniform allowances, as well as a Maritime Allowance (if applicable).
In addition to your salary, you will receive generous superannuation, housing subsidies and free medical and dental.
Apply Now:
For this role, you must be over 17 at time of enlistment, an Australian Citizen and have passed Year 10 English, Maths and Science (physics is preferable).
Click the APPLY button if you think you have what it takes to become an Entry Level Data Analyst and we’ll get in contact with you shortly.
You can also visit the link below to view the full position description and learn more about life in the Navy.
https://navy.defencejobs.gov.au/jobs/cryptologic-networks
Job Types: Full-time, Permanent
Salary: $85,000.00 – $89,999.00 per year
Indeed
26 days ago
Report job"
45,Entry Level Data Analyst (Female Opportunity),Royal Australian Navy,"$85,000 - $89,999 a year",Australia,"Your role:
This isn’t your average Intelligence or cyber job. As a Navy Data Analyst (also known in the Navy as a Cryptologic Networks position), you’ll be supported by classified Government intelligence programs to do a variety of tasks associated with computer network operations. You’ll obtain specialist intelligence and cyberspace operational skills and use high-tech computer equipment and software to support maritime operations at sea and ashore.
Your career will start in a variety of different environments where you'll master the fundamental skills. You’ll then move into a specialist Data Analyst role.
Teamwork is an important part of the job. You’ll work in a close-knit team that really rely on each other. There are also many opportunities for career growth and travel; all while playing a vital role in protecting Australia and her interests.
You’ll receive training that covers all aspects of cyberspace operations and intelligence. Some of your core duties include, but aren’t limited to:
- Collecting and analysing information,
- Detecting and responding to cyber incidents,
- Identifying threats,
- Protecting and hardening networks,
- Providing intelligence to support cyberspace operations,
- Preparing and presenting intelligence briefs and provide advice to Commanders and other audiences as required.
Prior experience isn’t needed. You’ll gain all the necessary skills and qualifications to become a Navy Data Analyst as part of your training.
Life in the Navy:
A career in the Navy is a challenging and highly rewarding working environment that comes with good work/life balance, competitive salary and skills for life. You can expect to feel a unique sense of accomplishment and pride from serving and protecting our country and helping to keep our vast coastlines safe.
Life in the Navy is anything but mundane. You’ll enjoy varied lifestyles, rewarding careers, opportunities to travel, and excellent social and fitness facilities, free medical and dental; all in a dynamic and fulfilling working environment.
Don’t worry, it’s not all life at sea—there’s more to the Navy than ships, submarines and helicopters. Some days, you might be exploring exciting new countries with your fellow crewmates. Other days, you could be stationed locally not too far from home.
Salary:
Be paid to train and learn the skills required to become a qualified Entry Level Data Analyst. Upon completion of your initial military and initial employment training, you’ll enjoy a competitive starting salary package of up to: $85,154 including service and uniform allowances, as well as a Maritime Allowance (if applicable).
In addition to your salary, you will receive generous superannuation, housing subsidies and free medical and dental.
Apply Now:
For this role, you must be over 17 at time of enlistment, an Australian Citizen and have passed Year 10 English, Maths and Science (physics is preferable).
Click the APPLY button if you think you have what it takes to become an Entry Level Data Analyst and we’ll get in contact with you shortly.
You can also visit the link below to view the full position description and learn more about life in the Navy.
https://navy.defencejobs.gov.au/jobs/cryptologic-networks
The Australian Defence Force is an equal opportunity employer. This advertisement is to ensure women are aware of the rewarding and fulfilling careers available in the Navy, Army and Air Force. Females are encouraged to apply, however all roles are open for Australian men and women to apply.
Job Types: Full-time, Permanent
Salary: $85,000.00 – $89,999.00 per year
Work Remotely:
No
Indeed
26 days ago
Report job"
46,Business Analyst (Collection Products),Cubane Consulting,"$75,000 - $85,000 a year",North Sydney NSW,"The Opportunity
We have an exciting opportunity for a Business Analyst, Collection Products to join our team. Cubane is a specialist global consulting firm that delivers strategic analysis, benchmarking and insights to Executive teams in the Australian, New Zealand, UK and Canadian university sectors. Founded in Australia a decade ago, many top research and teaching universities are members of our unique UniForum benchmarking programme.
In this role, you will be reporting to the Manager, Collection Products, and will be researching, analysing and specifying new products and features to enhance our collection tools. You will also be responsible for providing IT support for employees in our Sydney office.
Our Offer to You
Be part of a growing international business that offers a diverse work environment and opportunities for professional development
Make an impact contributing to an essential, interesting and dynamic sector
Work alongside experienced senior employees who will support and mentor you
Develop core skills and experience to help you progress your career
Benefit from a culture that supports flexibility and work-life balance
The Role
This role is permanent full-time and is based in Cubane’s North Sydney office. You will be responsible for:
Business Analyst
Working with users and Cubane stakeholders to gather and develop user requirements for new features and improvements to the Collection Tools
Develop improvement ideas and specifications to improve user experience with the Collection Tools
Work with Manager, Collection Products and other stakeholders to determine and document end-to-end workflows for collection data across the Collection Tools and other Cubane systems
Assist in product roadmap and development planning
Assist in the development of content for Operations Improvement events where we discuss our development plans with our clients
Work closely with software developers and testers to communicate and explain requirements for feature and improvements development
Develop and maintain user documentation and training materials for collection tools
Ensure compliance with Cubane’s privacy and data protection obligations
IT Support
Level 1/2 support, including monitoring and backup, for Windows 10 and Linux clients as well as Office 365 administration
Build, deploy and maintain PCs, network and peripheral devices related to desktop infrastructure
Inventory and asset tagging
About You
You have:
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Strong communication and internal / external client engagement skills
Exceptional attention to detail and focus on data accuracy
Ability to solve complex problems with consideration to business impact
Ability to operate independently, proactively and effectively within local and multi-region teams
Confident to work autonomously as required
Takes responsibility for own actions and deliverables
Open to different/new ideas, with ability to seek assistance when needed and to accept and act on suggested improvements.
Well organised and detailed oriented, ability to work under pressure and to deadlines
A proactive approach to keeping abreast of technology trends in business-oriented IT and self-education in areas of technology where experience levels may not yet be sufficient
Qualifications and Experience
Tertiary qualifications with a strong track record of academic excellence and majors ideally in Computer Science, Engineering or related IT discipline
2-3 years experience in software development or IT system development
Exposure to Agile software development and project management
Solid background providing exceptional client service in Face-to-Face, Telephone or Electronic Interaction
Proficient in Windows 10, Mac OSX, Windows Server and Linux operating systems
Knowledge of IP networking technology
Demonstrated experience successfully problem-solving IT systems
Remuneration guide: $75,000 - $85,000 base salary + superannuation
Please note, only shortlisted candidates will be contacted.
Recruiters, please do not contact this job poster.
Application Deadline: 19/02/2021
Job Types: Full-time, Permanent
Salary: $75,000.00 – $85,000.00 per year
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
business analyst: 3 years (Required)
Work Eligibility:
Permitted to work permanently with no restriction on hours (e.g. citizen, permanent resident) (Required)
29 days ago
Report job"
0,Analyst,Macquarie Group Limited,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Join our Banking and Financial Services group as a Data Analyst and help us support the Banking Product Governance team with data quality for regulatory reporting, compliance and customer service purposes.
This fantastic opportunity involves working with the team and internal stakeholders to investigate, analyse and remediate data quality issues across all Banking and Financial Services banking products.
Reporting to the Data Steward – Banking Products, you will be undertaking data extraction, analysis and investigation into possible data quality issues, log issues for tracking purposes and updating statuses throughout the data issue lifecycle. You will also be undertaking impact analysis against reporting obligations, escalating problems to management and governance teams, and preparing data for remediation with product and operational teams. In addition to that, the role will see you validating assumptions used to derive and transform data, as well as performing ‘reasonability’ checks of financial and non-financial data as it pertains to regulatory reporting.
You will be tertiary degree qualified in Business, Finance, Economics, Mathematics or another related discipline and are proficient with data analysis applications, particularly Excel. You will also have excellent communication skills (both verbal and written), outstanding analytical and numerical reasoning and will have previous exposure to data analysis tools. Your attention to detail is second to none and your proactive approach allows you to work individually and collaboratively and meet deadlines.
If you have previous exposure to Banking and Financial Services and are looking for a new challenge in the growing environment, then this is an opportunity for you, please .
About Banking and Financial Services
Banking and Financial Services is Macquarie’s retail banking and financial services business, providing a diverse range of personal banking, wealth management, business banking and vehicle finance products and services to retail clients, advisers, brokers and business clients.
Our commitment to Diversity and Inclusion
Macquarie understands the importance of diversity and inclusion - our long history of success has come from being different. At Macquarie we value the innovation and creativity that diversity of thought brings. The one thing we all have in common is our focus on high performance. If you're capable, motivated and can deliver, we want you on our team.
We recognise that flexibility comes in a variety of forms. Talk to us about what flexibility you need.

About Macquarie
A career at Macquarie means you’ll have the opportunity to develop and utilise new skills, explore interesting fields and do challenging work that will impact the lives of people around the world—whether it’s accelerating the green energy transition, helping sustain global food supplies, financing social housing projects or investing in essential infrastructure. At Macquarie, we’re empowering people to innovate and invest for a better future.
Our size and international presence means your work can take you anywhere—across business groups, disciplines, sectors and borders. With 16,300+ employees and offices in 31 markets around the world, we’re a truly global organisation.
You’ll be supported by a diverse team where the unique perspectives, ideas and experiences that all of our people bring are valued. You’ll be empowered to address unmet needs in our communities whilst advising and investing alongside our clients and partners. Working with us, you’ll have the opportunity to make a difference.
Macquarie is a global financial group providing clients with asset management, retail and business banking, wealth management, leasing and asset financing, market access, commodity trading, renewables development, investment banking and principal investment.

Job no: BFS-955347
Work type: Full time
Location: Sydney
Category: Mid-level, Data & Analytics, Retail Banking
Group: Banking and Financial Services
Division: Product & Technology
Recruiter: Tatiana Stepanova
Opening Date: 19/11/2020
30+ days ago
Report job"
1,Data Analyst,QBE,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Actuarial Analyst
Location: Sydney preferred, but not essential
Type: Permanent, Full Time.
Your part in a changing world
At QBE, we’re driven by our purpose – to give people the confidence to achieve their ambitions .
We are an international insurer and reinsurer offering a diverse portfolio of commercial, personal and specialty products, as well as risk management solutions. Our product portfolio includes property, motor, crop, energy, marine and aviation. We employee a team of more than 11,800 people, in 27 countries around the world.
The opportunity
This is an exciting opportunity to be a part of the Actuarial Team at QBE. If you flourish in a team committed to transformation and exceptional outcomes then this is the opportunity for you. We are looking for a motivated and talented individual to join our growing Actuarial team within the pricing function.
Deep dive into general insurance products, providing advice on tactical price setting, price modelling, overall price changes and detailed pricing recommendations
Continuously drive improvements in our approach and our systems, taking a cross-product and wider functional view, covering aspects of pricing, modelling, monitoring, and reserving
Work closely with other analytical professionals in our Pricing, Data & Analytics, and wider finance teams
Key stakeholder engagement, developing trusted relationships with peers in product, underwriting, distribution, and claims
Work with business stakeholders to assist them in meeting their P&L targets through quality analytics and provision of information
Your story so far
A relevant degree in Mathematics, Science, Data Science, Business, Actuarial Studies, or Computer Science field
Some experience in General Insurance pricing is desired. Personal lines pricing experience is advantageous but not essential
Strong MS Excel skills, experience in SAS programming
Familiarity with R, Emblem and Radar will be advantageous
Ability to communicate your analysis and findings to a wide range of stakeholders within the business
Ability to work autonomously and solve problems
Strong attention to detail
We are here to support you
We are proud to have been Voted #5 in the 2019 Top 20 Australian Workplaces for New Dads - HBF Direct Advice for Dads and we achieved Gold employer status in the 2019 & 2020 Australian LGBTI Inclusion Awards. We are also a finalist in the 2020 Australian HR Awards, shortlisted for Best Workplace Diversity & Inclusion Program and Best Health & Wellbeing Program.
We also offer a range of benefits to help provide holistic support for your work life, whatever your circumstance.
As a QBE employee, we will offer you:
Flex@QBE leave to enhance your work/life integration
Our ‘At My Best’ wellbeing program, which includes a free 12-month subscription to Headspace
The ability to maximise retirement savings through voluntary super contributions and company matching
Income protection insurance and reimbursed Death and Total Permanent Disability insurance premiums
Access to REACH My Best - free holistic wellbeing coaching, nutritional, financial and legal advice and confidential counselling
Discounts on insurance products, car hire, hotels, goods and services
Benefits through our various sports and arts sponsorship partners such as free and discounted tickets.
Join us.
Click APPLY to submit your application. Successful applicants will need to complete work rights, police and credit checks through our online provider as a condition of employment.
QBE recognise the value of diverse perspectives and experience. We are committed to an inclusive workplace where everyone feels valued and respected for who they are. If we can provide support with access requirements, alternative work arrangements or you would like to connect with one of our networks please contact us at recruitment@qbe.com .
Number of Openings:
1
How to Apply:
To submit your application, click ""Apply"" and follow the step by step process.
Equal Employment Opportunity:
QBE is an equal opportunity employer and is required to comply with equal employment opportunity legislation in each jurisdiction it operates.
7 days ago
Report job"
2,Actuarial Analyst,Morgan McKinley,$450 - $600 a day,Sydney Central Business District NSW,"Apply now!
A leading financial services organisation is currently looking for a Data Analyst to join the customer contact team on an initial 6-month contract. Your role in the business will be to utilise tools such as Excel, SQL and VBA to deliver a range of ongoing business critical operational reports and insights, a real hands-on Data role with an opportunity to change the way the organisation interacts with its customers.
The business provides a high performing and dynamic environment alongside growing a great culture within the team.
THE IDEAL CANDIDATE:
Have strong skills with Excel, but can also create SQL queries, manipulate data
Must have a proven track record building presentations
Prior experience working with customer contact data
Experience creating engaging dashboards and data visualizations (Power BI)
The company is data driven and yet at the same time a fun environment with games and lots of social events. If this sounds like the right move for you apply now!
jpope@morganmckinley.com
Excel / Power BI / SQL / Business Intelligence / BI / Data Analyst / Customer Experience
Work with a market leader in the Financial Services sector, apply to find out more about this exclusive opportunity.
19 days ago
Report job"
3,Data Analyst - Excel / SQL,The University of Queensland,"$80,784 - $86,768 a year",St Lucia QLD,"The role is responsible for enhancing data integrity within the Advancement CRM (Raiser’s Edge), in advance of the transition to a new CRM in 2022. The role has a strong focus on data configuration, and will be responsible for significantly enhancing the import of data sets to deliver enrichment of data.
This position is located at our picturesque St Lucia campus, renowned as one of Australia’s most attractive university campuses, and located just 7km from Brisbane’s city centre. Bounded by the Brisbane River on three sides, and with outstanding public transport connections, our 114-hectare site provides a perfect work environment – you can enjoy the best of both worlds: a vibrant campus with the tradition of an established university.
Our Ideal Candidate
Our ideal candidate will have experience and well-developed skills undertaking data analysis and optimising data integrity, ideally within an Advancement context, and will hold relevant qualifications.
You must have ongoing unrestricted work rights in Australia to apply for this opportunity.
We value diversity and inclusion, and actively encourage applications from those who bring diversity to the University. Our Diversity and Inclusion webpage contains further information if you require additional support. Accessibility requirements and/or adjustments can be directed to recruitment@uq.edu.au.
What We Can Offer
This is a full-time fixed term position at HEW level 6.
The full-time equivalent base salary will be in the range $80,784 to $86,768 per annum plus super of up to 17%.
You will be able to take advantage of UQ Sport Facilities, recreation leave loading (of 17.5%), salary sacrificing options, on-campus childcare, discounted private health insurance, cheap parking, development programs and many other benefits.
For further information, please review The University of Queensland's Enterprise Bargaining Agreement 2018-2021.

Questions?
To discuss this role please contact Kevin Owen, Manager, Business Solutions and Services at kevin.owen@uq.edu.au.
For application queries, please contact recruitment@uq.edu.au stating the job number in the subject line.
13 days ago
Report job"
4,Data Integrity Analyst,Madec,Not shown,Mildura VIC,"Department: Harvest and Labour Hire Services
ORGANISATIONAL INFORMATION
MADEC is a successful not for profit and charitable organisation, with a proud 50 year history of providing relief to people
experiencing poverty or distress. Through our four core business units;

Employment Services
Education and Training
Labour Hire
Harvest
We recognise the importance of self-worth and self-fulfilment and we recognise that those who are, or may be,
disadvantaged, need and deserve our help.
Working in accordance with the guidelines set down by the Government, our business operation is focused on gaining
successful employment outcomes for our clients. This is achieved by working with our clients to ensure we understand
their barriers to employment, upskilling and providing training solutions, sourcing work opportunities via labour hire,
harvest or by partnering with business and industry stakeholders to secure sustainable work options for our clients
Labour Hire and Seasonal Worker Programme
MADEC offers a comprehensive labour hire service across many industries including wineries, viticulture, labouring,
mining, retail, processing, hospitality, horticulture, construction, local government, and tourism.
MADEC continues to be a large approved employer under the Seasonal Worker Programme (SWP), an initiative of the
Australian Government, since its pilot programme in 2008. The SWP aims to provide relief to people experiencing
poverty and disadvantage from Pacific Island countries and Timor-Leste by providing employment opportunities with
Australian employers in selected industries/sectors.
The SWP also has the dual benefit of providing employers with a reliable return workforce sourced to assist in meeting
unmet labour demands, when there is not enough local Australian labour to meet seasonal demand.
PRIMARY PURPOSE OF ROLE

To work with high volumes of payroll data to create practical and accurate information, promoting efficiency and
compliance within the payroll team. This role is responsible for regular and ad hoc reporting as required in the labour
hire and seasonal worker payroll departments.

Direct Reports to this Role Total Number of Reports

Nil

Nil
Key Relationships
Internal

Finance Manager
Team Leader – Payroll
Payroll Officers
Harvest and Labour Hire staff

External

Host employers
Government departments for payroll related tasks (Centrelink, Australian Tax Office, superannuation
funds, child support agencies, etc.)

KEY RESPONSIBILITIES / DUTIES
Payroll reporting and data analysis
In consultation with management, design payroll and data reports and tools which are compliant to payroll requirements
and assist in process efficiency within the payroll team and business.
Participate in developing new procedures to streamline processes and develop new and innovative ways of working
Generate regular reporting (weekly, monthly, annual) in the required timeframes and provide ad-hoc reports in a timely
manner.
Validate data from internal and external sources for accuracy and completeness
Review and manipulate data into more efficient formats to improve time and accuracy
Preparation and compliance in all Superannuation Guarantee payments and requirements
Preparation and compliance in all State portable long service leave payments and requirements
Reconciliation of Single Touch payroll
Routine monitoring of systems to ensure information and report any anomalies, concerns or findings to management
Participate in the development of new practices and procedures to streamline processes and develop new and innovative
ways of working.
Systems and information
Assist and educate the payroll team with the day-to-day use of reporting tools and systems to promote efficiency
Remain current on new legislation, awards and regulatory rulings impacting payroll. Enforce adherence to requirements
and advise management on the required actions.
Recommend improvements to existing software programs as necessary.
Assist with internal and audits, including the ongoing review of systems, preparation of materials and liaison with auditors
Payroll processing
Ensure timely and accurate support during payroll processing to the team and other staff as required, including entry and
maintenance of employee, host and job information, data entry, and other duties required to complete the regular
processing of payroll.
Liaise with host employers, employees and other stakeholders in relation to answering queries, follow up and any other
matters related to the processing of payroll

Qualifications and Experience:
Essential Desirable
Qualifications Drivers licence
Qualifications in business or administration, or
work experience in roles with high volume data
or payroll roles; or combination of both.
Experience: Working with large volumes of data and
information; interpreting and analysing data;
and building or maintaining data systems
Using Excel to a high level including exports,
creating complex formulas, pivot tables, etc.
High level administrative roles
Experience in payroll or human resources
Experience in highly regulated industry
Experience using Microsoft Access
Skills: High level knowledge of Microsoft Excel and data related systems, and the ability to adapt to new
IT systems.
Understanding of payroll and human resources functions and requirements
Excellent analytical and numeracy skills and attention to detail
Ability to interpret data information and identify opportunity to streamline processes
Ability to identify the right data sources and how to interpret the results.
Strong organisational and time management skills, with an ability to prioritise tasks, meet
prescribed deadlines, and concurrently manage a number of competing tasks.
Flexibility and willingness to accept a change in priorities
High level of confidentiality and discretion.
Competencies All employees must:
Adaptable
Maintain focus and productivity in changing environments, responsibilities and people.
Remain positive in the face of change, take steps to recognise need for change and understand and
support changes as we strive for business excellence.
Accountability
Accept responsibility for own actions and decisions and demonstrates commitment to accomplish
work in an ethical, efficient and cost-effective manner.
Communication
Communicate effectively and transparently.
Engage and inspire other through clear oral and written communication.
Customer focus
Ensure our internal and external customers/clients are at the forefront of our minds in all that we do.
Act in the best interest of our customers/clients by working with them to understand their needs and
to build mutual respect that leads to mutually beneficial outcomes.
Integrity
Be authentic.
Maintain personal credibility and uphold ethical standards.
Fosters respect for all individuals and points of view.
Interacts appropriately with all members of the workforce, clients and business and community
partners without regard to individual characteristics.
Team Work
Work cooperatively and effectively with others to achieve department and organisational goals.
Participate in building group identity characterised by trust, pride and commitment.
Build strong intra and inter department relationships and partnerships to ensure business success.

At MADEC We Value

Authenticity
We remain true to our core purpose. We are honest, trustworthy and transparent.
Courageousness
We act ethically and stand up for what is right, just and fair.
Passion
We believe in what we do and will not waver in our commitment to achieving expected outcomes.
Inclusiveness
Everyone matters, we are “all” community.
Excellence
We are committed to continuous improvement in all we do.


Role Description reviewed by:


Employee
Name:



Title:

Date: / /


Employee acknowledgement of Position Description:


Employee
Name:



Signature:

Date: / /


Please provide copy of Position Description to employee.
Employee to sign and return to Human Resources


Accountability
We do what we say we will do and are responsible for our actions.
21 days ago
Report job"
5,Data Analyst,IOOF Holdings,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Date: 10-Feb-2021
Location: Sydney, AU, 2000
Employment Type: Fixed Term Full Time
Fixed Term Contract up to end of September 2021
Be part of a team and culture that values people
Join IOOF in our transformation journey
IOOF is one of Australia’s leading Wealth Management organisations, undertaking a rapid and exciting transformation. We are a strong and resilient business and despite the current difficult Covid related climate, are investing in supporting our people to onboard and connect them remotely to ensure their safety and wellbeing are paramount. It is in this context that we are looking for an experienced Research Analyst.
The Role
Reporting to the Senior Manager, Research you will primarily be responsible for making recommendations on matters relating to advisers transferring from MLC as part of IOOF’s acquisition.

Key Responsibilities:
Perform APL detailed comparisons to document differences and work through risk accepting
Working with historical data to identify and record non APL Approvals
Review a number of model portfolio and MDAs for asset allocation
Ensure adviser queries received are responded to within an appropriate timeframe
Assist with the administration of the manager research process

To Be Successful in This Role You Will Possess:
RG146 qualification and a degree in related field
Extensive experience in a similar role and within the wealth management or financial services industry
Self-starter with high attention to detail to consistently produce high quality work
Strong organisational skills, critical thinking and proven experience in driving strategic initiatives
Ability to work under pressure, prioritise and multitask
Advanced level in Microsoft Office products

Benefits
In return, we offer development opportunities at an ASX top 200 company
A professional, supportive and friendly culture
A range of corporate and lifestyle benefits

How to Apply

Applicants will be required to provide evidence of their eligibility to work in Australia, and at a minimum be required to undertake police and basic credit checks as a condition of employment.

Please note that applications from agencies will not be considered at this time.

IOOF is an inclusive and equal opportunity employer. We encourage applications regardless of race, ethnicity, age, religion, gender, national origin, disability status, or any other characteristic protected by law. If you need assistance or an adjustment during the application process because of a disability, it is available upon request.
5 days ago
Report job"
6,Research Analyst,"Department of Jobs, Precincts and Regions","$101,120 - $122,348 a year",Melbourne City Centre VIC,"$101,120 – $122,348 (Plus Superannuation)
Fixed term / 3 years
Usual hours of work: Full Time (flexibility may be available)
Usual work location: 1 Spring Street, Melbourne (flexibility may be available)
The position of Business Analyst forms a part of the Delivery Centre branch within Corporate Services Group. The Delivery Centre has been established to improve performance in delivering the department's projects on time, on budget. This is to be achieved through a variety of strategies including identifying best-practice approaches to project and program delivery within the department, developing associated guidance and tools to support a consistent approach across the department, and establishing robust monitoring and reporting capabilities on departmental performance in project and program delivery.
The Business Analyst reports to the Program Outcomes and Analytics Manager. The Business Analyst will leverage department-wide project and program data to build data manipulation tools and dashboards for Department of Jobs Precincts and Regions stakeholders and decision makers including but not limited to departmental executives, deputy secretaries and the Secretary.
The Business Analyst will assist in the design and production of regular standardised and on-demand reports that provide information on public value delivered by the Department. A key challenge for the role will be streamlining the data collection and management task across the department as well as finding opportunities to automate as much of the data collection and reporting functions as possible.
Reporting to the Program Outcomes and Analytics Manager, the key accountabilities of the role will include:

Build and design requested systems, products, and frameworks
Contribute to the development of program outcome reporting and analytic products, including data visualisation tools to provide the Executive Board, Deputy Secretaries, and other senior leaders with improved intelligence on DJPR project status, outcomes, and their relationship with demographic, socio-economic, and other factors
Engage with key internal and external stakeholders to develop user requirements for reporting and analytics products, and to guide product iteration
Leverage Departmental and other available data to contribute to the development of evidence-based recommendations and decisions
For a confidential discussion, please contact Mark Wiggins, Executive Director - Delivery Centre on 0418 608 805 or mark.wiggins@ecodev.vic.gov.au
Successful candidates will be required to undergo a National Police Records Check prior to commencing employment with the Department.
For further information on the position, please refer to the attached position description.
How to Apply
Please click the ‘Apply Now' button. As part of the application process, you will need to provide a copy of your resume and a cover letter addressing the key selection criteria outlined in the position description.
Applications close at midnight on 28 February 2021
4 days ago
Report job"
7,Business Analyst (multiple positions),T+O+M Executive,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"In this particular role you will be working in a project where a changing regulatory environment has driven the need for a more robust management of client data, which will in turn drive the commercial success of the business.
You will be working in a dedicated Analytics team developing new data sets through the complex extraction and manipulation (SQL) of the relevant data from the group systems (Teradata) and it's analysis using SAS.
You will work directly with the business and product teams to define the client base with the customers experience and satisfaction being at the centre of all decision making.
To be considered for this role you will need:
Advanced knowledge of SAS and SQL (data extraction and manipulation)
Experience with relational database such as Teradata and SQL Server
A critical thinker with an eye for detail
Ability to work to tight deadlines and short turnaround times
Experience within banking products highly desirable
Ability to elicit requirements from a various stakeholders and to distinguish between requests and underlying needs
Ability to work with large and complex data from a variety of sources across numerous database platforms.
If you're interested in being considered for this newly establish and growing team, please send your resume to nicolina.bosnic@tomexecutive.com for consideration.

PLEASE NOTE ONLY SUCCESSFUL CANDIDATES WILL BE CONTACTED.
1 day ago
Report job"
8,Data Analyst - Remediation,AimBig Employment,Not shown,Sydney Central Business District NSW,"About AimBig
At AimBig Employment, people are at the centre of our business. We are an innovative, dynamic employment service provider with a national footprint with 96 locations. We have a proven track record of working with people with disabilities to deliver meaningful employment opportunities. We are the highest rated National DES provider in Australia, now for 6 months running, with 51% of our sites receiving a 5-star rating.
About the Role – In essence we are looking for a switched on Commercial Analyst that is responsible for undertaking market analysis and has the ability to clearly and concisely present data, conclusions, and recommendations to Senior Leadership to drive business improvement.


What we are ideally looking for:
Relevant tertiary degree qualified
2-3 years working in a similar role.
Strong technical and business intelligence tools skills
Comprehensive knowledge of relevant legislation and project management
Experience developing reporting and dashboards in Microsoft Power BI
Market/Industry Analysis
Engage with the business to develop a deep understanding of business context and priorities
Prepare, develop and analyse a market and industry reports
Drive insight-led decision making across industry trends
Contribute towards the annual budget setting process
Prepare relevant presentation reports for key stakeholders
Data & Reporting
Efficient and effective delivery of insightful market data
Retrieve data from relevant sources to provide insightful data
Communicate data in a way that meets audience needs
Provide industry trends and forecasts based on market data analysis
In other words, someone really smart with the confidence to present to our Leadership.

About You
Excellent and confident verbal and written business communication skills
Solid technical knowledge
Great analytical skills and attention to detail
Exceptional decision making and problem solving skills
Excellent customer service skills
Good time management and organisational skills,
Understanding of the commercial framework of business
If you think this is you, we would love to hear from you. Submit your resume

AimBig Employment is committed to the principles of Equal Employment Opportunity.
6 days ago
Report job"
9,Commercial Analyst,L3Harris Technologies,Not shown,Australia,"Description:
Job Title: Logistics Support Analyst
Job Location: Australia - Queensland - Brisbane
Job Code: CS20202010-52033
The L3Harris Logistic Support Analyst is responsible and accountable for providing logistics support analysis across the L3Harris In-Service support contracts associated with both L3Harris Commercial and Defence products. The Logistic Support Analyst along with the Logistics Support Managers (Supply & Technical) form the logistic and technical support team within In-Service Support (ISS). The Logistic Support Analyst will conduct support analysis and assist with the creation of optimised logistics solutions for all sustainment contracts, ensuring logistics operations meet the business needs and are delivered in accordance with agreed contractual requirements.
Scope: The Logistic Support Analyst develops and manages technical and supply focused databases to support the development of technical support solutions to meet customer requirements for both L3Harris Commercial and Defence products. The Logistic Support Analyst provides the Logistic Support Managers with the data and database management to ensure that the delivery of logistics and technical support services meet the requirements of both L3Harris and the customer. The Logistic Support Analyst will report to the L3Harris ISS Logistics Services Manager.
Key Accountabilities:
Conduct data collection and collation for obsolescence management and assist the Logistic Support Managers to perform analysis and provide recommendations on obsolescence options to management and customers.
Analyse inventory and supply systems including assisting in developing inventory optimisation models.
Analyse life cycle costs including assisting in developing life cycle cost models.
Conduct data collection and collation to assist the Logistic Support Managers in Codification Data assembly and submission for MILIS codification and cataloguing.
Conduct data collection and collation to assist the Logistic Support Managers with maintenance and engineering supportability analysis including maintenance requirements, maintenance investigations and technical substitutions.
Develop and manage databases for the management of customer initiated corrective action requests including RODUMs, defects and warranty claims.
Develop and be responsible for policy/process and procedures for effective technical and engineering support analysis outcomes.
Work with the L3Harris Logistic Support Managers as well as customer Logistic and Fleet Managers to achieve optimal logistics, technical and engineering support solutions/outcomes.
Support the program and project management community with input and advice on technical and engineering support analysis solutions.
Work with Logistic Support Managers to ensure that logistics, technical and engineering support sustainment solutions meet customer expectations.
Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree and minimum of 6 years of prior relevant experience
Graduate Degree and a minimum of 4 years of prior related experience
Preferred Qualifications:
This role would suit an experienced logistics analyst with considerable experience in defence sustainment contracts and logistics and/or engineering support analysis. The successful candidate must be a team player, proactive and forward thinking and be looking to deliver a superior solution consistently. Knowledge of Defence ILS operations is critical.
Willing to travel domestically, engage with key stakeholders, and provide responsive and timely solutions combined with a strong technical data management background is required.
Current Australian Baseline Security clearance
Understanding of Defence ILS and engineering operations
Excellent database management skills
Excellent communication and Written skills.Previous experience using an ERP system
Experience within Defence industry
Experience using MILIS
L3Harris
7 days ago
Report job"
10,Logistics Support Analyst,NAB - National Australia Bank,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Work type: Permanent Full time
Location: Aust - VIC Metro
Come and make this role your own
Progressive & agile culture
We embrace diversity & inclusion at our core
Your new role awaits
The People Reporting & Insights team supports the People division and broader organisation with analytics that enable fact based decision making about our most valuable asset, our people.
This is an exciting and challenging role in the emerging field of people analytics, and provides an excellent opportunity to develop skills in advanced analytics and consulting in a collaborative and supportive team environment.
In this role, you'll contribute to a variety of projects that provide insight into people factors that drive business outcomes and employee experience. Ultimately this aims to ensure facts and evidence are used to supplement experience and intuition to drive more informed people decisions.
You’ll have the opportunity to support a variety of deliverables and initiatives, including;
Active role in design of people research projects
Sourcing and transforming data for analytics
Using statistics and the scientific method to deliver evidence based, data driven workforce insights
Communicating insights in simple and engaging ways
Monitoring external trends and identifying opportunities to enhance people analytics at NAB
Assisting in conducting primary research (design and data collection)
Responding to ad-hoc queries about people data and analytics
Maintaining and updating ongoing analytical products (dashboards etc.) as required
Maintaining collaborative resources (e.g. SharePoint/Confluence) and supporting the team for forums/events.
Taking accountability for ensuring data integrity and accuracy
To be successful in this role you will have:
A relevant tertiary qualification
Comfortable solving problems in a corporate environment
The ability to communicate complex analytics and insights
Knowledge of statistics and statistical methods (R Studio, Python)
Familiarity with tools for collecting and presenting strategic insights
High integrity, respecting highest standards of data privacy and data protection when dealing with sensitive, confidential, and personal information
We'll be looking for you to demonstrate an appetite to learn and solve problems in front of you. Working with ambiguity, collaborating with the rest of team and making sense of complex 'asks' will set you up for success in this role.
Join us!
As part of the wider people team, your presence will be felt in all areas of the bank and help to create value through our people, communication and culture. Your role will contribute to shaping a workplace and culture which inspires people to be the best they can be.
We're NAB
We believe success comes from our people. We're committed to supporting your talent and skills through your career, as you help us build a culture that affects change for our customers - and for the community too.
We are an equal opportunity employer and have a diverse and inclusive workforce supported by our African Australian and Indigenous employment programs, Graduate and Trainee programs. We are proud of our LGBTI Gold employer status by AWEI, and our commitment to gender equality. We have committed $70bn in financing to help address climate change and provide 2 days of paid leave each year through our employee volunteering program to support community organisations.
The benefits
From education and volunteer leave to learning benefits and banking discounts, we offer access to a wide range of employee benefits. For more information please visit here.
If you think this role is the right fit for you, we encourage you to apply.
To be eligible to apply, you must have Australian or New Zealand citizenship or permanent residency status.
Please note: Candidate screening and interviews may be conducted prior to the closing date of the advert.
Please note unsolicited CVs from agencies will not be accepted.
NAB
4 days ago
Report job"
11,"Analyst, People Insights & Research",Macquarie Group Limited,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Utilise your experience in Enterprise Data Management in the Financial Services sector in this newly created role within Macquarie's Financial Management Group. In this key business focused role, you will be required to work with the business cross functionally to build strong relationships and influence your key stakeholders.
In this role you will work closely with senior members of Finance and the business teams to drive data provisioning & enhancing data quality in a high-profile, change-oriented team.
You will be a self-starter, curious and driven, with the ability to self-manage workload and deadlines whilst maintaining a degree of accuracy and quality.
Your strong analytical, problem solving skills, coupled with your experience within Finance and/or product knowledge of financial instruments, will ensure you are successful in this role.
An understanding of Enterprise Data Management and data quality concepts would be desirable for this role.
Detailed Role & Responsibilities:
As a Data business analyst in data governance team for various mandatory and regulatory projects your key focus would be:
Ensure data risks are managed by supporting the team to:
evaluate aggregate data risks within the Group.
ensuring controls are implemented and tested for effectiveness
support monitoring of controls effectiveness
maintain strong working relationships with the risk management teams (FORM, Assurance)
Ensure management understanding of data quality issues and impacts:
engage with the Operations & Data Quality team to confirm issue status
perform thematic analysis of data incidents and issues
engage with stakeholders (Data Owners) to validate observations and agree call outs
ensure material issues are escalated / have visibility to data governance forums
Ensure risk / control gaps and or data quality issues are addressed by supporting the team to:
establish remediation plans for gaps and thematic/material data issues
ensure solutions are aligned to data frameworks and strategies
monitor actions to ensure delivery within agreed timelines
deliver status updates to the Data management team and Stakeholders (Data Owners)
You will bring to this role:
To be successful in this role, you will have 3-4 years of relevant experience in Data and Information Management roles as Data Business Analyst in the Financial Services industry. Regulatory projects experience within the financial services industry is preferred.
Working at the interface of business and technology teams, you will also possess:
an understanding of Enterprise Data Management and data quality concepts would be desirable
business Intelligence tool experience an advantage, for example Informatica, Alteryx and PowerBI
be analytical and have demonstrated experience in effective problem solving
experience working in a team-oriented, collaborative environment
finance and/or product knowledge of financial instruments is preferred
About the Financial Management Group
The Financial Management Group provides financial, tax and treasury services to all areas of Macquarie. The group is focused on providing strategic analysis and advice to Macquarie's businesses and senior management, managing Macquarie's funding, liquidity and capital position, ensuring Macquarie continues to meet regulatory and compliance obligations and managing Macquarie's corporate affairs.
Our commitment to Diversity and Inclusion
The diversity of our people is one of our greatest strengths, and in combination with our inclusive environment, it enables us to deliver innovative and sustainable outcomes for our people, clients, shareholders and communities. From day one, you'll be encouraged to be yourself and supported to perform at your best. If our purpose of ‘empowering people to innovate and invest for a better future’ is as inspiring to you as it is to us, please apply. With the right technology, support and resources, our people can work in a range of flexible ways.
We are committed to providing a working environment that embraces and values diversity and inclusion. We encourage candidates to speak with a member of our recruitment team if you require adjustments to our recruitment process to support you, and the type of working arrangements that would help you thrive.

About Macquarie
A career at Macquarie means you’ll have the opportunity to develop and utilise new skills, explore interesting fields and do challenging work that will impact the lives of people around the world—whether it’s accelerating the green energy transition, helping sustain global food supplies, financing social housing projects or investing in essential infrastructure. At Macquarie, we’re empowering people to innovate and invest for a better future.
Our size and international presence means your work can take you anywhere—across business groups, disciplines, sectors and borders. With 16,300+ employees and offices in 31 markets around the world, we’re a truly global organisation.
You’ll be supported by a diverse team where the unique perspectives, ideas and experiences that all of our people bring are valued. You’ll be empowered to address unmet needs in our communities whilst advising and investing alongside our clients and partners. Working with us, you’ll have the opportunity to make a difference.
Macquarie is a global financial group providing clients with asset management, retail and business banking, wealth management, leasing and asset financing, market access, commodity trading, renewables development, investment banking and principal investment.

Job no: FMG-956103
Work type: Full time
Location: Sydney
Category: Mid-level, Accounting & Finance, Data & Analytics, Projects, Improvements & Change
Group: Financial Management Group
Division: FMG Central
Recruiter: Maddy Wilson
Opening Date: 14/2/2021
1 day ago
Report job"
12,Data Business Analyst - Enterprise Data Management,ANZ Banking Group,Not shown,Australia,"Requisition Title -
Senior Data Analyst
Job Number: - AUS125402
Description

Job Title: Senior Data Analyst
Location: Suburb, City

Help shape the future of how we use machine learning and automation
Collaborate with talented teams of data scientists, engineers and analysts
Join a progressive organisation with the people and policies you want
At ANZ our purpose is to shape a world where people and communities thrive and to achieve this, we need a talented Data Analyst to join our Australian Business Transformation Integration team. Our data analysts deeply understand the power of data to generate quality customer insights, manage information and identify trends to accelerate sound business decisions.
Your mission is to derive compelling insights and identify opportunities to shape the direction of our customer and colleague experience during integration. You will be working within a cross functional team and driving end to end delivery of insights. The role doesn’t stop at producing insights – we take action and convert insights into outcomes, and we’re looking for a passionate analyst to join our team.
The purpose of the role is to deeply understand client needs and the business environment to design solutions to key integration challenges. Analysts will partner with stakeholders from across AR&C and ANZx using data to translate business problems into solutions.
What a typical day might look like
Support the development and design of product decommissioning plans, including quantification of financial and people impacts
Working with finance to validate key financial assumptions
Develop strategies for client migration, including activating dormant clients and managing clients with off sale products
Perform deep-dives on specific business problems/opportunities and prepare PIRs
Leverage tools for optimal collaboration (across geographies) and knowledge sharing
Identify opportunities for continuous improvement and implement solutions to perform more effective and efficient analysis
What will likely be in your toolkit?
Strong verbal and written communication skills to communicate ideas to senior stakeholders
Data visualisation skills and experience using tools and languages such as SQL, Python, VBA, Excel (Advanced)
Excellent quantitative and qualitative analytical skills, and the ability to provide action-oriented recommendations
Extensive experience integrating and aggregating data from disparate sources to uncover insights
A desire to continuously learn new techniques / technologies and bring innovative ideas into the Squad
Subject matter expertise in banking products, distribution or digital technology

You’re not expected to have 100% of these skills. At ANZ a growth mindset is at the heart of our culture and we actively encourage people to try new things. So if this role interests you and you feel you have most of these things in your toolbox, we’d love to hear from you.

About ANZ
We’re reinventing the way we do banking, and our community of collaborative, innovative thinkers who create human centred solutions are helping us get there. We’re responding faster to changing customer requirements, focusing on the things that matter and helping people achieve incredible things – be it buying their home, building a business or saving for things big or small.
We support our people by providing a range of flexible working options so they can work in the way that best suits them. We encourage you to talk to us about your need for flexibility and any adjustments you may require to our recruitment process or the role itself.
We’ll also offer you the opportunity to develop your career, working in a diverse and inclusive workplace where the different backgrounds, perspectives and life experiences of our people are celebrated and create a great place to grow, thrive and belong.
Interested in joining us? Click Apply now, or visit www.anz.com/careers to find out more or view other opportunities.
Reference number AUS125402
#GD4.1
7 days ago
Report job"
13,Senior Data Analyst,University of Melbourne,"$93,935 - $101,684 a year",Parkville VIC,"Job no: 0051799
Work type: Continuing
Location: Parkville
Division/Faculty: Chief Operating Officer Portfolio
Department/School: Operational Performance Group
Salary: $93,935 - $101,684 (UOM 7)
Role & Superannuation rate: Professional - Full time - 17% super
In 2021 The University of Melbourne has embarked on the Professional Services Redesign (PSR) to enable services improvement and more effective ways of working. This opportunity has been newly created as part of the PSR.
About Operational Performance Group
The Operational Performance Group delivers functions that facilitate the design, evaluation, and improvement of services across the University, and business partnering services to Chancellery.
About the role
As the Reporting Analyst, you will be in the Corporate and Student Reporting team within University Decision Support (UDS) and be a key conduit to its customer base. You will facilitate the success of data consumers and users from within the University Faculty environment by connecting them with the UDS Steam’s services and allowing them to understand and exploit the capabilities of the data asset. You will further promote good Data Governance Practices across the Data Governance Network.
About you
You strive to display service excellence and deliver outcomes that surpass expectations. You are a collaborative individual and enjoy connecting with people and developing strong working relationships.
You will further have:
A bachelor’s degree in Information Technology, Business or an equivalent combination of relevant experience and education/training.
Experience in gathering and documenting user requirements and knowledge of good data governance practices
Experience in the use of data warehouse and business intelligence tools
High levels of interest in understanding customer’s roles and exploring opportunities to assist in their role success
Benefits
Maximise your benefits through our Salary Packaging scheme
Flexible family friendly policies, providing generous leave and working conditions
The opportunity to work in a culturally rich environment
A substantial discount to eligible staff and their immediate families in undertaking further studies at the University of Melbourne
To find out more, go to http://about.unimelb.edu.au/careers/staff-benefits
Culture
The University is a vibrant campus. We have well-established clubs and networks giving the opportunity to engage and collaborate with other staff around the University. We strive to create an environment where staff and students promote culturally inclusive behaviour and activities, ensure cultural differences are heard and explored, and actively seek to learn from other cultures.
How to apply
Your application submitted should include a cover letter (one page) outlining your motivation to apply for this role and describing what skills and experience you will bring to it. Please further attach a current version of your CV.
Please note that you are not expected to provide detailed responses against the selection criteria in the .
Staff in the redeployment pool will be considered for this role in the first instance where appropriate.

Advertised: 17 Feb 2021 12:05 AM AUS Eastern Daylight Time
Applications close: 03 Mar 2021 11:55 PM AUS Eastern Daylight Time
Today
Report job"
14,REPORTING ANALYST,MLC Life Insurance,Not shown,Docklands VIC,"MLC Life Insurance. We have been protecting Australians for over 130 years. We respect the role we play in providing peace of mind for our customers, and we never lose sight of it.
Our Purpose
MLC Life Insurance is one of Australia’s leading life insurance specialists and a member of the Nippon Life Insurance Group, one of the world’s leading insurers. We are guided by our simple purpose: ‘A Promise for Life’. We provide almost 1.2 million Australians with reassurance that they and their loved ones will be supported when they need it most. It’s a promise that provides peace of mind and helps them sleep at night.
Our purpose is supported by Our Values of Do What’s Right, Deliver Together, Make it Simple, Own it and Aim High. It’s how we work together and behave every day in every interaction with our customers, partners and each other that defines who we are.
Our Strategy
Our strategy puts our customers at the centre of our ambition to be Australia’s leading and most trusted life insurer. It is through the commitment, energy and talent of everyone at MLC Life Insurance, working together, that we make a positive contribution to the lives of our customers. To support all of us to be at their best every day, we offer a flexible work environment centred on development, wellbeing, recognition and contribution.
With more than 1500 people nationally, we believe our success is built on the unique contribution of our people. Diversity and Inclusion is core to what we believe in and who we are. We aspire for everyone at MLC Life Insurance to feel valued and respected for who they are.
The Role
Reporting to the Senior Manager Enterprise Architecture, the Performance Analyst is responsible for collating information and preparing reports to support decision making to drive the Technology practice’s performance and conformance.
To succeed in doing so, you will be responsible for analysing a diverse set of data and key performance metrics from our functional areas including infrastructure and operations, DevOps and portfolio management, to produce insightful and meaningful reports for the leadership and executive team.
About You
Coming from a technology background, you are an experienced Data Analyst with strong technical skills in SQL and SSIS with experience in data visualisation tools such as Power BI.
Your strong commercial acumen enables you to identify key performance metrics that contribute to the success of an efficient and sustainable Technology business.
Your ability to build and maintain strong relationships will also enable you to work with various technology teams to improve and refine the way we collect, report, and communicate performance data.
Why Choose Us?
At MLC Life Insurance, you will have the opportunity to:
work with a WGEA cited Employer of Choice for Gender Equality
enjoy flexible work options and an inclusive environment where everyone is respected and valued for who they are and their unique contribution
embrace a culture of customer centricity and an ambition to be Australia’s leading, most trusted Life Insurer
access CircleIn Parental Support - an online support resource for our working parents
access a range of benefits including competitive salary, lifestyle leave, two days volunteer leave every year, recognition of service milestones; and
wellness and lifestyle offerings including access to Uprise – our Digital Wellbeing Program, as well as discounts on a variety of lifestyle and entertainment products and services.

Should an applicant be the preferred candidate, background checks (including Federal Police Checks, Employment checks, ASIC banned and disqualified persons and Bankruptcy checks) will be completed prior to the candidate's employment being confirmed. The outcomes of the background checks do not automatically bar candidates, however they will be assessed against the inherent requirements of the position.

Primary Location: AU-VIC-Docklands
Work Locations: Level 15, 727 Collins St Level 15 727 Collins St Docklands 3008
Job: Information Technology
Organization: MLC Limited
Schedule: Permanent
Employee Status: Group Level 3
Full-time
:
Job Posting: 11-Feb-2021, 9:20:04 PM
4 days ago
Report job"
15,Performance Analyst,Commonwealth Bank,Not shown,Sydney Central Business District NSW,"Senior/Technical/Business Analyst Roles - Cyber Delivery
Senior Business Analyst
Senior Technical Business Analyst (12 month contract)
Technical Business Analyst
Business Analyst
Your team
These roles sits within our Chief Data Office (CDO). This division is comprised of engineers, business analysts, scrum masters, product and delivery specialists, project managers, service managers and a wide variety of data analysts.
The CDO is in place to realise a data-driven organisation for Commonwealth Bank Group. The Program Delivery team within this division, is responsible for delivering outcomes via projects/programs that ensures the Bank’s obligations for Privacy Enforceable Undertaking are met, whilst also delivering outcomes for the broader CBA group.
You will work within the User Access Role Definition (UARD) team and report into the Principal Business Analyst.
Your role
As a Business Analyst you will liaise with critical stakeholders, conduct complex requirements gathering sessions and offer consistent, high impact reviews within the project. You will play a critical role in monitoring project progress day to day and building relationships with your colleagues will be key to your success.
This role will suit someone with previous experience in Identity Access Management (IAM) or Privacy & Cyber, working as part of a team on a large, complex, fast paced program.
Your experience
5 + years business analysis experience
Experience working on IAM, technology enabled change projects
Understanding of BABOK Knowledge Areas
Excellent analytical and problem solving ability with keen attention to detail
Proven ability to lead initiatives
Strong stakeholder management skills
Your business
At Commbank we strive to deliver the best possible service to our customers, prioritise our customer’s financial wellbeing and pride ourselves on being innovative in a rapidly changing industry.
Your work, your contribution and your passion for innovation drives the impact our work has on people’s lives.
Next steps
If these Business Analyst roles are of interest, you would like more information or a fully confidential discussion on opportunities with CBA, please hit apply now.
If you're already part of the Commonwealth Bank Group (including Bankwest), you'll need to apply through Sidekick to submit a valid application. We’re keen to support you with the next step in your career.
We're aware of some accessibility issues on this site, particularly for screen reader users. We want to make finding your dream job as easy as possible, so if you require additional support please contact HR Direct on 1800 989 696.
Advertising End Date: 26/02/2021
5 days ago
Report job"
16,Business Analyst,University of Melbourne,"$93,935 - $101,684 a year",Parkville VIC,"Job no: 0051799
Work type: Continuing
Location: Parkville
Division/Faculty: Chief Operating Officer Portfolio
Department/School: Operational Performance Group
Salary: $93,935 - $101,684 (UOM 7)
Role & Superannuation rate: Professional - Full time - 17% super
In 2021 The University of Melbourne has embarked on the Professional Services Redesign (PSR) to enable services improvement and more effective ways of working. This opportunity has been newly created as part of the PSR.
About Operational Performance Group
The Operational Performance Group delivers functions that facilitate the design, evaluation, and improvement of services across the University, and business partnering services to Chancellery.
About the role
As the Reporting Analyst, you will be in the Corporate and Student Reporting team within University Decision Support (UDS) and be a key conduit to its customer base. You will facilitate the success of data consumers and users from within the University Faculty environment by connecting them with the UDS Steam’s services and allowing them to understand and exploit the capabilities of the data asset. You will further promote good Data Governance Practices across the Data Governance Network.
About you
You strive to display service excellence and deliver outcomes that surpass expectations. You are a collaborative individual and enjoy connecting with people and developing strong working relationships.
You will further have:
A bachelor’s degree in Information Technology, Business or an equivalent combination of relevant experience and education/training.
Experience in gathering and documenting user requirements and knowledge of good data governance practices
Experience in the use of data warehouse and business intelligence tools
High levels of interest in understanding customer’s roles and exploring opportunities to assist in their role success
Benefits
Maximise your benefits through our Salary Packaging scheme
Flexible family friendly policies, providing generous leave and working conditions
The opportunity to work in a culturally rich environment
A substantial discount to eligible staff and their immediate families in undertaking further studies at the University of Melbourne
To find out more, go to http://about.unimelb.edu.au/careers/staff-benefits
Culture
The University is a vibrant campus. We have well-established clubs and networks giving the opportunity to engage and collaborate with other staff around the University. We strive to create an environment where staff and students promote culturally inclusive behaviour and activities, ensure cultural differences are heard and explored, and actively seek to learn from other cultures.
How to apply
Your application submitted should include a cover letter (one page) outlining your motivation to apply for this role and describing what skills and experience you will bring to it. Please further attach a current version of your CV.
Please note that you are not expected to provide detailed responses against the selection criteria in the .
Staff in the redeployment pool will be considered for this role in the first instance where appropriate.

Advertised: 17 Feb 2021 12:05 AM AUS Eastern Daylight Time
Applications close: 03 Mar 2021 11:55 PM AUS Eastern Daylight Time
Today
Report job"
17,REPORTING ANALYST,MLC Life Insurance,Not shown,Docklands VIC,"MLC Life Insurance. We have been protecting Australians for over 130 years. We respect the role we play in providing peace of mind for our customers, and we never lose sight of it.
Our Purpose
MLC Life Insurance is one of Australia’s leading life insurance specialists and a member of the Nippon Life Insurance Group, one of the world’s leading insurers. We are guided by our simple purpose: ‘A Promise for Life’. We provide almost 1.2 million Australians with reassurance that they and their loved ones will be supported when they need it most. It’s a promise that provides peace of mind and helps them sleep at night.
Our purpose is supported by Our Values of Do What’s Right, Deliver Together, Make it Simple, Own it and Aim High. It’s how we work together and behave every day in every interaction with our customers, partners and each other that defines who we are.
Our Strategy
Our strategy puts our customers at the centre of our ambition to be Australia’s leading and most trusted life insurer. It is through the commitment, energy and talent of everyone at MLC Life Insurance, working together, that we make a positive contribution to the lives of our customers. To support all of us to be at their best every day, we offer a flexible work environment centred on development, wellbeing, recognition and contribution.
With more than 1500 people nationally, we believe our success is built on the unique contribution of our people. Diversity and Inclusion is core to what we believe in and who we are. We aspire for everyone at MLC Life Insurance to feel valued and respected for who they are.
The Role
Reporting to the Senior Manager Enterprise Architecture, the Performance Analyst is responsible for collating information and preparing reports to support decision making to drive the Technology practice’s performance and conformance.
To succeed in doing so, you will be responsible for analysing a diverse set of data and key performance metrics from our functional areas including infrastructure and operations, DevOps and portfolio management, to produce insightful and meaningful reports for the leadership and executive team.
About You
Coming from a technology background, you are an experienced Data Analyst with strong technical skills in SQL and SSIS with experience in data visualisation tools such as Power BI.
Your strong commercial acumen enables you to identify key performance metrics that contribute to the success of an efficient and sustainable Technology business.
Your ability to build and maintain strong relationships will also enable you to work with various technology teams to improve and refine the way we collect, report, and communicate performance data.
Why Choose Us?
At MLC Life Insurance, you will have the opportunity to:
work with a WGEA cited Employer of Choice for Gender Equality
enjoy flexible work options and an inclusive environment where everyone is respected and valued for who they are and their unique contribution
embrace a culture of customer centricity and an ambition to be Australia’s leading, most trusted Life Insurer
access CircleIn Parental Support - an online support resource for our working parents
access a range of benefits including competitive salary, lifestyle leave, two days volunteer leave every year, recognition of service milestones; and
wellness and lifestyle offerings including access to Uprise – our Digital Wellbeing Program, as well as discounts on a variety of lifestyle and entertainment products and services.

Should an applicant be the preferred candidate, background checks (including Federal Police Checks, Employment checks, ASIC banned and disqualified persons and Bankruptcy checks) will be completed prior to the candidate's employment being confirmed. The outcomes of the background checks do not automatically bar candidates, however they will be assessed against the inherent requirements of the position.

Primary Location: AU-VIC-Docklands
Work Locations: Level 15, 727 Collins St Level 15 727 Collins St Docklands 3008
Job: Information Technology
Organization: MLC Limited
Schedule: Permanent
Employee Status: Group Level 3
Full-time
:
Job Posting: 11-Feb-2021, 9:20:04 PM
4 days ago
Report job"
18,Performance Analyst,TP human capital,Not shown,Townsville QLD,"TP Human Capital is currently recruiting for Data Analyst to work with our large, locally based Townsville client in a temporary opportunity.
The Role:
Experience in data analysis, modelling and visualisation using a variety of systems and software
Ability to interpret, apply and communicate, both written and verbal, scientific information to a wide audience
Experience working with contemporary statistical computing and graphics programming systems e.g. R (including CRAN and RMark)
Experience with statistical analyses including non-parametric regression modelling, Bayesian modelling, capture-mark-recapture analysis, Kernel estimation of home ranges, and estimating population density and trajectories in data sparse environments
Experience working on industry relational databases (e.g. PostgreSQL, Microsoft SQL & Oracle)
Experience with contemporary data analytics platforms (e.g. PowerBI, Crystal Reports, Business Objects, Cognos or Tableau)
Be able to travel from time to time for multiple nights, including flying in small aircraft
The Person:
Qualifications in relevant field
Demonstrated experience working with contemporary GIS platforms (e.g. ArcGIS, Google Earth)
Understanding of web development environments such as html5, java, json, .NET
Applications: To apply for this position please click “Apply Now” below.
5 days ago
Report job"
19,Data Analyst,AKQA,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Analytics is one of the fastest-growing disciplines at AKQA with executive support, a global team, a big data stack, and a wide range of capabilities — including user experience insight and applied machine learning. Our clients are building the future of their businesses, more than ever with data at the heart of making this future a reality.
As a Digital Analyst at AKQA, you'll focus on generating information and insights from data, enabling us to optimise our clients' business performance, whilst ensuring their own customers enjoy more relevant and personalised experiences. You'll work closely with digital specialists from a range of strategy, creative and technology disciplines.
Located in Melbourne, you'll work in a meritocratic culture, surrounded by some of the brightest minds in their fields. You'll also have the opportunity to learn and grow within a creative and technically advanced team and have access to ongoing personal and professional development. At AKQA, we are committed to both your career growth and your work/life balance.

JOB REQUIREMENTS:
Generate actionable insights from data, mostly from websites or webapps and campaigns
General understanding of the digital marketing ecosystem - CRM, digital display, social etc; especially with regards to the tracking of inbound activities through AA
Develop measurement frameworks aligned to business goals
Build knowledge of your clients' blockers and goals
Prepare reports and create dashboards, which give our clients information and insights into their business' performance
Configure and deploy website tagging and analytics tools for site implementations, including custom events, variables and dimensions
Client-facing, able to present technical analytics information in a business-friendly way, articulating the technical to non-technical audiences
Proactively identify impacts between various streams of work and communicate to relevant stakeholders
Work with scrum teams to implement and test tracking solutions
Prepare presentations and present to clients, combining your ability to generate insights with your data manipulation and visualisation skills.
Working knowledge of statistical concepts and methodologies
Experience with CRO desirable but not required

SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS:
Strong hands-on experience with Adobe Analytics and Google Analytics, including Adobe Launch and GTM, AA Workspace/ report builder, and data integrations. Operational understanding of Adobe Target is desirable but not required
Clear and concise communication of insights and interpreting data
Story telling through data and visualisations
Ability to problem solve

AKQA is an Equal Opportunities Employer, we believe that diversity is vital to AKQA's ability to provide our clients with the best recommendations and are committed to fostering a varied and inclusive work environment. Your race, colour, ancestry, religion, gender, gender identity, national origin, sexual orientation, age, marital status, disability or veteran status have no bearing on our hiring decisions. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know.
14 days ago
Report job"
20,Digital Data Analyst - Adobe,StatewideSuper,Not shown,Adelaide Region SA,"Statewide Super is the largest and leading South Australian & Northern Territory not-for-profit Industry Superannuation Fund providing expert superannuation advice to over 137,000 members. We manage in excess of $9 billion in funds and have a clear focus on helping our members save for their retirement.
Are you seeking a new challenge? Do you enjoy being the subject matter expert on complex, technical or regulatory projects? Do you enjoy working in a fast-paced environment?
We have an 18 month fixed term contract opportunity for a highly experienced data analyst. This role will see you working on a complex insurance data remediation project, where you will be responsible for analysing data from our administration systems. You will identify data quality issues, assessing their extent and reporting impacts to project stakeholders. Recommending solutions to rectify data issues, you will then ensure that data fixes are implemented in line with business rules. Additionally, you will be responsible for driving continuous improvement in data, including developing relevant practices and procedures to improve data quality for the future.
You will be;
Able to translate technical findings to internal and external stakeholders at all levels, including Senior Management;
Motivated by working in a fast paced, challenging environment;
Creative in your approach to interpreting data;
Self-driven with exceptional initiative; and
Solution and outcomes focused.
Key responsibilities include:
Work in consultation with the remediation project team to provide input into the remediation plan and ensure the rigor of data fixes;
Conduct data discovery exercises to explore the root cause of data issues;
Source data and information from a variety of sources, not only from traditional databases, to be able to verify, assure and report on system processes and outcomes, to assure business rules are met;
Manage data ETL processes to consolidate data for various analysis scenarios;
Provide risk assessments and recommendations based on data analysis findings;
Support the scoping of process and system changes and provide advice on the data implications;
Report outcomes to key stakeholders to help them to understand the scope of the problem at hand;
Define, develop and implement quality assurance practices and procedures for the purposes of implementing data fixes, including test plans and other quality assurance assessments;
Establish an understanding of existing business processes and systems and diagnose and propose solutions to data and system problems by identifying and communicating opportunities for improvement; and
Develop validation tools and processes to ensure the accuracy of data.
Minimum requirements:
Minimum of 5 years’ previous experience in a Business Analyst or Data Analyst role within a complex data environment.
Demonstrated experience in effective development of advanced SQL queries for analysing data.
Financial services experience, particularly within insurance or superannuation, will be extremely advantageous.
Extensive knowledge of data analytics approaches and methodologies, as well as an understanding of the technical challenges associated with data analytics.
This role is based in Adelaide, however candidates based in Melbourne or Sydney are also encouraged to apply with full time working from home available for the right applicant.
If you work with us, you will be working with a group of people who are passionate about growing the financial futures of our community. We value collaboration, integrity, respectful relationships, and most of all, our members.
If you would like to work for an innovative organisation that values and rewards staff involvement and contribution to the business, supports professional development and offers great conditions please forward a cover letter and curriculum vitae to: iwanttowork@statewide.com.au
Please submit your application no later than Friday 15 January 2021. Previous applicants need not reapply.
Statewide Super is an equal opportunity employer, committed to encouraging flexibility, valuing difference and embracing diversity. We pride ourselves on representing the diverse and multicultural communities of our membership and are dedicated to increasing opportunities for Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander Australians. To learn more, please read our Reconciliation Action Plan.
Please note: It is a condition of employment for this role that a National Police Clearance be obtained. Only successful candidates will be contacted due to the volume of applications received. No Agencies please.
30+ days ago
Report job"
21,Data Analyst,Capgemini Australia,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"The speed of change is throwing traditional business methods into question and disrupting the relevance of entire industries. Capgemini, a global leader in consulting, digital transformation, technology and engineering services, is at the forefront of innovation and well placed to address opportunities for our clients in the evolving world of cloud, digital and platforms. Building on its strong 50-year heritage and deep industry-specific expertise, Capgemini enables organisations to realise their business ambitions through an array of services from strategy to operations. Capgemini is driven by the conviction that the business value of technology comes from and through people. Today, it is a multicultural company with over 270,000 team members in almost 50 countries. With Altran, the Group reported 2019 combined revenues of EUR 17 billion. Learn more about us at www.capgemini.com.

Let's talk about the team:
Our Insights and Data team helps our clients make better business decisions by transforming an ocean of data into streams of insight. Our clients are among Australia's top performing companies and they choose to partner with Capgemini for a very good reason - our exceptional people. Due to continued growth within Capgemini's Insights & Data practice we intend to recruit a Data Lineage Analyst with relevant consulting and communication skills. If you are already working in a consultancy role, or have excellent client-facing skills gained within large organizations, we would like to discuss our consultant opportunities with you

Let's talk about the role and responsibilities:
Support the technical validation and business validation of the lineage content captured
Support the operationalisation of lineage as required
Provide any hyper care support for lineage maintenance for a period of time
Let's talk about your qualifications and experience:
2-3 years' previous experience working in a similar data lineage role
Excellent communication and stakeholder management skills to elicit information and influence the business and the data teams to achieve key outcomes
Strong background in banking and agile methodologies - Scrum or Scaled Agile Framework (SAFE)
Previous experience working in a Big Data program is highly desired
Previous working experience with Informatica EDC/ETL
achelor's Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems or related field
Let's talk about what's in it for you!
Passionate people are Capgemini's Ace of Spades - join us to discover a career that will challenge, support and inspire you. Working at Capgemini you'll find the rewards are more than just financial. You will work alongside some very smart and inspiring people on exciting projects and you will also enjoy incredible benefits. We offer flexible work practices and 40 hours of self-development every year with a huge selection of learning opportunities to choose from.
As ""Architects of Positive Futures"", Capgemini actively supports the community in 3 ways:
Diversity and Inclusion - we believe diversity of thought fuels excellence and innovation, which is why we positively encourage applications from suitably qualified candidates regardless of their gender identity, ethnicity, sexual orientation, religion, ability, intersex status or age. To support our commitment to diversity and inclusion, we celebrate special events and days of significance that are important to our employees such as Diwali, Bastille Day, Pride, IDAHOBIT, IWD and International day of people with Disabilities. Our Employee Resource Groups Women@Capgemini and OutFront support the grassroots passion of employees to drive our diversity agenda and effect change.
Digital inclusion - at Capgemini we are using our skills to drive social impact initiatives focusing on helping society address the impact of the digital and automation revolution. We also provide employees with opportunities to give back to the community through charity projects and volunteer days.
Environmental Sustainability - Capgemini joined the CDP's (Carbon Disclosure Project) prestigious ""A list"" for its commitment to the Net-Zero economy. We are focusing on helping our clients transform towards more sustainable business models and committing to reduce our own carbon emissions (GHG) by 20% per employee by 2020.
Recognised by Ethisphere as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies for the last 8 years in a row, ethics and values are at the heart of Capgemini's corporate culture and business. Embedded in our DNA, our seven values - Honesty, Boldness, Trust, Team Spirit, Freedom, Fun and Modesty - have remained the same since company inception in 1967. To see how we bring these values to life, click here to listen to some of our employee's stories.
Come join us, bring your whole self to work, create new possibilities for you, your customers and your community and help us to be Architects of Positive Futures.

Please note unsolicited resumes from employment agencies or other third parties will not be considered.
#L1-PV1
9 days ago
Report job"
22,Data Lineage Analyst,Recruitment by Kogan People Solutions,"$60,000 - $70,000 a year",Mount Waverley VIC,"Business Data Analyst
Kogan People Solutions are working with a young and progressive real estate company aiming to deliver an innovative suite of products to their industry. The suite of computer based products being developed is built around strong data analysis and will be at the forefront of innovation in the real-estate management and advisory industry.
The Role:
The Business Data Analyst will be responsible for gaining clear understanding of business process and desired business outcomes and formulate functionality requirements for the suite of solutions being developed. The role is also responsible for designing and implementing effective functionality solutions which will ensure our business can deliver promised outcomes to customers.
Location
Mount Waverley
Tenure
This is a full time, ongoing position.
Salary
$60k to $70K +Super p.a. dependent on experience
Responsibilities include:
Building relationships and communicating with management to understand their requirements.
Analysing and reporting on various business processes as they relate to products being developed.
Evaluating financial and functional inefficiencies in different business processes and recommending optimal processes.
Visualizing business data for business intelligence.
Use effective and appropriate project management methodologies
Developing Statistical analysis of various data sources to build predictive models.
Using data to extract valuable meaning which would act as the central source of information for development of the agreed suite of products.
Creating data and process modelling techniques to create clear system specifications.
Produce documentation and functional analysis.
Liaise with software developers and other stakeholders to ensure effective and appropriate deliverables.
Be the go to information point for relevant project stakeholders.
Implement functional solutions using programming scripts to ensure acceptable data quality and integrity of the system.
Writing user and training documentation and deliver relevant training.
To be successfully considered for this role we will look for candidates with
Very strong data analysis expertise
A relevant bachelor’s degree or higher qualification
A minimum of 2, preferably more years of experience working as a business data analyst
Real-estate industry knowledge will be well regarded though is not a pre-requisite
Unrestricted working rights in Australia
Very strong communication skills
Strong ability to manage complexity and bring IT development to fruition.
Interested? Please apply using the facilities on this site to express interest and to supply your resume to the appointed recruiters, Kogan People Solutions.
We will only be in contact with shortlisted candidates.
KOGAN PEOPLE SOLUTIONS - Recruitment Excellence
Job Types: Full-time, Permanent
Salary: $60,000.00 – $70,000.00 per year
Benefits:
Employee mentoring program
Professional development assistance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplementary Pay:
Performance bonus
Experience:
or more of highly relevant : 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor Degree (Required)
Work Eligibility:
Permitted to work permanently with no restriction on hours (e.g. citizen, permanent resident) (Required)
COVID-19 Precaution(s):
Sanitising, disinfecting or cleaning procedures in place
26 days ago
Report job"
23,Business Data Analyst,PM-Partners group,$300 a day,Australia,"PM-Partners group are a specialist Project Management Consultancy. We have a unique way of running projects and providing training and advice, so our clients get the best results with less cost and risk. Each year we deliver over $3B of projects, train over 10,000 people, and help some of Australia’s leading brands improve their PMOs.

PM-Partners is currently seeking a Junior Data Analyst with 1 - 2 Years Experience working with large volumes of Data to work for an exciting startup based in North Sydney. As a new addition to the existing team, you'll be assisting sorting through large amounts of client data on Excel and Jira and uploading it into their new cloud based database.

This is an initial contract through to the end of July with potential for further opportunity for the right candidate. This role is 50/50 work from home and based in the office.

To be considered for this position you will have experience and strengths in the following:
1 - 2 years experience working in a similar role proving your ability to work with large volumes of data
Previous experience with Jira and Excel (V-lookups, Pivot Table etc)
Good attention to detail
Excellent communication skills; written & verbal, formal documentation, presentation, diagramming and modelling, facilitation and elicitation
Strong team player (will be working in a larger team)


What we can offer you:
Culture: A fun, fast paced, collaborative delivery environment
People: A group of talented, experienced, and dedicated Consultants to work by your side with a dedicated Relationship Manager
Passion: Ability to band together when under pressure to deliver first class results to clients
Transparency: Open door policy
Professional Development: On the job development and access to certifications in our Training practice
Care and Support: On-going support and advice from experienced PM-Partners Consultants
Knowledge: Access to PM-Partners Delivery and Advisory practices


If you feel you meet our selection criteria and are looking to join a leading Project Management Consultancy, please submit your resume to Emily Campbell at PM-Partners via Seek application or email directly to emilyc@pm-partners.com.au
15 days ago
Report job"
24,Junior Data Analyst/Administrator,FDM Group,Not shown,Australia,"Note: Please only submit one application, even if you are interested in more than one opportunity. A recruiter will speak to you about all options available after we review your application.

At FDM it’s ‘business as usual’, we are recruiting now and throughout the year. Due to COVID-19 we have implemented alternative working arrangements to ensure that all our people stay safe. These consist of remote working, virtual training, video interviewing, and access to webinars and virtual events. We have training start dates happening throughout the year. If you’re looking to start your career in technology or business, we want to hear from you now!

Here at FDM, we recruit, train and deploy talented individuals who are looking for a diverse and exciting career in technology. We welcome graduates from all degree backgrounds to apply for our award-winning Careers Program. In turn, you will become an FDM consultant working alongside our prestigious clients such as HSBC, KPMG Australia and Macquarie, to name a few. This provides the opportunity to develop invaluable skills whilst working alongside industry-leading professionals.

FDM is a FTSE 250 award-winning employer, with centres in Asia-Pacific, the UK, mainland Europe and North America. Currently, we have over 3,000 consultants working in a variety of roles including Business Intelligence, Data Analytics and Business Analysis.

What will my time at FDM be like?
Upon joining FDM, you will receive up to date training at our Sydney academy and you will have the opportunity to gain additional qualifications so you can stand out from the graduate market. Having completed your training, you will work with one or more of our clients during the two-year program.

Throughout your time with FDM, you will receive full support and mentoring to ensure you are on track for success as well as enjoy social events with your fellow consultants.

What will I offer FDM?
Excellent communication skills and an ability to build relationships
Ambitious characteristics with a drive to succeed within tech
Bachelor’s degree or above
Strong analytical ability
Good decision-making skills within fast-paced working environments
Geographical flexibility across Sydney and Melbourne to support our clients
Commitment to a two-year contract with FDM upon completion of the training period

What will FDM offer me?
Commercially relevant training
Access to industry-recognised qualifications
Global connections with renowned organisations
Development of employability skills including Microsoft Excel, CV writing, interview and presentation techniques
Modern training academies in city centre locations
Social events and networking opportunities
A foot in the door to some of the world’s most reputable organisations
Mentoring and ongoing support throughout your entire FDM journey
30+ days ago
Report job"
25,Graduate - Business Analysis & Business Intelligence Consultant,"Department of Industry, Tourism and Trade","$92,620 - $103,538 a year",Darwin NT,"Job description

Agency Department of Industry, Tourism and Work unit Business and Workforce – Strategy and

Trade Partnerships

Job title Data Analyst Designation Administrative Officer 6

Job type Full Time Duration Fixed to 01/10/2021

Salary $92,620 - $103,538 Location Darwin

Position number 17393 RTF 206347 Closing 23/02/2021

Contact Bryan Dinning on 08 8935 7715 or bryan.dinning@nt.gov.au

About the agency business.nt.gov.au

Apply online https://jobs.nt.gov.au/Home/JobDetails?rtfId=206347

Information for applicants

Applications must be limited to a one-page summary sheet and detailed resume.

The NTPS values diversity and aims for a workforce that represents the community. The NTPS encourages people from

all diversity groups to apply for vacancies. For more information about applying for this position and the merit process, go

to the OCPE website.

Under the agency’s Special Measures Recruitment Plan eligible Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander (Aboriginal) applicants

will be granted priority consideration for this vacancy. For more information on Special Measures, go to the OCPE website.

Primary objective:
Assist with the management, coordination and support of the collection and validation of Australian Vocational Education

and Training Management Information Statistical Standard (AVETMISS) data and other relevant information, ensuring data

integrity is maintained.

Context statement:
The Data and Evaluation team are the Department of Industry, Tourism and Trade’s vocational education and training (VET)

reporting unit, responsible for the submission of data to national authorities, distribution of performance reports and the

provision of VET data advice and information.

Key duties and responsibilities:
Coordinate the collection, evaluation and validation of AVETMISS compliant data to produce national consolidated
data sets while contributing to policy directions and contract management obligations.

Undertake routine and responsive reporting and briefings to internal and external stakeholders including ministerial
briefings.

Provide advice on current and emerging issues and changes related to the collection and management of VET related
data.

Assist with the implementation of systems, processes and standards for the management and distribution of data.
Design and implement validation functions and processes to quality assure incoming VET data and related report
outputs.

Provide mentoring, training, support and advice to clients and peers regarding VET data and related reporting
environments.

Selection criteria:
Essential:
1. Demonstrated experience managing data collections in a collaborative team environment, including the ability to

validate, manipulate and maintain data integrity to generate reports.

2. Extensive experience with a variety of office computer applications, including analytics (e.g. Base SAS), reporting (e.g.

Power BI) and database (e.g. MS SQL Server) applications, with the ability to understand various programming and

query languages and interpret their use.

3. Demonstrated high-level written and oral communication skills, with the ability to liaise effectively with both the public

and private sectors at a State/Territory and national level.

4. Demonstrated ability to develop business processes to support the delivery of business objectives.

5. Experience with the application of project management principles in support of the development or maintenance of

data management and reporting environments.

Desirable:
1. Tertiary qualification in data science/analytics or relevant experience in these fields.

2. Experience within the VET sector, in particular demonstrated experience working with the National AVETMIS

Standards.
Northern Territory Government
7 days ago
Report job"
26,Data Analyst,Carecone,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"The Management Consultant –Risk & Assurance is a client-facing professional who:
Assists the client in the development of business objectives, policies & processes, and risk & control value-chain mapping
Discusses business shortcomings (issues, breaches, incidents) with the clients
Analyzes the evaluations the current risk and compliance system
Directs the client towards more efficient solutions for effective management of processes, policies, risks and controls
Reviews operating procedures and advising of departures from procedures and standards
Responsibilities:
Assess and evaluate the client’s current state business policies, processes, systems across the end-to-end value chain (including different lines of businesses)
Understand the business issues, incidents, record breaches and evaluate risk and compliance impacts
Conduct obligation assessments and record findings in the client’s Enterprise risk management systems, in line with the client’s Risk and compliance framework
Identify shortcomings in the risk and compliance framework, policies and processes and provide and implement recommendations
Facilitate client engagements for breach management actions, remediate obligations, track incident/ issue management progress and provide updates to client management
Analyse existing and proposed controls and procedures and prepare recommendations where revisions, additional efficiencies are required
Support in remediation activities of the client, where breaches identified
Assist in implementing approved recommendations, issuing revised instructions and procedure manuals, and drafting other documentation
Pre-emptively discover bigger problems, recommend solution options and deliver these solutions
Co-ordinating BRD development activities & mentoring, leading junior business analysts
Minimum qualifications: Masters or Graduate in the either of the following disciplines:
Business Analytics
Law
Finance
Risk Management
Computer Science
Data Analytics
Data Science
Preferred certifications in Project management, Internal Auditing, Risk & Compliance management
Basic Requirements:
Strong work experience with preferred hands on exposure to risk and compliance management and remediation, breach management and issue/ incident management projects
Understanding of an ERM tools and techniques
Strong understanding of compliance concepts, including obligation assessment, breach management and remediation practices
Strong understanding of business risks and controls
Good understanding with preferred hands on experience with policy documentation, process modelling
Working knowledge of banking, finance and insurance industry
Strong concept knowledge of risks and compliance including 3 lines of defense models
Soft skills- Curiosity, Courage, Integrity, Incisiveness
Location- anywhere in Australia and ready to relocate depending on the length of the project
Ready to travel to customer sites post COVID-19 is under control
Problem solving skills, analytical
Understanding of the project management techniques including AGILE methodology
Contract length: 6 months
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
5 days ago
Report job"
27,Risk and Assurance Analyst,Woolworths Group Limited,Not shown,Bella Vista NSW,"Data Integrity Analyst
Bella Vista based, with WFH flexibility
Grow your career with Woolworths Group
Work as part of a cross-disciplinary, collaborative team

About the role
This role will be responsible for ensuring data quality across all meat systems within the supply chain systems to assist in decision making. This role will also identify operational improvements in the supply chain through data mining and statistical reporting, and data analysis methodologies and scenario model the impact of proposed initiatives/options.
The Data Integrity Analyst will act as a bridge between the business and the IT department.

Responsibilities will include, but are not limited to:
Lead data setups – Articles, vendors, and sites.
Maintain and align data across systems – SAP, FoodsConnected and Quintiq.
Provide analytical support for business opportunities, and proposals
Model, Analyse performance, investigate problems, find root causes, and develop observations and recommendations
Develop dashboards and scorecards that drive enterprise results
Assists with gathering and interpreting data with various levels of problem solving
Present analytics that drive continuous improvement
Identify business process and recommend process improvements
Develop and maintain strong partnerships with internal and external supply chain stakeholders and business partners utilising the systems


Who we are looking for
We’re looking for an experienced analyst, with proven technical skills combined with the ability to work across functions and communicate effectively with various levels within the organisation.
As part of the Woolworths Group, we are looking for someone who possesses the ability to work both independently and in cross functional teams across different geographies and cultures.
Requirements:
3+ years experience in data, analytics or insights
Ability to identify problems and opportunities whilst applying critical thinking
Knowledge in a digital or retail business with experience
Ability to organise and prioritise multiple activities simultaneously in an ambiguous and dynamic business environment
High degree of accuracy with data management, retrieval, manipulation and calculation
High degree of analytical assessment of data from systems
Extensive system navigation experience, especially SAP.
Knowledge of SAP, FoodsConnected, Quintiq master data setups.
Power BI tools / reporting tools such as WBI, Tableau
Excellent working knowledge of MS Office and Google suite, especially working with spreadsheets.
Joining the Group

As an inclusive, team-first company, our people are at the core of everything we do.

We care deeply about creating a workplace where our team members feel valued, respected and empowered. We are committed to providing equal opportunity regardless of gender identity, ethnicity, disability, sexual orientation or life stage and we are proud to be recognised as a Gold Tier Employer in the Australian Workplace Equality Index for LGBTQ+ inclusion.
As our Group continues to evolve, innovate and support our communities, we encourage our team members to do the same with their own careers, by providing ongoing opportunities to grow and make a real difference.

We value flexibility, and encourage our team members to work in ways that meet their work/life commitments and support their wellbeing.

We work hard to create a safe and inclusive environment for all, and most importantly, we're all about creating better experiences – for our customers and for each other.

We’d love to hear from You

If you meet a number of the requirements, but not all, we encourage you to submit your application. You can learn more about working with us on LinkedIn or via www.wowcareers.com.au. #LI

Our Talent Acquisition Team and Hiring Leaders kindly request no unsolicited resumes or approaches from Recruitment Agencies. Woolworths Group is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes. #work180 #LI
Woolworths Group
30+ days ago
Report job"
28,Data Integrity Analyst,Suncorp Group,Not shown,Sydney Inner Suburbs NSW,"The Role
The purpose of this Natural Perils Pricing Analyst role is to develop and implement natural peril address pricing models, and implement infrastructure and monitoring processes to assess the effectiveness of these models.
Key Accountabilities:
Build, blend and implement individual address and catastrophe natural peril pricing models such as cyclone, bushfire, earthquake, flood, hail, storm, demand surge & underinsurance.
Use a combination of data science, environmental scientific research, insurance claim experience and external expertise to develop above natural peril models.
Formally track the effectiveness of price changes performed.
Understand impacts of pricing changes such as; premium change impacts on new business, renewal, lapse, cancellation rates, concentration risk, and reinsurance.
Respond to and engage with multiple functions of the business to share pricing knowledge and provide information around natural peril risk and claims experience.
Understand, formulate and prepare portfolio business case impact analysis and recommendations for key business stakeholders.
Key Capabilities:
Recent gradudate or 1 year of working experience in an insurance analytical role is preferred, though not essential
Strong academic track record
Strong analytical skills
Basic exposure to programming such as SAS, Python, R, Excel and relational databases
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Motivation to build positive and constructive working relationships with key stakeholders
Strong project and time management
Ability to break complex problems down into simplified components
Relevant tertiary qualification in an analytical discipline including Actuarial Science (advantageous), Business, Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Natural Sciences, Engineering or Computer Science
Our Benefits
Actuarial study support available for actuaries who want to work towards their qualification
Discounts of up to 25% on our various Insurance, Banking & Superannuation products
Flexible working environment and arrangements; genuine focus on work-life balance
Numerous discounts with our corporate partners (retail & shopping / travel & holiday / health & wellbeing)
We offer support and various programs for our people: (Employee Assistance Program (EAP), Health & Wellbeing, Study Support, Employee Referral Program ($600), Facilities for nursing mothers, Company share options, Social club, Years of Service Recognition)
About Us
Suncorp is a leading financial services provider in Australia and New Zealand, enabling more than nine million customers to better protect and enhance their financial wellbeing. With a heritage dating back to 1902, we have grown to become a top-20 ASX-listed company with over 13,000 people. We offer banking, wealth management and insurance products and services through our well-recognised brands including Suncorp, AAMI, GIO, Apia, Shannons and Vero, as well as those from our partners.
Working within the Suncorp Network we believe we are our best when our workforce is as diverse, talented and passionate as the communities in which we live and operate, and where our people feel included, valued and connected. We are passionate about inspiring our people by creating an inclusive culture, offering flexible work, career development and internal mobility, and building connected relationships amongst our team members and with our customers. Joining Suncorp, you will be joining an organisation which cares and is proud of our achievements in being recognised for:
Best Insurance Company in Corporate Social Responsibility (2018)
Employer of Choice for Gender Equality for sixth consecutive year (2014-2019)
Money magazine’s Bank of the Year and Business Bank for second consecutive year (2018-2019)
General Insurance Product Innovation of the Year (2018)
If this opportunity sounds like the challenge you have been looking for please apply online today. For further information regarding this position, please contact our Sourcing Partner on 02 8226 9659.
At Suncorp we build inclusion by providing an environment where everyone is able to be themselves and feel valued, involved and respected for their perspectives and contribution.
Advertised: 10 Feb 2021 AUS Eastern Daylight Time
Applications close: 24 Feb 2021 AUS Eastern Daylight Time

6 days ago
Report job"
29,Natural Perils Pricing Analyst,Transdev,Not shown,Melbourne VIC,"Transdev Australasia has a large, multi-modal footprint including bus operations, light rail, ferries and passenger rail. With a significant focus towards our biggest bus entity, this role will lead BAU reporting requirements, new improvement initiatives and establish relationships with stakeholders across multiple business functions.

Key responsibilities include:
Manage BAU reporting requirements with a primary focus towards Transdev Melbourne (our single biggest entity), supporting all functional areas.
Refine and enhance reporting processes, including the transition from Excel to PowerBI.
Identify improvement opportunities for data-driven initiatives, leading their implementation.
Establish trusted relationships with stakeholders at all organisational levels, building rapport and capability.
Support Transdev Australasia’s Group function and other entities in Data & Analytics initiatives.

Initial employment is on a fixed term basis into early 2022.

What you bring
You are an established Data Analytics and Reporting expert with an even balance of technical and stakeholder skills, and demonstrated success in large, complex organisations.
Key requirements include:
Relevant tertiary qualifications, and technical proficiency in Excel, PowerBI (basic to intermediate knowledge essential) and SQL (strongly preferred).
Highly analytical with strong attention to detail, maintaining accuracy and integrity with data management.
Excellent stakeholder partnering skills with the resourcefulness to gather meaningful and relevant information quickly.
Highly resilient, with the ability to work autonomously and in a deadline-driven, fast-paced environment.
Practical experience in designing and transitioning existing reports (i.e. Excel-based) into PowerBI is highly desirable.

About Transdev
Transdev is a world leader in the operation of passenger transport services. We operate in 19 countries around the world, with 83,000 employees and manage 41,000 vehicles. We are committed to creating a diverse, inclusive and flexible workforce which reflects the community and the customers we serve.

Our values and beliefs
The work we carry out at Transdev touches the lives of our families, friends and future generations alike. Contributing to our growing, global business means you can make your mark, push boundaries and reach your maximum potential. As an equal opportunity employer, we are committed to reflecting the diversity of the communities we serve. We support applications from people representing all diversity groups and ages such as Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander, LGBTI, people with disabilities, religious beliefs, and ethnicity.

Interested?
6 days ago
Report job"
30,Data & Business Analyst,Novo Nordisk,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Our purpose is to drive change to defeat diabetes and other serious chronic diseases, such as obesity and rare blood and endocrine disorders. We do so by pioneering scientific breakthroughs, expanding access to our medicines, and working to prevent and ultimately cure diabetes. With almost 100 years of experience, one of the broadest diabetes product portfolios in the healthcare industry, our success is built on our company values – the Novo Nordisk Way.Novo Nordisk Oceania is in an exciting growth phase,with an exciting pipeline of innovative products,leading disease awareness initiatives and an expanding team in Australia.

Do you love helping customers? Would you like to work for a company that makes a significant difference to patients, the medical profession and society?

If you answered yes, we would love to hear from you!

Novo Nordisk Australia is currently seeking an experienced Supply Chain professional to join our Business Operations team.

About the department
The Novo Nordisk Oceania affiliate is a growing and dynamic organisation with passionate and committed employees across Australia and New Zealand. Our primary therapy area is diabetes where we have a broad range of market-leading products. We also offer a large variety of medicines within the areas of obesity, haemophilia, growth disorders and women’s health.

We look for people with a positive, solution mindset who love to make things happen and feel proud of their achievements!

The position
Located at our brand new head office in North Sydney and reporting to the Supply Chain Manager, this role will see you supporting the warehouse and transport analytics and planning insights to ensure that our life-changing products reach our customers.
Other key responsibilities include (but are not limited to):
Supporting the supply chain planning process by creating timely analysis and support decision making;
Supporting the budgeting processes by generating insights on inventory levels and inventory management;
Updating all the Supply Chain KPIs on a monthly basis;
Developing analytical tools to monthly review KPIs and suggest corrective actions;
Controlling the warehouse and outbound cost drivers and ensure that external partner processes with 4PL and wholesalers are working efficiently;
Managing Master Data maintenance – Products and Customers;
Processing of Rebates, Reporting, Invoicing and Month End reconciliation;
Working in accordance with our Quality System, procedures and any other legislative requirements;
Supporting the Supply Chain Manager on projects.

Qualifications & Requirements
A minimum of five years’ experience in supply chain.
Tertiary qualifications in Supply Chain, Logistics, Administration or related field is preferred.
Solid administrative skills including intermediate level skills in MS Office.
Experienced user of SAP is desirable.
Strong knowledge of demand planning and inventory management.
Good analytical skills and business understanding.
Proactive team player with a patient focused mindset.
Exceptional eye for detail with accuracy.
Fluent English communication skills.
You must either be an Australian Citizen or have a current residency visa to live and work in Australia.

Working at Novo Nordisk
At Novo Nordisk, we have been changing diabetes since 1923. If you are ready to help us strengthen our position as an innovative pioneer and respected industry leader, we encourage you to join us and make the most of your talent. Working here is not just a way to make a living, but a way to make a difference with an amazing people culture, launching innovative products and a growing organisation.

Application Deadline
We will review applications as they are received so don’t hesitate to apply!

#LI-AMS

Millions rely on us
To work for Novo Nordisk you will need the skills, dedication and ambition to change lives for the better for millions of patients living with diabetes and other chronic diseases. In exchange, we offer the chance to be part of a truly global workplace, where passion and engagement are met with opportunities for professional and personal development.
20 days ago
Report job"
31,Supply Chain Coordinator / Analyst,Macquarie Group Limited,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"An exciting opportunity exists for you to work with our diverse breadth of functions within our Behavioural Risk team. This role will suit you if you have an economics or business-related major, coupled with experience in risk, consulting or corporate communications.
You will join the Behavioural Risk Division, who provide expertise and oversight on risk culture and conduct risk, environmental and social risk, and work health and safety. The team is focused on facilitating and driving improved risk outcomes for our internal and external stakeholders.
Sitting in the centralised Risk Management Group, we are responsible for setting the relevant policies and frameworks, providing advisory and thought leadership, engaging with stakeholders across the Group and externally, and driving good risk outcomes – for our key risk areas – across the businesses.
In this role, your day-to-day tasks may include:
assisting with Management and Board Reporting
implementing Risk reporting standards across all Behavioural risk reporting
preparing presentations, training materials and general updates to be shared with our stakeholders
supporting implementation of the Behavioural Risk division’s business plan and improvement actions
co-ordinating project and improvement initiatives
actively participating in Risk Management Group-wide projects and collaborate across the group to enhance awareness and maturity in understanding of risk culture, conduct risk, health and safety, and environment and social risk.
To be successful in the role, you will have:
ideally an economics or business-related Degree
experience in either risk, consulting or corporate communications
a desire to continually learn and develop your skillset across a broad range of subject matter
strong attention to detail and a keen and proactive attitude
Basic data literacy and an interest in using and developing metrics to support monitoring of non-financial risks
strong communication and presentation skills
the ability to think laterally and connect diverse information in a cohesive and synthesised manner.
About the Risk Management Group
The Risk Management Group (RMG) is an independent, centralised unit responsible for ensuring all risk across Macquarie are appropriately assessed and managed. Its divisions include Behavioural Risk, Compliance, Credit, Financial Crime Risk, Internal Audit, Market Risk, Operational Risk, Regulatory Affairs and Aggregate Risk, and RMG Enterprise Support.
Our commitment to Diversity and Inclusion
Macquarie understands the importance of diversity and inclusion - our long history of success has come from being different. At Macquarie we value the innovation and creativity that diversity of thought brings. The one thing we all have in common is our focus on high performance. If you're capable, motivated and can deliver, we want you on our team.
We recognise that flexibility comes in a variety of forms. Talk to us about what flexibility you need.

About Macquarie
A career at Macquarie means you’ll have the opportunity to develop and utilise new skills, explore interesting fields and do challenging work that will impact the lives of people around the world—whether it’s accelerating the green energy transition, helping sustain global food supplies, financing social housing projects or investing in essential infrastructure. At Macquarie, we’re empowering people to innovate and invest for a better future.
Our size and international presence means your work can take you anywhere—across business groups, disciplines, sectors and borders. With 16,300+ employees and offices in 31 markets around the world, we’re a truly global organisation.
You’ll be supported by a diverse team where the unique perspectives, ideas and experiences that all of our people bring are valued. You’ll be empowered to address unmet needs in our communities whilst advising and investing alongside our clients and partners. Working with us, you’ll have the opportunity to make a difference.
Macquarie is a global financial group providing clients with asset management, retail and business banking, wealth management, leasing and asset financing, market access, commodity trading, renewables development, investment banking and principal investment.

Job no: RMG-956224
Work type: Full time
Location: Sydney
Category: Mid-level, Junior
Group: Risk Management Group
Division: Behavioural Risk
Recruiter: Bianca Jenkins
Opening Date: 11/2/2021
4 days ago
Report job"
32,Behavioural Risk Analyst,Abbvie,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"About AbbVie
AbbVie’s mission is to discover and deliver innovative medicines that solve serious health issues today and address the medical challenges of tomorrow. We strive to have a remarkable impact on people’s lives across several key therapeutic areas: immunology, oncology, neuroscience, eye care, virology, women’s health and gastroenterology, in addition to products and services across its Allergan Aesthetics portfolio. For more information about AbbVie, please visit us at www.abbvie.com. Follow @abbvie on Twitter, Facebook, Instagram, YouTube and LinkedIn.
JOB SUMMARY:
Define business priorities, possibilities and problems using data to provide insight into the current and future state of the Business Unit, managing data integrity and systems to collect, analyse, depict, report and predict.
Overall responsibility for the administration and system maintenance for daily sales reporting for the Business Unit including monthly data reconciliations, system support for sales dashboard solutions and performance tracking.
In addition to this, the Analyst will collaborate with the Snr SFE Manager for the Sales vs Target tracking/reporting, administration and reporting of Sales Incentive Plans, and input into the Monthly and Quarterly Business Unit Deep Dive Reviews.
This role is also responsible for the strategic direction of analytics and reporting as well as the data architect for the Business Unit.
The role serves in a business partnering capability with responsibility for the administration and system maintenance for the purpose of sales database integrity for daily sales reporting across the Business Unit including monthly data reconciliations, creation and management of dashboard solutions and performance tracking.
In addition to this, the Analyst will be responsible for the Sales vs Target tracking/reporting, administration and integration of other data sources
KEY DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES
Providing analytical support to the Business Unit utilizing various internal data sources and external data sources, developing dashboards or reports as required
Administration and maintenance of reporting systems (SAP Business Objects, Power BI) to generate sales reporting on a weekly, monthly and quarterly basis
Identification of new and emerging trends in data management, AI, and Machine learning and how these capabilities can be applied to the business.
Master database management support for sales dashboard solutions and performance tracking.
Business unit review presentations that are informative, concise, commercially focused, and relevant to the key business issue being addressed
Performing analysis to determine the effectiveness of advertising programs, pricing adjustments and competitor efforts
Performing analysis to evaluate the compliance level to corporate agreements and contracts
Incorporating machine learning and robotic process automation.
Working with SFE Manager to enable accurate Sales Incentive Plan’s (SIP), including calculations of targets and SIP payments for the Facial Aesthetics Business Unit on a quarterly and annual basis
Gathering and analysing relevant competitor data (where applicable) , both company and product related
Effectively prioritising tasks and projects to deliver quality solutions to the highest priority business issue
Ensuring all business activities comply with relevant legal requirements and ethical standards
Involvement in key projects and initiatives as required
Overall ownership of key components for commercial analytics as required by the Business Excellence Lead Snr Business Unit Analyst, Commercial Analytics Page 2 Quality
Report any adverse event within 24 hours as per Allergan’s policies and procedures
Support Allergan’s Quality Management System and internal auditing processes. Workplace Health & Safety
Proactively participate in Allergan’s WHS programs, adhere to policies and promote a safe work environment at all times. General
Adhere to Allergan’s internal codes of conduct and compliance processes.
Other ad hoc duties such as administrative duties, as requested.

Qualifications
JOB REQUIREMENTS
Qualifications
Tertiary qualifications in a business / finance related discipline Skills and Abilities
3 to 5 years of functional experience in either a commercially focused role or in a finance support capacity, preferably healthcare experience, and demonstrated experience in the following key areas:
o System Analyst
o Data Management
o Business Analysis and Reporting
o Project management
o Data Science
Strong analytical, planning and problem resolution skills
Ability to translate customer requirements into specifications and convert data and information into intelligence
Solid understanding of financial reports / budgets / sales forecasts / customer buying trends/pricing and promotion
High level of attention to detail and numeracy accuracy
Advanced skills in Microsoft suite, specifically Excel, Access and Powerpoint.
Experience developing and working with self-service analytic software such as Power BI and Tableau
SAP knowledge is advantageous, particularly Business Objects/Explorer (administration, report writing, universe build and maintenance)
Strong communication, listening and presentation skills.
PROFESSIONAL SKILLS
Sales Force Analytics & Effectiveness - Uses latest statistical analysis tools (e.g., SAS and Excel) to run promotional response models and other field analytics
Business Analyst & Planning - Gathers and takes action on strategic insights through the evaluation of market research, product knowledge, and clinical and financial data to build near and long-term business plans
Data Analysis & Interpretation - Gathers and synthesizes internal and external data and uses key metrics to generate business insights, establish goals, and influence business decisions
Commercial Acumen - Demonstrates a strong understanding of both the financial and non-financial impact of decisions. Exercises sound judgement and approach to risk based on in-depth understanding of business and relevant data sources.
Customer Insights - Develops a holistic view of customers’ business strategies, drivers and expectations. Builds mutually beneficial relationships and co-creates bespoke account plans in pursuit of Allergan’s strategic objectives.
LEADERSHIP SKILLS – LEAD SELF
Inquisitive – Shows curiosity, asks probing questions, and changes the status quo to make strong decisions while managing and driving change.
Optimistic – Has a positive outlook; aligns with business needs and has a can-do attitude.
Excellence Focused – Demonstrates discipline and commitment to turn strategy into reality; drives results by focusing on prioritisation and continuous improvement.
Transition skill to Lead Others
Open and Authentic – Is emotionally intelligent and magnifies diversity of markets, people and perspectives to drive business outcomes.
WAYS WE WORK
All For One Abbvie; We weigh all decisions against the common good. We inspire, share and create as a team. We solve problems for all rather than serving our immediate team.
Decide Smart & Sure; We make intelligent decisions to create the best outcomes. We act quickly, embrace experimentation, and learn what doesn’t work and get on to what does.
Agile & Accountable; We streamline and eliminate unnecessary obstacles. We plan but adapt as we go. We delegate and make tough decisions to ensure focus on results, staying keenly aware of the urgency in all we do.
Clear & Courageous; Open, honest, candid dialogue is core to our work and how we act with each other. We share information freely and continuously to find solutions. We admit mistakes. We grow stronger by putting the courage of our conviction to the test.
Make Possibilities Real; We question with endless curiosity. We’re never satisfied with good enough—patients depend on us to deliver more. We challenge ourselves to find creative, constructive solutions to turn possibilities into reality

Travel
Yes, 5 % of the Time
Job Type
Experienced
Schedule
Full-time
Job Level Code
IC
Equal Employment Opportunity
At AbbVie, we value bringing together individuals from diverse backgrounds to develop new and innovative solutions for patients. As an equal opportunity employer we do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex (including pregnancy), physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, marital status, protected veteran status, or any other legally protected characteristic.
1 day ago
Report job"
33,"Snr Bus Unit Analyst, Commercial Analytics",QBE,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Your part in a changing world
At QBE, we’re driven by our purpose – to give people the confidence to achieve their ambitions .
We are an international insurer and reinsurer offering a diverse portfolio of commercial, personal and specialty products, as well as risk management solutions. Our product portfolio includes property, motor, crop, energy, marine, aviation and liability. We employee a team of more than 11,800 people, in 27 countries around the world.
The opportunity
An exciting opportunity of Reinsurance Portfolio Analyst has become available within QBE’s Global Reinsurance Operations team. The Global Reinsurance Operations team places the reinsurance protections for Australia Pacific (AUSPAC) as well as provide insightful research, analysis, strategic recommendations, and an appropriate supervisory framework.
Reporting to the Reinsurance Portfolio Manager, this role will support the development of reinsurance placement strategy & assist with portfolio management, budget plans, reinsurance reporting, wordings, and data management.
This is a unique opportunity to contribute to the efficient and effective monitoring and management of QBE’s ongoing risks, through reinsurance, contributing to shareholder wealth.
In this role, you will
Support the development of reinsurance placement strategy & assist with portfolio management.
Collate and analyze reinsurance purchasing information for the divisional reinsurance programs, including pricing and rates.
Support the divisional and Group program reviews, including cover notes, wordings, and special acceptances.
Assist with the Reinsurance budget for business plans.
Manage reporting procedures and systems for the delivery and management of reinsurance, claims and regulatory information/data.
Contribute to business improvement initiatives aligned to improving business unit’s KPIs
Communicate with a range of internal and external stakeholders, including reinsurers, brokers, and underwriters.
Your story so far
Experience in reinsurance or insurance, with a strong understanding of industry practices.
Experience in, or general knowledge of, insurance product classes and policy interpretation.
Ability to manage and analyze data and/or technical information, through systems & practices.
High degree of numeracy and outstanding attention to detail.
Strong capability in presenting insights through software solutions, such as PowerPoint.
Strong facilitation, interpersonal, influencing and communication skills to build relationships and rapport at all levels.
We are here to support you
We are proud to have been Voted #5 in the 2019 Top 20 Australian Workplaces for New Dads - HBF Direct Advice for Dads and we achieved Gold employer status in the 2019 & 2020 Australian LGBTI Inclusion Awards. We are also a finalist in the 2020 Australian HR Awards, shortlisted for Best Workplace Diversity & Inclusion Program and Best Health & Wellbeing Program.
We also offer a range of benefits to help provide holistic support for your work life, whatever your circumstance.
As a QBE employee, we will offer you
Flex@QBE leave to enhance your work/life integration.
Access to ‘Share the Care’ – 12 weeks’ flexible leave for new parents inclusive of paid superannuation.
Our ‘At My Best’ wellbeing program, which includes a free 12-month subscription to Headspace.
Ability to maximise retirement savings through voluntary super contributions and company matching.
Income protection insurance and reimbursed Death and Total Permanent Disability insurance premiums.
Access to REACH My Best - free holistic wellbeing coaching, nutritional, financial, and legal advice and confidential counselling.
Discounts on insurance products, car hire, hotels, goods, and services; and
Benefits through our various sports and arts sponsorship partners such as free and discounted tickets.
Join us.
Click APPLY to submit your application. Successful applicants will need to complete work rights, police and credit checks through our online provider as a condition of employment.
QBE recognise the value of diverse perspectives and experience. We are committed to an inclusive workplace where everyone feels valued and respected for who they are. If we can provide support with access requirements, alternative work arrangements or you would like to connect with one of our networks please contact us at recruitment@qbe.com .
Number of Openings:
1
How to Apply:
To submit your application, click ""Apply"" and follow the step by step process.
Equal Employment Opportunity:
QBE is an equal opportunity employer and is required to comply with equal employment opportunity legislation in each jurisdiction it operates.
11 days ago
Report job"
34,Reinsurance Portfolio Analyst,ANC,Not shown,Bella Vista NSW,"Competitive remuneration on offer
Make this newly created role your own
Flexible work arrangements
Job security and ongoing career opportunities in a continually growing business

About us
ANC provides transport solutions for some of Australia's largest companies through our national network, and we pride ourselves on creating value in our client relationships. With a supportive working environment and a solid team of stable, long standing key personnel, ANC maintains an enviable position at the forefront of this fast paced and competitive industry.

About the role
A fantastic new opportunity has become available for a knowledgeable and committed IT Business Analyst to join our growing team, located in Bella Vista Office. This role is responsible for reviewing, analysing and evaluating business systems and user needs. Document requirements, define scope, objectives and formulate systems to parallel overall business strategies. With excellence in service & safety at the core of our value proposition, we are looking for a professional who will reflect, uphold, and always champion these values.

The successful candidate:
Will be able to determine operational objectives by studying business functions; gathering information; evaluating output requirements and formats
Construct workflow charts and diagrams; studying system capabilities; writing specifications
Define project requirements by identifying project milestones, phases and elements
Suggest changes/enhancements to Senior Management using analytics to support your recommendations and actively participate in the implementation of approved changes
Conduct insightful, ad hoc analysis to investigate ongoing or one-time operational issues
Work with various business units to support and maintain new and existing customer data and system integrations.

Why work for ANC?
The right person will work in a continually growing business with a highly supporting management team and will receive:
the opportunity to make this newly created role your own
flexible work arrangements
job security and ongoing career opportunities in a continually growing business

Skills and Experience
Bachelor's Degree in appropriate field of study or equivalent work (desirable)
Proven experience as an IT Business Analyst within a small-medium IT team
ITIL Experience
Experience working within an Agile environment would be
Highly organised to adapt to varying volumes of work and manage multiple tasks simultaneously, solve problems, and meet deadlines and maintain a high quality of work
Strong analytical and documentation skills to assist in developing procedures to streamline IT and business
Detail oriented, analytical and inquisitive

This is a great opportunity to make an impact within a growing organisation. If this sounds like you, do not miss this opportunity to join our ANC family - apply now with your resume and a brief cover letter.

Considering the current conditions, suitable candidates will first be interviewed over MS Teams prior to a face to face interview.

No recruitment agencies please
15 days ago
Report job"
35,IT Business Analyst,TAL,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"Business Analyst
This role is responsible for providing business and initiative support to TAL’s Group Life Stakeholders by developing innovative and proactive business and digital solutions, managing system changes, daily support activities and detailing documentation on new or changed processes and technologies.
What will you be responsible for?
Analyse current business practices and processes, identifying improvement and transformation opportunities to improve customer service, reduce operating costs, speed of implementation, elimination of waste
Collaborate with stakeholders (IT, Administration, Product) on delivering value to our joint clients, being seen as a subject matter expert and valued consultant.
Recommend and develop system improvements, articulating the commercial benefits to the business and estimated time / effort / cost of delivering the improvements
Develop and maintain Business Requirements, Process Design document with all requirements being clearly and specifically documented and traceable through the Development Life Cycle
Assist in the upkeep and maintenance of core administration, underwriting and claims systems
Co-ordinate/Implement digital initiatives according to agreed timeframes and business requirements
Provide management status reporting, as agreed, against tasks or objectives on a regular basis, highlighting exceptions, risks and / or issues
Develop and provide communications strategies / plans, including implementation or release management documentation for end user groups with the provision of training and assistance prior to and post implementation
Manage, raise and assist in relation to incidents impact the teams owned digital assets for example Member Online, Web Services, Administration Portals
What are we looking for?
An understanding of what delivering value means
Developed analysis skills and problem solving skills, with a particular focus within Group Life Insurance – Claims, Underwriting and Administration
Ability to translate business requirements into technical specifications, and articulated solutions
Good self- management skills, planning, organising and time management skills
Able to identify potential business, commercial and technical risks and develop appropriate mitigation strategies
Ability to work as part of a team and contribute to positive outcomes for the team
Ability to assess financial, process and technology impacts of decisions or requirements during analysis
Experience in electronic data standards such as Acord
Integration experience (APIs/webservices)
CCBA/CBAP(preferred)
Experience in Agile delivery
You’re always accountable for your actions. You never give up. You strive to find the best outcomes for customers and partners. And, you value working together to find the best solutions for problems.
Important to us
Every Australian life is different. And we know the value of having different people from all walks of life with varied points of view.
Work is a big part of life, and we work hard to make it one of the best parts. We offer a workplace that’s inclusive and flexible, supporting our people with options that let them make the most of their careers. We don’t just say it; we do it.
We want to grow with you. Achieve with you. And support you to do your best work. We’re always looking for people who want to go further with us.
Why not see where we can go together?
Doing the right thing
Everyone at TAL has a responsibility to do the right thing and is accountable for the way they conduct themselves. Our expectations are that you follow the principles set out in our Code of Conduct when you come to work every day. Risk management is everyone’s responsibility.
11 days ago
Report job"
36,Business Analyst,Terem Technologies,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"We’re one of Australia’s fastest growing companies and we’re looking for a Business Analyst with a passion for product development to join our team. We want someone whose mission in life is to contribute to building great products.
Terem is a tech product development and strategy firm, building and taking products to market for Australia’s largest enterprises, fast-growing private firms and Government. Our capabilities range from software engineering to user experience to product strategy.
We’re on a mission to level up Australia’s product capabilities by striving for excellence in product execution.
We’re proud to have bootstrapped Terem from nothing to featuring on Australian Financial Review’s Fast 100 two years in a row. We’ve achieved this by continuing to deliver an outstanding level of service for our clients. Being bootstrapped means we have freedom and control over the future of the company, which means you’ll have freedom and control over your future at Terem.
You’ll love this role if:
Gathering knowledge and information is your passion - you enjoy digging into the technical details, finding out how things work and making sure your teams and Clients are successful in their deliveries.
Doing whatever it takes to make your team succeed is in your DNA - you love contributing to team success through gathering, prioritising and providing detailed requirements, building Use Cases and User Stories and building process maps, but you’ll also roll up your sleeves and go the extra mile to make our teams succeed.
You want a culture that is all about the smartest way forward – We focus on outcomes, and have a philosophy of strong opinions backed by data, but weakly held.
You love working closely with driven, passionate people – everyone on our team lives and breathes excellence in their field, whether it's excellence in engineering, excellence in project management or excellence in product management.
You love variety – there are so many interesting aspects of what we do. Each client engagement sheds light on ideas you’d never thought of, each engagement challenges us to improve our methodology. There are always new initiatives to take on.

What we’re looking for from you:
Experience as a Business Analyst or System Analyst building tech products (2-3 years).
Experience working in an Agile development environment.
Experience with an API Gateway/Platform is very highly regarded.
Able to gather, build, prioritise and flesh-out detailed technical product requirements, build Use Cases and User Stories with the necessary technical/testing detail, build/add to process flow diagrams and map User Journeys.
Able to drive progress and push within your team to meet outcomes and see results.
Excellent communication with Internal and External stakeholders, using a variety of written and visual mediums.
Proactive and dedicated to seeing the project succeed.
An ability to build great relationships with stakeholders and internal teams.
Experience with government preferred but not essential.
Something a bit unique you can bring to Terem to help us keep growing.

Before applying for this role, it is relevant to mention that you will need to pass a pre-employment security clearance. This means that you need to be an Australian citizen, and also be able to prove that you have been living in Australia for the last 5 years.
14 days ago
Report job"
37,Business Analyst,Department of Customer Service,"$90,661 - $106,888 a year",Sydney NSW,"Business Analyst
Full Time Ongoing
Location – Sydney - McKell
SNSW Grade 7/8 - base salary starting at $90,661

About Service NSW
Service NSW is making it easier for people and businesses across NSW to access government services.

Since launching in July 2013, we have successfully transformed and streamlined NSW Government service delivery with cutting edge digital solutions and an award-winning culture of passion and teamwork.

Our customer-centric solution offers simpler and faster access to government transactions through our digital channels, a 24/7 phone service and an expanding network of Service Centres.

We currently partner with more than 50 agencies to offer in excess of 1,000 NSW Government transactions including driver licences, vehicle registration renewals, applications for birth certificates, Senior Cards, Housing NSW payments, fines, contractor licences and many more.

Your remuneration
SNSW Grade 7/8- The package includes the base salary range of $90,661 to $106,888, plus employer's contribution to superannuation and annual leave loading.

Opportunity
We are looking for a Business Analyst role to join our team. This role supports the Project Manager and Senior Business Analyst and requires an understanding of the importance of high value customer service delivery. Contact Centre experience desired but not essential.

To be successful in the role you as a Business Analyst, you will require:

Analytical and problem-solving skills that can be applied to any business or technical area without detailed knowledge of that area
Be detail-oriented and capable of delivering a high level of accuracy
Take responsibility for delivering high quality customer focused services
Very good interpersonal and consultative skills
Very good communication skills, both oral and written and the ability to communicate complex problems in a way the audience can understand.
A can-do attitude and be willing to have a go

The key accountabilities for the Business Analyst include:

Assist with discovery activities including development of customer journey maps, and service blueprints and customer research
Development of process maps
Data analysis and presentation of findings
Work closely and support the Senior Business analyst to produce key deliverables on the projects
Assist the project manager to complete project artefacts including scope definition, options analysis, steering committee packs, prepare of presentation packs, pilot planning, showcases and go-live support

Please note that employment at Service NSW is subject to a satisfactory Criminal Records Check.

Applications Close: Wednesday 3rd March @ 10.59am

When applying you need to:
Provide a covering letter and resume (Resume not exceeding 5 pages) that details your experience and how you meet the capabilities of the role.

Want to know more?
For a confidential discussion about this role or the Service NSW recruitment process, please contact at Kannan Iyer at Kannan.iyer@customerservice.nsw.gov.au

Additional information
Part of the assessment process includes additional online capability testing, skills testing or work samples in accordance with the Government Sector Employment Act 2013. A talent pool may be created for future ongoing and temporary roles and is valid for a period of up to 12 months. Employment to Service NSW is subject to a satisfactory national criminal record check.

Service NSW is passionate about building a culture that values and supports diversity and inclusion. Service NSW encourages applications from people with disability, Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islanders, LGBTQI and people from culturally and linguistically diverse backgrounds. If you are a person with disability and need adjustment in the recruitment process, please contact the Recruitment team via email on CSrecruitment@customerservice.nsw.gov.au.
NSW Public Service Commission
Today
Report job"
38,Business Analyst,Zurich Insurance Group,Not shown,Sydney NSW,"How do you feel about the things you truly love? Don’t you want to protect them in the best way possible? Imagine if you could help people do this all over the world. You’d give them confidence and reassurance by protecting what they love most.
This is no easy task. In today’s interconnected world, tackling risk is fast, unpredictable and invigorating. It’s a big challenge, but at Zurich you’ll have a truly diverse network helping you. As part of an international team, every day would provide opportunities to learn, grow and share ideas.
As a Business Analyst in our Data Warehouse team, you’ll shape the definition and drive the implementation of projects and BAU Small Changes across our General Insurance business. You will be responsible for gathering and documenting end to end business requirements for our Data Warehouse and business intelligence and analytics platforms. We’re confident in your ability to collaborate with a variety of stakeholders that include solution designers/architects, development and testing teams as you deliver sustainable solutions for our business. As a vital member of the team, you also be involved in everything from User Acceptance testing, data analysis, planning & forecasting through to system administration.
We’d love to see applications from experienced Business Analysts who posses a blend of technical skills, an analytical mindset who are able to think about the bigger picture. As you’ll be working across projects, BAU and general insurance software applications its’ ideal that you’re comfortable in both agile and waterfall methodologies. Your previous exposure to a general insurance business and BI / Data Warehousing applications will certainly enable you to hit the ground in this busy and varied role.
Experience aside, your strong communication, influencing and relationship management skills will certainly be of value as you collaborate with our broader business both locally in Australia and further abroad. As you make an impact across borders, you’ll feel the support of being part of a strong and stable organisation. A long-standing player in the insurance industry, we make every effort to address the career development needs and plans of our employees to ensure their success in the future.
So, make a difference. Be challenged. Be inspired. Be supported. Love what you do. Work for us.
7 days ago
Report job"
